_	As a woman who has worked very hard to establish her career, and as a mom, I feel I must speak out with the hope that as a society we will always strive to be better.
_	He concluded the book "Tragedy and Hope" with the hope that the West could "resume its development along its old patterns of Inclusive Diversity".
_	It is responsible for collecting data regarding participating companies’ emissions which it then ranks in a league table “based on participant's changes in energy use against a baseline and not their total emissions” with the hope that carbon efficiency will become a “reputational issue" for those involved.
_	Goldsmith also pursued vendettas against other journalists who queried his methods, including Barbara Conway, who wrote the "Scrutineer" column in the City pages of the "Daily Telegraph"; he expressed the hope that she would "choke on her own vomit".
_	Owens has been working with the Bath Institute of Medical Engineering in the hope that they will be able to create sex toys that can be used by disabled people who, without them, cannot masturbate.
_	"Acconci and his colleagues designed their "interactive art installation" with the hope that visitors to the Midwest Airlines Center will see materials defying physical properties and reflect on their own potential.
_	Vusi knocked at the door in the hope that Adams might be there to open it.
_	It was named "Mammoth" in the hope that the convenience of its directness and elimination of smaller connecting roads between thoroughfares would result in sufficient use and prestige as to "kill all the other roads."
_	The Anfal campaign destroyed many Kurdish, Assyrian and other ethnic minority villages and enclaves, and their inhabitants were often forcibly relocated to large cities in the hope that they would be Arabized.
_	The West responded with sanctions targeted at Putin's immediate entourage, and Bukovsky expressed the hope that this would prove the end of his regime.
_	Though she was little known to voters, Democrats embraced the hope that Nunn, with her executive experience as well as family name, could make their party once again competitive in-state.
_	Speed of intervention appears to be crucial; intervention is often delayed in the hope that insolvent banks will recover if given liquidity support and relaxation of regulations, and in the end this delay increases stress on the economy.
_	The "Recruit" still stands, currently unused, with the hope that she will someday become a maritime museum.
_	On the other hand, noted historian Ramachandra Guha has written about how C. P., egged on by Mohammed Ali Jinnah, had established secret ties with senior Ministers of the British Government, who encouraged him in the hope that he would give them privileged access to monazite, a material Travancore was rich in and which could give the British a lead in the nuclear arms race.
_	These are always messy (see the US equivalent at Plutonium Valley in Project 56), for a successful test subjects the core fuel to high explosives in the hope that it simply scatters rather than undergoes criticality.
_	The ailing person was left to sleep in the special underground room in the hope that the sufferer would dream of Maimonides and get better.
_	She has expressed the hope that through travel, her work can reflect the ways in which black culture is not confined by physical boundaries.
_	In the same interview, Iger also expressed the hope that the "Frozen" franchise "is something that is kind of forever for the company" similar to "The Lion King"."
_	In response to what he had discovered McGarva immediately began daily feeding the dogs and cleaning their wounds in the hope that this would make the dogs more attractive for adoption.
_	The article was part of a multi-author series, assembled by the editors in response to recent anti-Semitic unrest in Brooklyn and elsewhere "in the hope that a free and forthright debate will reduce the pressure, now dangerously high, and leave us with a healthier understanding of the human elements involved."
_	While the bogus information was convincing, the primary goal was simply to keep the hacker connected long enough to trace his connection, and with the hope that the hacker might send a written request for further information listed as available in hard copy.
_	He began writing the score in 2005, in the hope that starting this task early would make him more involved with the finished film.
_	Sergei leaves far away from his native place, to Kazakhstan, where even with his stained biography he is able to get a job in his specialty, and lives without abandoning the hope that sooner or later the truth will be uncovered.
_	Whip steals valuable pineapples from French Guiana in the hope that they will grow in Hawaii.
_	Some Jews in times of desperation have made nedarim in the hope that God will answer their prayers in exchange for making a commitment.
_	Meanwhile in Sarawak, the Mill Hill Missionaries was invited by the White Rajahs in the hope that it would be a stabilizing influence to the native Iban people.
_	Joseph hopes to find Budu and Mendoza in these places, but eventually he finds Budu's still viable remains elsewhere and transports them to one of the facilities in the hope that they can be re-animated.
_	Although Meles and his administration claimed they preferred a united but federal state that included the Eritrean state, since Meles' TPLF fought together with EPLF, Meles originally left the decision of independence to the Eritrean citizens in the hope that the independence referendum would vote against secession, according to "Time" magazine's 1991 analysis.
_	The Bulgarian plan was to organize these Slavs militarily in the hope that Bulgaria would eventually assume the administration there.
_	Abbot Leo also expressed the hope that the Priory would become a Community in its own right in the movement of monastic renewal.
_	In 1957, his son Ameen Tokmina ran for parliament in the elections in the hope that a position in the government could help him look for more information.
_	It is decided that the Jakovasaurs are to be given their own home in the hope that they will breed.
_	The Initiative came together to work around restrictions, which have previously prevented specifically the sharing of information on avian influenza (a.k.a. bird flu), with the hope that more shared information will help researchers understand how viruses spread, evolve, and potentially become pandemic, anticipating that its EpiFlu database will be a substantial improvement over previously available databases, by promoting influenza data to becoming available more quickly and to a wider audience than has been possible in the past.
_	Urfa made a demo EP, "Boris", but since no interest was generated by it, they decided to go for a second album that would be released on their own label with the hope that after it generated enough interest, it would attract the attention of a record company.
_	Asquith resorted to a favoured stratagem and, persuading Kitchener to undertake a tour of the Gallipoli battlefield in the hope that he could be persuaded to remain in the Mediterranean as Commander-in-Chief, took temporary charge of the War Office himself.
_	In September 1998, the couple fall on hard times and they plan to make money by stealing a horse and selling it, after replacing it with an older horse in the hope that no-one would notice the difference.
_	With a conventional call option the investor pays a premium for an "option" (the right but not the obligation) to buy shares of stock (bonds, currency, and other assets may also be shorted) in the hope that the stock's market price will rise above the strike price before the option expires.
_	He sent his brother with his ship to bring the more heavily wounded to Negroponte, and burned three of the captured galleys since they were too much of a burden—in his letter to the Signoria, he expressed the hope that his men would still be recompensed for them, his shipwrights estimating their value at 600 gold ducats.
_	Among these was the use of such plasmas as "bullets" to fire at incoming warheads with the hope that the associated electric currents would disrupt their electronics.
_	Vilma underwent knee surgery during the preseason and was placed on the Reserve/Injured Designated for Return list, with the hope that he would recover in time to play during the season.
_	The album was originally released in France in October 1971 on BYG Actuel (catalogue number 529.353), and reissued in the UK in 1974 by Virgin Records (catalogue number VC-502), where it sold for 59p, the price of a single, a marketing scheme Virgin had used the year before for the album "The Faust Tapes" by Faust, in the hope that greatly discounted albums would give more exposure to the artists and encourage sales of their regularly priced albums, although these discounted albums did not qualify for album chart listings.
_	Fang brings with him a Buddhist sutra printed in gold lettering, in the hope that the presence of the sutra in Dunhuang will increase the sanctity of the city and make Li Yuanhao think twice about invasion.
_	Meilleur also expressed the hope that Ontario would someday become a permanent member of the organization.
_	Ross again becomes distressed and agitated, he then punches Simmonds in the hope that it would look as if he assaulted the officers.
_	However, entering a program name without parameters in the hope that it will display usage help can be hazardous, as some programs and scripts execute without further notice.
_	He expressed the hope that the country would improve as they traveled further south along the coast.
_	When Freud was 35, his father had the bible rebound and presented it to his son with the hope that he would return to the faith.
_	Most serious of all, the hope that the Constitutional Revolution would inaugurate a new era of independence from the great powers ended when, under the Anglo-Russian Entente of 1907, Britain and Russia agreed to divide Persia into spheres of influence.
_	In 1996 he decided to return to Romania, where his name had been reinstated in historical records after the Revolution, in the hope that his coaching experience abroad would be rewarded.
_	Song Jiang treats Gao Qiu as an honoured guest and releases him in the hope that he will appeal for amnesty from Emperor Huizong on behalf of the Liangshan outlaws.
_	Two weeks later, he wrote a letter to Newton's mother in which he described her son's courage and expressed the hope that he might yet be found alive.
_	The Lake Naroch Offensive was launched at the request of France, in the hope that the Germans would transfer more units to the East after their attack on Verdun.
_	In turn, this has renewed interest in techniques other than traditional 'extra-capsular excision' in the hope that post-operative pain might be reduced.
_	Mizoguchi spends it on prostitutes in the hope that Dosen will be forced to expel him.
_	In the early years, Jorge's power was partly reliant on the hope that he might yet succeed Manuel, but that prospect diminished quickly as Manuel's new queen, Mary of Spain, produced a succession of sons.
_	In "The Heaven Sword and Dragon Saber", it is revealed that the couple realise that the eventual fall of Xiangyang is inevitable, so they wrote their knowledge of martial arts and military strategy on scrolls and hid them separately in the blades of the Heaven Reliant Sword and Dragon Slaying Saber, in the hope that future generations would inherit their legacy.
_	When Souza was 20 years old, Hong Kong League champion South China signed him as a youth squad player, with the hope that he will be able to represent Hong Kong after 7 years.
_	Addressing the National Press Club in February 2000, he called on Australia's media to be more responsible in its coverage of Indonesia, in the hope that would help to restore bilateral relations.
_	One year later, in 3058, a Jade Falcon incursion into the Lyran Alliance prompted Katherine to request aid from all nations across the Inner Sphere, while secretly withholding crucial intelligence in the hope that her enemies, specifically Victor, would be killed in the ensuing slaughter.
_	He also wrote that he would only view the first handful of episodes, due to the new showrunner and the hope that the season would improve.
_	He was 33 years old and married when he joined her class; he later left his wife in the hope that he might marry Eddy, but his feelings were not reciprocated.
_	Two children thrown out from the burning hut in the hope that they would survive were thrown back into the flames by the arsonists.
_	When her sister Shelke was taken by Shinra for their Deepground unit, Shalua went in search of Shelke, joining AVALANCHE in the hope that they would lead her to her sister.
_	But she was pessimistic of the hope that men and women would ever reach sexual equality, and she doubted that a woman could find such a thing in marriage, where she by law was much restricted and given to her husbands whims.
_	Hitler believed that Britain's refusal to end the war was based on the hope that the United States and the Soviet Union would enter the war against Germany sooner or later.
_	Egyptologists such as Wolfgang Helck, Nicolas Grimal, Hermann Alexander Schlögl and Francesco Tiradritti believe that king Ninetjer, the third ruler of 2nd dynasty, left a realm that was suffering from an overly complex state administration and that Ninetjer decided to split Egypt to leave it to his two sons (or, at least, two chosen successors) who would rule two separate kingdoms, in the hope that the two rulers could better administer the states.
_	In late 2003, it was first revealed that the film's writer and director Gurinder Chadha planned to turn the film into a stage musical with the hope that it could be staged a year later.
_	The fact that the siege had taken so long exposed the British forces' vulnerabilities and encouraged the native Indian states – in particular the old Maratha Confederacy in central India – to continue their resistance against British imperialism in the hope that they could still be defeated.
_	Jr a voyage on one of his steamers to New Orleans, in the hope that it would help with his medical condition.
_	His friends take him to Chennai with the hope that he will start life afresh.
_	It concluded with the hope that the game would presage the conversion of other large, classic boardgames to the computer.
_	Orr sat out the season to rest his oft-injured knee in the hope that rest would allow him to return to play in 1978–79.
_	You buy a share in the hope that a greater fool will eventually pay more for it.
_	Tricia was put out when Alan appointed Bernice Blackstock (Samantha Giles) bar manager instead of her (tried her best to get the job and even put together a CV); had a mud fight with Mandy Dingle (Lisa Riley); discovers Bernice’s plan and laughs at her with Mandy; is surprised when Scott cannot perform in bed with her; goes to the vets ball but doesn’t enjoy being groped all night; thinks Bernice made Gavin Ferris up and is a lunatic; sleeps with Gavin behind Bernice's back; comforts Roy Glover (Nicky Evans) before his wedding; tries to get the village to buy The Woolpack; flirts with Chris Tate (Peter Amory) in the hope that he will give her the money; wants to plan her own theme night to prove she is better than Bernice.
_	Prior to this raid, bombing had used the tactic of area bombardment with many light bombs, in the hope that one would hit the target.
_	In 1751, Washington made his only trip abroad when he traveled with Lawrence, to Barbados, in the hope that the climate would be beneficial to Lawrence's tuberculosis.
_	13. "Expresses" the hope that the Ad Hoc Committee on the Restructuring of the Economic and Social Sectors of the United Nations System, which will consider the report of the Group of Experts on the Structure of the United Nations System entitled A New United Nations Structure for Global Economic Co-operation, will take full account of the need to implement the World Plan of Action and related resolutions of the Conference, as well as the requirements of the United Nations Decade for Women: Equality, Development and Peace, and appeals to the Ad Hoc Committee to ensure that the machinery designed to deal with questions relating to women should be strengthened, taking into account, in particular, the role of the Commission on the Status of Women and the procedures established for the system-wide review and appraisal of the World Plan of Action;
_	At the time, Miramax co-head Harvey Weinstein expressed the hope that a new "Fletch" series would be "Miramax Films' first-ever series."
_	For these women, being given the hope that there was a reasonably priced and safe alternative to countless pregnancies gave many women something they had never had in the past: control of their bodies and in turn their lives.
_	In the 1550s, during the reign of John III, a few 900t behemoths were built for India runs, in the hope that larger ships would provide economies of scale.
_	Deriding the appointments, the UGDD described Ratanga's portfolio as "a hot potato that he was passed in the hope that it burns [his] fingers".
_	Most commonly, the victim has been poisoned by a robber who gave the victim a scopolamine-laced beverage, in the hope that the victim would become unconscious or unable to effectively resist the robbery.
_	Shunzei had sent Retired Emperor Go-Shirakawa 14 years previously, imploring him to forgive Teika for striking a superior with a candlestick; "the allusion conveys the hope that just as Shunzei's poem obtained his erring son's restoration to rank and office under Go-Shirakawa, now Teika's own poem will win him admission to Go-Toba's Court despite his connection with the "disgraced" Kujō faction."
_	Bluebear, acting on an impulse, pushes him in the hope that he will land in the right dimension.
_	The Ministry of Environment and Forests, Government of India, has recently included this lake under the National Lake Conservation Plan in the hope that this will help preserve it.
_	A tasteofcountry.com review said that "Actress Kristin Chenoweth’s turn at country music comes with the hope that she’ll be able to carry her award-winning talents from Broadway to country radio.
_	In a book published in 1860 he wrote to the Diocese of Huron "with the hope that the explanations given may remove erroneous impressions" at the Church in Canada.
_	Farhad tries hard by day and night in the hope that Khosrow let him to marry Shirin.
_	Feeling that drunks would overrun their community, West Seattle petitioned to be annexed into the City of Seattle in the hope that its conservative mayor, William Hickman Moore, would address this and other concerns.
_	On two occasions, Suffolk County built roads and allowed them to be redesignated as state highways, in the hope that the state would upgrade them when the county couldn't.
_	In 1932, another biographer of Scott, John Buchan, expressed the hope that "no literary resurrectionist will ever be guilty of the crime of giving [it] to the world".
_	Trainer Bernard Bletsoe hit on the idea to pack Grudon's hooves with butter in the hope that this would prevent snow from clogging in them.
_	Whaling was difficult and dangerous, but boys would go out to sea to make their fortune, nonetheless, in the hope that some of them would eventually come to command a vessel.
_	He also expressed the hope that the new British foreign secretary Philip Hammond "will adopt a constructive diplomacy" towards Iran.
_	This brings maddening joy to the doctor and he made a point to get the Terror Memory for himself, experimenting on himself with numerous Gaia Memories with various Living Connectors on his body before Shroud gave him the Weather Memory in the hope that he would be powerful enough to eliminate Ryubee.
_	In 1940 she handed over the plans and the memoir of the invention to Commander James Dickson, United Kingdom air attache in Madrid, in the hope that the work of Virgilio Leret would be of help to the allies in the Second World War.
_	In 1986, in an episode that became known as The Iran–Contra affair, the Reagan administration illegally facilitated the sale of arms to Iran, the subject of an arms embargo, in the hope that the arms sales would secure the release of hostages and allow U.S. intelligence agencies to fund the Nicaraguan Contras.
_	Zoë, Percy, and Thalia go to find Frederick Chase in the hope that he will help them reach their final destination: Mount Tamalpais, which is the modern location of the Titans' fortress on Mount Othrys.
_	Working with interns to gather and assemble the content, Karp pressed on with the hope that the unique publication would soon attract enough advertising revenue or venture capitalist funding to continue.
_	Newspapers have dealt with this problem in varying ways, including using software to combine two existing, similar characters, including a picture of the personality, or, especially as is the case with Yu Shyi-kun, simply substituting a homophone for the rare character in the hope that the reader would be able to make the correct inference.
_	The ability to produce allomones such as farnesene to repel and disperse aphids and to attract their predators has been experimentally transferred to transgenic "Arabidopsis thaliana" plants using an Eβf synthase gene in the hope that the approach could protect transgenic crops.
_	The performances were later edited into a music video with the hope that it would go viral.
_	The wording of a Spanish language press report by El País de Madrid, translated freely from English, quoted Amabssador Baxter as having cabled the State Department expressing the hope that the assassination of Cecilia Fontana de Héber in 1978 and the other attempted assassinations, had been 'definitively laid to rest'.
_	This leniency has been passed with the hope that drivers will be more willing to report their health conditions.
_	...in the hope that, at long last, they respect the use of the name of the language (and the corresponding people) chosen by its users and unanimously accepted by the international scholarly and NGO community, as well as by many intergovernmental fora.
_	In 2002 the South Sydney Rabbitohs signed Craigie on a two-year deal in the hope that his fitness problems could be overcome and he could further display his ability he had shown in glimpses at his two previous clubs.
_	Carl McKelvey, a "white trash male" as he describes himself, returns to the town after a three-year absence in the hope that he can live with his daughter again, and maybe even renew his relationship with his ex-wife, Chrissy.
_	For a short time, Igor was released as freeware with the hope that online sales of scores would finance it.
_	They decide that the Houston–New York game will be played with no penalties, no substitutions, and no time limit in the hope that Jonathan, if he decides to play, will be killed during the game.
_	He based this action on the hope that his books would never go out of print; they would last beyond his lifetime and would be a legacy of his life’s work.
_	He and his people may even have been sent there in the hope that they would be killed by the Dumnonians.
_	Members of "Slovenski Jug" (Slavic South), a Serbian nationalist movement, also participated in the riots, which were orchestrated by Ljotić in the hope that violence would provoke martial law and thus bring about a more centralized system of control in the university.
_	His devotees waited for three days in the hope that Swami will come out of his Samadhi status.
_	Large predators like the yellow-spotted monitors and sand goannas are being fed young, small, cane toads by researchers to create a "food poisoning"-like experience for the predators, in the hope that they will avoid eating adult toads which might kill them.
_	Retired Army colonel Terry Lee, who had worked with Hasan, said the psychiatrist expressed the hope that Obama would withdraw U.S. troops from Iraq and Afghanistan, and argued with military colleagues who supported the wars.
_	Selaya, inquisitor of Badajoz, complained to the King of Portugal that a Jew who had come from the Orient (referring to Reuveni) had filled the Spanish Marranos with the hope that the Messiah would come and lead Israel from all lands back to Israel, and that he had even emboldened them to overt acts (comp. H. Grätz, l.c. ix. 532).
_	The village head, Ratan and members decide to let the women in their families contest on the reserved seats in the hope that they would continue to have their writ run.
_	The team was at .500, and Murray expressed the hope that the team had enough games to make run to the playoffs.
_	They decide to seek employment by staging a fake quarrel over the affair between Orleans and Amiens, in the hope that this will win them places as the noblemen's retainers.
_	The Lutheran bishop of Oslo immediately encouraged him to go to Kautokeino in the hope that Stockfleth — who knew the Sami culture, was fluent in Sami and was respected among the Sami because of his books — would be able to reconcile a group of Laestadian Sami schismatics with the official Lutheran state church.
_	The character was chosen in the hope that the Buddhist virtues present in him would become embedded in the municipality's youth.
_	He had an interest in poetry and play writing, although his father's will of 1599 expresses the hope that he would give up such vanities.
_	It was with great joy that the Board of Directors of the MMCA decided to honour him by giving his name to the Museum’s new three-storey wing and to dedicate to him the catalogue of the permanent collection, which now numbers more than one thousand works (paintings, sculptures, installations, assemblages, engravings, photographs), in the hope that the Museum will remain independent, unconventional and open-minded, that is guided by the same principles that characterised Iolas himself.
_	STCs rely on transmitting multiple, redundant copies of a data stream to the receiver in the hope that at least some of them may survive the physical path between transmission and reception in a good enough state to allow reliable decoding.
_	Determined to find a cure, Antonio sets sail for Peking in the hope that traditional Chinese medicine has the answer that eludes the West.
_	Thereby, Wallis notes, "the individual learns to doubt his own judgement; to locate some meaning in the undoubted mystification of much of Hubbard's writing; or to acquiesce to some half-comprehended and yet half-incomprehensible statement in the hope that all will be made clear to him at some later point."
_	The Coldstream Guards, part of the British Army, then took over the possession of the Fort and it became used as a prison, a hospital and later in 1902, as the headquarters of the South African Constabulary - a para-military body which was established at the end of 1900 with the hope that it would take over from British troops after the war.
_	Believing he had no hope of recovery, however, Fishe returned to England and was sent to Margate in the hope that the bracing sea air at that resort would help him.
_	Tomoko's parents allowed Smith to photograph their daughter's body, in the hope that it might draw attention to the plight of similar families in Minamata and other pollution victims all over the world.
_	He thought it appropriate to name the team after the Greek Spartan army in the hope that the players would give their all as they went into "battle" on the field of play.
_	The yard would take on three up-coming cricketers for the winter, in the hope that the hard work would "toughen them up" to get them picked for the England cricket team.
_	The Nazi regime sent retired General Wilhelm Faulpel as ambassador to Franco's regime, Faulpel supported Franco and the Falange in the hope that they would create a Nazi-like regime in Spain.
_	The details seem to be part of the speech in the hope that the salacious accusations will hide the weakness of Apollodorus' case.
_	Instead Pretorius built a fortified laager on terrain of his own choosing, in the hope that general Ndlela would attack it as at Veglaer.
_	He then decided to try heading to Britain in the hope that from there it would be easier to get to Turkey.
_	Dashwood, in the hope that the navy might buy her, described "Iphigenie" as "... coppered, and sails remarkably fast, having been pursued several Times during her Passage".
_	She learns that her human form is the latest container to hide a power stolen from the DomZ centuries ago in the hope that the High Priest, who must have spirit energy to survive, would starve to death.
_	Smith was sent on a special mission by Young, who hoped to delay the arrival of the troops in the hope that a diplomatic breakthrough could be reached before the troops reached Salt Lake City.
_	The basslines from Golombisky are haunting and easily detached you from session to fill you emotions of sorrow and the hope that follows."
_	Executives of both companies expressed the hope that such cooperation would lead to better compatibility between Microsoft Office and OpenOffice.org and better virtualization techniques.
_	When the Forth and Cart Canal was promoted in the 1830s, it essentially revived Baird's plan, in the hope that it would provide a better route between Paisley and the Firth of Forth than the alternative which went via Port Eglinton and Port Dundas.
_	This discussion carried on over into the Quebec Conference in the hope that an agreement could be eventually made considering that it was not concluded at the end of the Charlottetown Conference.
_	Richard is happy to lavish Shelley with expensive gifts in the hope that they will coax her into having sex with him.
_	He was accompanied by his wife, but her health deteriorated and in 1852 she moved to Ceylon in the hope that the climate would help.
_	Increasing environmental issues such as Deforestation in Indonesia prompted the founders to establish this park with the hope that it would serve as a model for butterfly conservation.
_	He then chose to drop by his fingertips from a part of the wall which was located above the governor's garden, in the hope that the soft earth would help break his fall.
_	Lilly hires a nurse, Carol Roberg, in the hope that Roy will give up Moira for Carol.
_	O'Shaughnessy served in the armies of France in the hope that Irish support would enable James II, or his successors, regain the throne of Britain and Ireland.
_	In 1969, while Gentry was affiliated with an Adventist college in Maryland, Oak Ridge National Laboratory invited him to use their facilities, as a guest scientist in the hope that his work on radiohalos might lead to discovering super-heavy elements.
_	Brown intended on using her campaign to bring many minorities to the Green Party in the hope that it would better represent a revolutionary force for social justice.
_	With this goal in mind, the founders decided to address the most serious violations of human dignity, physical integrity and freedom, namely extrajudicial killings, enforced disappearances, torture, and arbitrary detention, with the hope that individuals who no longer fear being subjected to these violations can speak and act freely to call for their rights and ensure the rule of law in their countries.
_	It is also a prayer offered on this day for the revival of Bhikkuni Sasana in Sri Lanka and with the hope that it will flourish in the future.
_	In part because of this the seat was the heartland of the Equal Citizenship campaign in the late 1980s which argued that political parties in Britain should organise and contest elections in Northern Ireland, in the hope that this would "normalise" the politics of the province.
_	He confided to one of his personal training clients that he wished to share those experiences with the public, with the hope that it would benefit others.
_	Bradman anticipated rain, so he utilised Toshack and Johnson to bowl defensively to slow England's progress in the hope that the hosts would not have a lead by the time a sticky wicket materialised.
_	When Lana is placed in a catatonic state by Brainiac in the episode "Veritas", Kara agrees to cooperate with him in the hope that he will not kill Lana.
_	Wang Ling did not receive any reply so he sent Yang Hong (楊弘) to inform Huang Hua (黃華), the Inspector of Yan Province, of their plans, in the hope that Huang would support him.
_	They then established a blockade on the town in the hope that they could starve out its garrison.
_	South Korea had adopted a sunshine policy towards the North that was based on the hope that one day, the two countries would be re-united in the 1990s.
_	Among the tasks she undertook was taking women of ill repute into her own home in the hope that exposure to genteel surroundings would provide them with moral rehabilitation.
_	The T5 Zaunkönig torpedoes were designed to zigzag in the hope that they would have a better chance of finding a target within a convoy.
_	Also, some fighters practice moves whose sole purpose is to inflict pain upon their opponent, in the hope that they will tap out.
_	The judges, Eusebius notes, must have been motivated either out of compassion or the hope that he might change his mind and renounce Christianity.
_	The song also includes a call to arms and expresses the hope that, under General Dąbrowski's command, the legionaries would rejoin their nation and retrieve "what the alien force has seized" through armed struggle.
_	Other countries under French colonial rule, including Morocco, Indochina and several in West Africa, had either become independent or had begun to negotiate the process to independence; this inspired the hope that Madagascar could follow suit, allowing the tantalizing opportunity for PADESM to wield unfettered power in Malagasy politics.
_	The attack was made in daylight as a ruse, in the hope that the unusual time would surprise the German defenders, who would be under cover sheltering from the bombardments being fired at the same time each day.
_	It is usually executed by two or more separate forces simultaneously or nearly simultaneously, in the hope that their opponent will be forced to split their fighting force to deal with both threats, therefore reducing their odds of success.
_	On 31 January, Mubarak swore in his new cabinet in the hope that the unrest would fade.
_	Local organisations, including the Town Council, and the public are offering support to the Silk Mill in the hope that weaving activity can be restored to the Mill.
_	Speculation is the purchase of an asset (a commodity, goods, or real estate) with the hope that it will become more valuable at a future date.
_	So long as contestant users of any essentially contested concept believe, however deludedly, that their own use of it is the only one that can command honest and informed approval, they are likely to persist in the hope that they will ultimately persuade and convert all their opponents by logical means.
_	The Rosenblatts wanted a physician to be part of the class action suit and Engle volunteered to participate in the hope that people would be warned against becoming addicted to smoking.
_	Meanwhile, the family decides to get him married to a modest young woman Chitti [Pandari Bai) in the hope that he would become better human being.
_	It soon emerges that Blackadder resents Johnson for apparently ignoring his novel "Edmund: A Butler's Tale" which, under the pseudonym of "Gertrude Perkins"; he had secretly sent to Johnson in the hope that he would get it published.
_	In 1760, his father approached Thomas Braidwood, owner of a school of mathematics in Edinburgh, seeking an education for the boy, then ten years old, in the hope that he could be taught to write.
_	Sometimes HIF will patent a new design in the hope that instrument vendors will buy the rights and mass-produce the instrument at a lower cost to everyone.
_	The character had the hope that "El Caleuche" would return her husband who was missing in the ocean after a shipwreck.
_	The county administrator/manager, operating under the council-manager government form, was created in part to remove county government from the power of the political parties, and place management of the county into the hands of an outside expert who was usually a business manager or engineer, with the hope that the county manager would remain neutral to county politics.
_	He was elected a member of the latter in 1845, resigning in 1852 in the hope that it would assist his election to associateship of the Royal Academy.
_	Nicky began training with Jason in 2008 in an attempt to make a comeback and in the hope that the British Boxing Board of Control would issue him a license.
_	Bernadette asks her listeners to "sing me a song" - of any type - in the hope that the entire world will be able to join in.
_	Louise materializes from the future and reveals her mission to both of them in the hope that they will voluntarily keep quiet.
_	Meanwhile, Ravi works to develop a cure for Liv's affliction, in the hope that one day she will be able to resume her former life.
_	This was done with the hope that it would be more convenient for people working downtown to visit the library.
_	Remembering this, Ravan goes to Yamlok, the abode of Yama, in the hope that if he keeps Yama under his thumb, he can elude death.
_	Although the horses and the pack were maintained in the hope that the Hunt would resume, and the Hunt Committee remained active until 1973, the Second World War brought the end of the Royal Calpe Hunt.
_	In January 1931, at the closing session of the Round Table Conference, Ramsay MacDonald went so far as to express the hope that the Congress would be represented at the next session.
_	Johan Larsson Sparre defended the walls and the castle in the hope that the King would return to Sweden.
_	In the hope that the navigational tradition would be preserved for future generations, Mau shared his knowledge with the Polynesian Voyaging Society (PVS).
_	John if he contrived the Carvalet contract in the hope that Françoise would die, and is relieved when he denies it.
_	Nevertheless, Singleton concluded that the book was an important one, having earlier in the review expressed the hope that it would "encourage scholars to reanalyse the conventional wisdom."
_	His personal philosophy can perhaps be summarised in his dedication which he penned at the publication of his poetry collection "Temperance Rhymes": 'to the working men of Manchester ... in the hope that they may act as another small weight on the right end of that lever which is to raise them in the scale of humanity.
_	City officials spent $125,000 of tax money to host the pageant in Branson in the hope that it would encourage tourism but admitted after the pageant that it was not worth the cost.
_	Tyler that her parents have given them their blessing, in the hope that she would be able to bring them around to the idea.
_	In its editorial, The Nelson Evening Mail expressed the hope that Everett could be induced to reconsider because he had undertaken his responsibilities in a thorough and earnest manner.
_	Students are required to live in school accommodation in the hope that they learn both professional knowledge and techniques and problem-solving skills from the courses taken and life experiences gained.
_	The local council granted a lease of the Llangollen railway station building and of track to the society, with the hope that the railway would improve the local economy and bring more tourists to Llangollen.
_	She entered into a pact with her husband to alternate their professional projects to take care of their daughter in the hope that a cure would be found.
_	He stayed at school with the hope that he would be eligible during the second semester, but the NCAA never reinstated him.
_	At the disaster camp in Gujarat Madhavan understands that the boys relatives are all most probably dead but due to legal hurdles, the boy must stay on in the hope that his real parents might be traced.
_	Darla, realizing that the baby can not be born and realizing too that she will not be able to love it without a soul, kills herself in the hope that it will bring her baby life.
_	Many of these immigrants settle illegally in the urban fringe with the hope that the government will eventually provide public services.
_	In the late 10th century, the Emperor sent gold and fabrics to a Russian ruler in the hope that this would prevent him attacking the Empire.
_	The museum, founded in 1967, was created with the intention to bring aspects of the Smithsonian museums, located on the National Mall, to the Anacostia neighborhood, with the hope that community members from the neighborhood would visit the main Smithsonian museums.
_	He loses them in the London underground and therefore undertakes a surveillance of the Palfrey residence, in the hope that one of her adoptive parents will lead him to Philippa and thus to the woman he intends to kill.
_	Dutch recognition of Puger was influenced by the lord of West Madura, Cakraningrat II who is thought to have supported Puger's claims in the hope that a new war in central Java would provide the Madurese with a chance to interfere.
_	Boehme expressed the hope that the "new challenge" ("neue Herausforderung") of organizing the event, with support from neighbour churches and the political and social forces of Bremen ("mit Unterstützung der Nachbarkirchen sowie der politischen und gesellschaftlichen Kräfte in unserem Zwei-Städte-Staat"), would result in a win of impulses and experiences, contacts and meetings ("Zugewinn an Impulsen und Erfahrungen, an Kontakten und Begegnungen").
_	As a contingency plan, GAIA created a clone of Dr. Sobeck in the form of Aloy, in the hope that she would find GAIA's message, destroy HADES, and restore GAIA's functions.
_	To his surprise, the Chief revealed that he had been intentionally connecting Roddenberry with television professionals for the past few years with the hope that one would offer him a permanent position so that he could pursue his dream of writing.
_	Count Grog, founder of both SCW and GOUGE, expressed the hope that the old North Carolina title would become a true regional title by being defended in the major "indy" promotions in North Carolina.
_	Ian and Jane are upset to learn about a new lead in the murder investigation but they still plan silence even after Ben is arrested in the hope that he is released.
_	He would pace up and down the goal line and eventually position himself slightly off-centre in the hope that the penalty taker would shoot towards the larger target.
_	The fear of removal from office due to poor performance or bad luck may prompt a leader to instigate a diversionary war he or she might not rationally have started, in the hope that should it go well he or she would stay in power, or at least receiving a surge in personal popularity and patriotism to sustain them in power.
_	In January 2003, Glasgow City Council bought the building just before its CPO was due to expire in the hope that USD would find the funding to complete the restoration.
_	Captain George Tobin of "Princess Charlotte" decided to disguise his vessel as best he could in the hope that he could lure them to approach.
_	He ordained four rabbis before his departure, in the hope that they could continue to exercise the function of ordination during his absence.
_	However instead, he decided to extend the wage restraint policy for another year in the hope that the economy would be in a better shape in time for a 1979 election.
_	He expressed the hope that Han would stay the course and deepen her investigation beyond form into an exploration of light, colour and materials to "create environments in which form, space and time can be seen to be related in ever-changing yet intelligent systems".
_	Cows and sheep were offered to him as sacrifices, in the hope that he would make the grain and the wine grow.
_	After waiting another day and night in the hope that "Dreadnought" would catch up, Mostyn abandoned the chase, fearing that he was too close to the French shore, and that he would be overwhelmed by the combined firepower of his opponents if he attacked alone.
_	Ryu placed the blame for the disaster suffered by Joseon on his own inadequate emphasis on national security, and was therefore resolved to properly document hard lessons dearly paid for, with the hope that following generations could avoid the mistakes that he had made.
_	The existing rigid seal was replaced with a flexible one in the hope that it would maintain a tight fix even under the cryogenic conditions that seem to cause the leak.
_	The festival has also seen success with their Launch program, which is free program open to all students in Southern Oregon, encouraging them to make and submit their own films with the hope that will be selected for a special showcase each year.
_	Vikrant proposes to Mansi soon afterwards, and her father, uncle and aunt all encourage her to accept it, with the hope that it will help her forget Manav.
_	Attempting to build a legal case against the brothel ring, Jason pays to see prostitutes in the hope that one of them witnessed the incident.
_	The aircraft was diverted to Jakarta in the hope that enough engines could be restarted to allow it to land there.
_	At the same time, Adenauer clung to the hope that the "Rentenmark" might still circulate in the Rhineland.
_	Interest has grown in Western countries in the possibility of using this pig in the female line of a breeding program with the hope that they can improve the taste, disease resistance and litter size while retaining the fast growth of Western breeds, possibly using genetic engineering techniques.
_	Initially, Cromwell issued a summons to surrender, offering lenient terms in the hope that he could secure Wexford intact and use it as winter quarters for his troops.
_	He seeks out Takezo Kensei's sword in the hope that it will focus his failing powers.
_	By 1940, senior Nazi leader Reinhard Heydrich possesses the picture and intends to use the photo for blackmail and prevent Roosevelt from running for a third term – in the hope that whoever gets elected instead would be more likely to keep the US out of the Second World War.
_	They quickly move to have their marriage annulled and plan to keep it a secret, Theresa in order to keep Ethan and Julian in the hope that Luis will not murder him for bedding his younger sister.
_	The title, meaning a string of pearls, stands for what Achappa promises his wife; every year he buys a pearl and gives it to her with the hope that one day she can make a necklace of it.
_	An extension of the METI project, it called on the services of local students and craftsmen in the hope that the skills they learnt would be reapplied in the region.
_	When Finland was about to be attacked by Soviet Union in November 1939, Veltjens was approached by the Finns in the hope that he could help with the supply of arms, since Hitler had prohibited direct arms shipments from Germany in order to avoid provoking Soviet Union.
_	Like other oceanic trenches, the Mariana Trench has been proposed as a site for nuclear waste disposal, in the hope that tectonic plate subduction occurring at the site might eventually push the nuclear waste deep into the Earth's mantle, the second layer of the Earth.
_	By the early 21st century, however, the summer population had declined and the diminished congregation hired Rabbi Schneur and Chanie Wilhelm of the Chabad movement in 2007 with the hope that they could attract enough members to make the Hebrew Congregation into a year-round synagogue.
_	Despite the scuffle, Eliza was part of the royal party who accompanied Lunalilo when he sailed to Kailua-Kona, in November 1873, the following month, in the hope that the dry weather would improve his tuberculosis.
_	Picture agencies may encourage such use free of charge, in the hope that the comp image (sometimes referred to as a "positional" image) will end up being used in the final product.
_	""To all those who lead monotonous lives in the hope that they experience at second hand the delights and dangers of adventure"."
_	"aptitude" was created to experiment with a more object-oriented programming design than that used in console-apt, in the hope that this would result in a more flexible program with a broader set of features.
_	The communication ended by expressing the hope that as many registered persons as possible would use this opportunity for increasing their profile with the public.
_	During Sunday, the 14th, and Monday, the 15th, the position was retained, in the hope that the enemy might be tempted from his fastness on the wooded heights, to the open fields below; but finding no indications of a hostile movement on his part, the army was withdrawn, and the regiment retired to camping ground near White Oak Church.
_	The theory was that splake would grow more quickly and mature sooner than lake trout with the hope that they would be able to reproduce before being attacked by the invasive sea lamprey.
_	In a subsequent letter to Harrison, dated 16 November, Mascaró expressed the hope that they might meet again before the Beatles departed for India, where the group were to study meditation with their guru, Maharishi Mahesh Yogi.
_	Plans to sell the property remain with the hope that it can be used to benefit the community by possibly being developed to offer Senior Housing.
_	Celeste Nurse clung to the hope that what happened was not real, or a kind of sick joke and that someone would bring her daughter.
_	In Manhattan, Paul and Cesare rehabilitate a restaurant, with the hope that its reputation will cause Irene to come to dine.
_	Most of his adventures as a boy to catch animals were in the hope that he could capture them and sketch them.
_	Though it was within Polk's power to recall the messenger, he chose to allow him to continue, with the hope that Texas would accept the offer.
_	This is mitigated by reading in large chunks, in the hope that subsequent reads will be from nearby locations.
_	In the meantime, Father Ciccio Spada and the other priests of the "Comunità Piccola Opera di Materdei" organize a provisional dormitory in the small deconsecrated church of "San Gennariello", with the hope that Father Mario convinces the street urchins to find shelter there at least for a night.
_	Peirse ordered general-purpose bombs to be loaded, which could only cause superficial blast damage and attacks at low altitude, in the hope that the attacks would distract the Brest Group as Coastal Command and the Navy made torpedo attacks.
_	The Oilers responded angrily, and a nasty media exchange followed, with the team ultimately placing Souray on waivers in the hope that he would be claimed by another NHL team so that Edmonton would no longer be on the hook for the remainder of his contract.
_	Inquiry based on PAR principles makes sense of the world through collective efforts to transform it, as opposed to simply observing and studying human behaviour and people's views about reality, in the hope that meaningful change will eventually emerge.
_	In July 2008, the UNESCO World Heritage Committee decided to keep the Dresden Elbe Valley on the World Heritage List in the hope that the construction would be stopped and the integrity of the landscape restored.
_	Britain would interminably stonewall the Rhodesian Prime Minister, maintaining the facade of continued negotiation by very occasionally repeating their stance, in the hope that either Smith would back down, or his Cabinet would eventually lose faith in his negotiating prowess and replace him with somebody more malleable.
_	The Paraorchestra was formed by conductor Charles Hazlewood in 2011 as a project to create a platform for the top disabled musicians, with the hope that its success would lead to better integration of the disabled into music and performing arts.
_	Mansell was frustrated at seeing Berger pull away and hounded Senna in the hope that Senna would make a mistake.
_	To remove the ringleaders, in the hope that the atmosphere might calm down, is a step to which there is no obvious alternative."
_	In 1998, league officials decided to change the league format from a yearlong tournament to an Apertura/Clausura schedule, with the hope that it would garner more interest in the league and give a chance for its player to rest between seasons.
_	On May 29, 2008, he began playing in extended spring training games, and in mid-June was sent to play in the Rays' minor league system for further rehabilitation and conditioning in the hope that he might return to the majors during the 2008 season.
_	After three years in this post he broke down in health, and was sent to the college of Bourges, in the hope that change of occupation would restore him.
_	After finding a habitable area and settling there, he named it "" (translated as "Greenland"), supposedly in the hope that the pleasant name would attract settlers.
_	It was as a result of this planned expedition that King Darius III started to distribute money to the Greek city-states with the hope that they would rise against their new hegemon.
_	After a couple whom she knew personally is murdered by Il Mostro, Christiana attends a séance in the hope that it can summon the victims' spirits, and shed light on the identity of Il Mostro.
_	Mavers would later go on to claim that the band had played poorly deliberately during the sessions in the hope that the material would not be released, as they did not gel with Lillywhite from day one.
_	She pledged to stop dealing heroin and only sell hashish in the hope that her daughter would overcome her addiction.
_	The book is sealed in a box, with the head priest expressing the hope that the book will never be read, lest the demon be released upon the world.
_	Many South Americans used the situation to their advantage and claimed that their parents were of Spanish origin in the hope that they could start a new life in Spain or become professional players in Spain.
_	Six months later, the same committee that investigated Carroll's death reports that Frady, acting alone, killed Hammond out of paranoia and misguided patriotism and express the hope that the verdict will end conspiracy theories about political assassinations.
_	The Philippine government, through Presidential Spokesperson Ignacio Bunye has issued a statement to the effect of the government's respect and deference to the authority of the Sandiganbayan, and the hope that this "sad" episode in the country's history will not "permanently distract" the country from peace and progress.
_	Nevertheless many of those townships arranged to get their electricity from Manchester, possibly in the hope that they would benefit from the city's plans to electrify the tram system when the existing lease with the Manchester Carriage and Tramways Company was due to end in 1901.
_	Blasi decides to let the two escape to tell their superiors how ineffectual his force actually is in the hope that the British will not think them worth bothering about.
_	Mirbeau succeeds however in making us laugh at that which should really drive us to despair, in the hope that the spark of conscience will help us to live better, to exercise better our liberty of mind, and to rebel against social institutions.
_	With the TPLEX identified as a high priority government project, the Department of Public Works and Highways (DPWH) was given the task of acquiring the right of way for the project's proposed alignment, and was allocated P793 million in the hope that the process could be expedited.
_	Since the 18th century this has been used as a salutation to offer the hope that a happy day being marked would recur many more times.
_	However, as Brahma told them that nothing could be everlasting, they requested that the destruction of the cities could be brought about by a single arrow only, on the hope that it was impossible for anyone to shoot such an arrow, save Lord Shiva, of whom they were great devotees.
_	The Southern Cameroonian delegation deeply disappointed by the condescending approach of Ahidjo returned home in the hope that the government of French Cameroon would reconsider its stance and open the constitution for amendment that will befit a federated state with two equal partners.
_	In general elections, individuals and parties will often boycott in order to protest the ruling party's policies with the hope that when voters do not show up the elections will be deemed illegitimate by outside observers.
_	Despite his reluctance, Ibn al-Mu'tazz was persuaded by the opposition to assume the caliphate instead, in the hope that he would put an end to the intrigues that had plagued the dynasty for decades.
_	The tree is intended to symbolize the hope that the students will become persons who make a clean and green society and contribute to social development.
_	Having raised £100,000, the Trust lodged the money with the Waterways Trust, in the hope that it could be used as match funding for any grants that might be received.
_	One of his associates, a man named Aelius Gallus, fled to the house of Publius Pomponius, in the hope that his friend could protect him.
_	At his death, Watson bequeathed the 1807 painting to Christ's Hospital, with the hope that it would prove "a most usefull Lesson to Youth".
_	This is immediately confirmed by Ferrando who recounts his brother’s wish to return to his country (Aria: "No, quel di pria piu non e" / "No, he is no longer his former self", and he expresses the hope that "his heart will make him shed a / A pitiful tear from his eye.
_	Willaumez was fortunate to have collected this information before attempting to anchor in Table Bay: Popham had ordered all ships and shore facilities to continue to fly the Dutch flag in the hope that enemy ships would be lured within range of the port's gun batteries.
_	He briefly entertained the hope that the British war against the Dutch would provoke the Russians to enter the war against them, but Catherine declined to act.
_	In an effort to conceal his sin, David summoned Uriah from the army (with whom he was on campaign) in the hope that Uriah would have sex with her and think that the child belongs to him.
_	Tradition mandates the purchase of one okiagari-koboshi for each member of the family plus one extra in the hope that the family will grow over the coming year.
_	It was published "in the hope that it would influence the deliberations in the council".
_	The plot remains largely the same with regard to the French circulating newspapers describing massacres in Ireland by British troops in the hope that Irish soldiers will desert.
_	She gave birth to a boy she named "Mitsuru," with the hope that he would have a "fulfilling" life as his name means.
_	Its main theme was the hope that civil society, not enlightenment or revolution would pave the way for democracy in the Arab world.
_	Highlighting friendships and love and all the problems those things bring, Trying Again focusses on a relationship between people who make mistakes but live in the hope that love will conquer all.
_	Like the other volumes in the series of which it is a part, the book was written primarily in the interest of business men, although the author expresses the hope that it will also prove useful to stock and bond brokers, to lawyers, to bankers and to accountants.
_	The piece was a gamble by Keene, in the hope that the elaborate and expensive scenery of the show, as well as the singing actresses and many dancers, would draw crowds.
_	Trudeau had put off asking the Canadian Governor General to call an election as long as possible, in the hope that his party could recover popular support but it backfired, as there was growing public antipathy towards his perceived arrogance.
_	After Lloyd George survived the Maurice Debate (9 May) with a misleading speech, Gough wrote to Lord Milner (now Secretary of State for War), in the hope that an inquiry into the Fifth Army would reveal the lack of reserves, only to receive a reply from the Under-Secretary that he was "mistaken" in thinking that there had been a promise of an inquiry (it is unclear whether this was an error or a deliberate lie).
_	After narrowly escaping from those individuals, the Oregon begins to track the location of the weapons in the hope that they can seize them once again.
_	On 15 January, Matthias called on the city to surrender, but Captain von Wulfestorff refused to do so, in the hope that an imperial relief force would arrive in time.
_	Another failed insurrection took place in 1933, when anarchist groups attacked military barracks with the hope that those inside would support them.
_	On the other side, Rita was waiting for him in the hope that he would come back and take her back to his home.
_	The overall theme is common for the 1960s: fanciful mythology as the symbol of the counterculture movement, with the hope that true love will be found if ever Atlantis can be reached.
_	She stated, "I thought it was about time I bowed out in the hope that there's one more show in me.
_	It is a penitential song, taking as a starting point reflection of mistakes and rejection by many, but the hope that God who is addressed will accept and forgive.
_	United Nations Security Council Resolution 73, adopted on August 11, 1949, noted with satisfaction the Armistice Agreements between the parties involved in the 1948 conflict in Palestine and then expressed the hope that a final settlement of all questions outstanding between the parties might be achieved soon.
_	Peter said he never wanted to see either of them again and that he was only interested in Betty to make Mary Jane jealous, in the hope that this would bring Ned and Betty back together.
_	In 1906, he joined his friend Anders Christian Jensen-Haarup on a trip to the Mendoza Province in western Argentina in the hope that the arid Andean climate of that region would be beneficial to his health.
_	In 1943 Raybould was sent a score of Britten's Matinées Musicales by Erwin Stein of Boosey and Hawkes in the hope that he would conduct it.
_	The band wrote most of the songs in the Forest of Dean, in the hope that the countryside would inspire folk ideas.
_	These principles were created with the hope that they could be implemented in the counties that comprised the San Joaquin Valley.
_	When "The Tell" was dismantled, it was coded and stored with the hope that it would be installed in a museum.
_	Schillings responded, expressing the hope that the academy could count on her support and her continuous membership.
_	Gabriel and his team tail Sarah with the hope that she’ll be able to identify Ahmed bin Shafiq, the man who orchestrates the many terrorist activities that Zizi funds.
_	It was divided into four administrative districts by the Romans in the hope that this would make revolts more difficult, but this manoeuvre failed.
_	Unable to continue south on the Taconic at Lakeview, she turned west, then north up Commerce Street, apparently in the hope that when she returned to the accident site, she could continue south this time.
_	The LSWR managed to acquire sufficient land near the village of Kingsley (3 miles to the south of Bentley) where it decided to site a station in the hope that the area would attract residential development.
_	Their friendship grows closer, and Danny decides to dress like his friend in the hope that it will help his upcoming appeal.
_	The album's title refers to the hope that Los Angeles will one day fall into the ocean due to a major earthquake.
_	Thoth the first Feitheran leader and a group of Egyptian birdpeople traveled to Greenland and founded Feithera in the hope that they could prevent the curse from coming to pass.
_	A group of mutineers who took control of the other survivors left them there in the hope that they would starve or die of thirst.
_	Wilson saved sufficient money to launch a service in 1898, investing $500 in the hope that he and his wife could enlist 500 subscribers to the service for a dollar a year.
_	In October 1993, Dr. Dzus recommended and scheduled further surgery on November 19, 1993 in the hope that it would lessen the constant pain in Tracy's dislocated hip.
_	Often, these ideas are then fed back to manufacturing companies from these users in the hope that the product will then be produced for them.
_	There was also the hope that transported convicts could be rehabilitated and reformed by starting a new life in the colonies.
_	On 12 December 1983, as a last hope, the doctors decided to inject a new chemical into the pleura early the next morning, in the hope that it would stop further fluid from forming.
_	When it is revealed that Holly’s own developing Stand is killing her due to her lack of fighting spirit, Jotaro, Joseph, Avdol, and the now-reformed Kakyoin begin a journey to Egypt to kill Dio, in the hope that this will save Holly's life.
_	Clyde Lott, a cattle breeder, is attempting to systematically breed red heifers and export them to Israel to establish a breeding line of red heifers in Israel in the hope that this will bring about the construction of the Third Temple and ultimately the Second Coming of Jesus.
_	He mortgages his house and holdings on the hope that he will gain control over ColbyCo.
_	Roma attempts to distract Lingk from doing so in the hope that this period will pass, trapping Lingk in the sale, but well-intentioned comments by the firm's manager, trying to play along, catch Roma in a lie, and Lingk demands a refund on his purchase.
_	The structure is increasingly being used for cultural and artistic events, with the hope that this may help to integrate it once more into the daily lives of the townsfolk.
_	Academic publications such as the International Journal of Transitional Justice are also contributing towards building an interdisciplinary field with the hope that future innovations are tailored for a specific state’s situation and will contribute towards political transitions that address the past as well as establish guarantees for respect of human rights and democracy.
_	He was educated at Oxford, and being a poor man he was, says Wood, 'exhibited to by an ecclesiastical Mecænas,' in the hope that he would write against the heretics.
_	Mansfield clung to office until 1788, (despite not sitting in court for two years) in the hope that the government would fall before he was forced to retire.
_	During 1992 Sergio Rinland and his Astauto team started to work on a 1993 F1 car in the hope that Fondmetal would carry on.
_	A fire bet is a bet of as little as $1 and generally up to a maximum of $5 to $10 sometimes higher, depending on casino, made in the hope that the next shooter will have a hot streak of setting and getting many points of different values.
_	This drink was given to the sick in the hope that it might heal them.
_	While going to work, he kept writing his own script, in the hope that one day it would turn into his first feature.
_	He pays Vicious Circle members to threaten his cousin in the hope that it will prompt Dragon to re-consider his offer.
_	In the hope that a change of venue would improve his health, he moved to Winter Haven, Florida in 1954.
_	She has expressed the hope that other countries will have more open visa policies with Ukraine and establish more student exchange programs, and that Ukraine will attract more international business and commerce.
_	Throughout the survey Roy took every opportunity to fix the position of as many secondary landmarks as possible in the hope that they would be used as a basis for future topographic surveys from which new maps could be prepared for the counties of Middlesex, Surrey, Kent and Sussex.
_	The duo join Khumba on his quest in the hope that their own search for a safe waterhole is over.
_	With each hurdle, Moore offers a lesson on how to overcome it, with the hope that it will inspire kids to aim high and be their best selves
_	Because Kriol is the language that binds all Belizeans together, regardless of the origin of their first language, Leela Vernon translated the song into Kriol in 2011 with the hope that the meaning behind the words would be better understood.
_	Skirmishing continued in the days following the battle, while Burgoyne waited in the hope that reinforcements would arrive from New York City.
_	After finding a toad in Chris' pocket they suspect him, but then they discover that Meg was holding the toad for one of the popular kids in the hope that doing so would secure her a date to the Winter Snow Ball.
_	They then went back home with the hope that they would be blessed with a surfeit of crops in the coming season.
_	The abbot argues a conventional perspective on love: "the abbot predictably complains of unrequited love and pledges his fidelity to the god of love in the hope that the lady, like himself, will be stricken by love's arrow."
_	Es Heopner tells the story that this room allowed for the boys to quickly slip down to the river for a swim just before dinner time in the hope that their mother wouldn't notice their absence.
_	Pitt resigned as Rector in 1935 due to severe Bronchial disorders and moved with his wife to Bournemouth in the hope that the sea air of the South Coast might alleviate his problems.
_	He also shared the hope that an improved fundamental theory would explain why the two elementary particles then known (proton and electron) have quite different masses.
_	The Ginocchio towed torpedo was based on an Italian concept of World War I and consisted of a towed torpedo that was streamed over the stern near a submarine contact in the hope that it would strike the submarine, triggering its warhead.
_	More as a novelist than as a theologian, more concretely than abstractly, I determined to try to describe my own life as evocatively and candidly as I could in the hope that such glimmers of theological truth as I believed I had glimpsed in it would shine through my description more or less on their own.
_	The debtor would be held there temporarily in the hope that they could make some arrangement with the creditors.
_	Rowley repeatedly feinted towards the French ships and then pulled away, hoping to draw them away from Grand Port in the hope that "Bombay" might board the now unprotected "Iphigenia" and capture her.
_	He gradually falls in love with Lachi, with the hope that he can be the husband she never will have.
_	In the hope that the University could pull more events at the facility, the Coliseum underwent a significant renovation in 2005, costing over $24 million.
_	Women taken from their families and placed into boarding schools, such as the Hampton Normal and Agricultural Institute, were moved to accomplish the U.S. federal government's vision of "educating Indian girls in the hope that women trained as good housewives would help their mates assimilate" into U.S. mainstream culture.
_	In 1607, Captain John Smith, one of the Jamestown settlers, sailed up the Chickahominy in the hope that it would prove to be a passage to the Pacific.
_	Her son was fighting on Luzon, and she had walked in the hope that the general would have some news about him.
_	As of 2016, the field is still in flux and vendors are pushing their own marketing term for what amounts to an "AI accelerator", in the hope that their designs and APIs will dominate.
_	It was said that he had bribed the hangman to ignore it and arranged for his body to be removed quickly in the hope that he could later be revived.
_	Reinette tells the Doctor that she had her fireplace moved to Versailles in the hope that he would return.
_	The MURC sought to design and implement an industrial village which provided the best home and surrounding environment for its employees, in the hope that this would achieve the highest possible working efficiency.
_	They embraced this approach in the hope that it would ensure that the bulk of governmental power would remain with the states and not be usurped by the federal government via novel interpretations of its powers.
_	Opened on 16 July 1927, this was one of three stations deliberately included in the timetable despite being sited far from a population centre, in the hope that their location near a bridge (Prince of Wales and Warren) or level crossing (Botolphs Bridge Road) would encourage traffic connecting from buses or other road transport.
_	In February 2016 it was announced that following an agreement between the Royal Air Force and the Royal Air Force Charitable Trust, the venue of the airshow would switch from RAF Waddington to RAF Scampton, with the hope that the airshow will be resurrected in 2017.
_	As a result, subjects were taken through the laboratory in pairs so that explanations could be given to two at a time, also in the hope that one of the two would confidently take the initiative to go through all the tests first, encouraging the other.
_	Darby excommunicated Newman, but Newton allowed Newman to keep fellowship with the Plymouth assembly in the hope that Newman would be restored.
_	In the hope that Giertz would follow his father as a surgeon, Knut Giertz encouraged him to enrol in medicine at Uppsala University.
_	Fearing that Continental Europe would be destabilised and led to war, Britain made an alliance with Prussia at the Convention of Westminster in the hope that a new balance of power would prevent war.
_	With a conventional call option the investor pays a premium for an "option" (the right but not the obligation) to buy shares of stock (bonds, currency, and other assets may also be shorted) in the hope that the stock's market price will rise above the strike price before the option expires.
_	I used to go about being terribly nice and pleasant to everybody in the hope that people would like her more."
_	The government has targeted that Morocco will have 10 million visitors by 2010, with the hope that tourism will then have risen to 20% of GDP.
_	There is no defined core of an information society, it's mostly far-reaching or grasping for straws in the hope that they may amount to something.
_	Unfortunately, some protocols choose to ignore these issues, and simply use very large integers for their counters, in the hope that the program will be replaced (or they will retire), before the problem occurs (see Y2K).
_	Instead, viewpoints are attributed to the agencies, offices, and individuals participating, with the hope that a consensus view will emerge.
_	Ruemayr's alleged plan involved purchasing significant quantities of oil futures prior to the bombing in the hope that the damaged pipeline would reduce oil supplies and drive up the price of oil, leaving Ruemayr to rake in the profits.
_	In many cases, families left some members behind in the hope that they would retain land for the family, while there were reports that a minority of Catholics with links to the communists decided to stay willingly.
_	The NWP supported international efforts like creating a UN commission on women partly in the hope that it would secure the ERA at home.
_	The argument that evildoers should be allowed to live in the hope that they might be redeemed was rejected by Aquinas as frivolous.
_	Dowling pulls out a gun and searches for the intruder before coming up with the idea of shooting and killing his wife in the hope that he can blame it on the burglar, who escapes unnoticed before the killing occurs.
_	In the hope that viewing would increase, an 11-episode season in 2006 was commissioned by the Seven Network.
_	Some parents keep a statue of this gargoyle around their house in the hope that it will protect their children.
_	Although he fails to reach the Blue Lanterns in time to save them from the invading Reach, Kyle is able to lead the New Guardians to fight Larfleeze and Invictus, subsequently learning that Sayd was responsible for turning him into a "ring magnet" in the hope that he would be able to bring the seven
_	He also explained that a special chemistry existed between Aiello, Mantegna, and himself and expressed the hope that the movie would help him to be better known in Europe.
_	Various projects now exist to document the end of the flats positively, with the hope that everyone with memories of the flats will contribute actively to the projects as best they can.
_	The idea is to schedule mobiles reporting higher DRC indices more often, with the hope that those reporting worse conditions will improve in time.
_	Ausländer lived in the hope that writing was still possible, not the least because she derived her identity from writing: "Wer bin ich / wenn ich nicht schreibe?"
_	In July 1917, experiments were made with aircraft slung under HM Airship No. 23, in the hope that they could defend airship.
_	According to the "Saga of the Greenlanders", Gudrid then accompanied her husband on his quest to Vinland, with the hope that he could retrieve the body of his brother Thorvald.
_	It has also been interpreted as a sanctioned site of child abandonment, where parents unable or unwilling to care for newborns could leave the child in the hope that it might be pitied and fostered (that is, given milk).
_	Shackleton decided to wait a few days in the hope that the ice would break up.
_	Muse began their Main Stage headlining performance with one of their most well-known songs "Plug In Baby" in the hope that it would delight the drenched crowd.
_	Additionally, they worked with the Committee on Missing Persons in Cyprus and the Cyprus Friendship Programme to film the documentary "Digging the Past in Search of the Future" with the hope that this could help Cypriots to reach a common understanding about their shared past.
_	The organization has also successfully networked with other Albanian Student chapters across the USA with the hope that one day there will be a national Albanian American Student Organization where students could network and hold conferences across the country to broaden understanding and finding ways to support our community.
_	Pluralism is connected with the hope that this process of conflict and dialogue will result in a quasi-common good.
_	At Whosemoralsarelastix's village, on a high cliff at the coast, Asterix confronts Whosemoralsarelastix with the onion-smelling money, having correctly guessed that Whosemoralsarelastix stole back his own money in the hope that Asterix, to repay the supposed debt, would reimburse him.
_	In "Eclipse", Rosalie reveals her past to Bella with the hope that Bella will choose to stay human and she later joins in the fight against Victoria's army of newborn vampires.
_	These ritual offerings are made in the hope that the sweetness from these cakes will leave a sweet taste in the mouths of the deities and they will bless the people with a prosperous year ahead.
_	Since Bode's law also predicted a body between Mars and Jupiter that at that point had not been observed, astronomers turned their attention to that region in the hope that it might be vindicated again.
_	To try to prevent Debra from further distracting Henry, his tag team partner D'Lo Brown introduced him to a new woman in their corner Ivory in the hope that Henry would not be distracted in their match against the new tag team champions.
_	Many collectors use pieces in their homes, and care for them with the hope that they hold their value or appreciate.
_	However, Shadchan can also be used to refer to anyone who introduces two single Jews to one another with the hope that they will form a couple.
_	Teachers are promoting these learning techniques with the hope that such strategies and skills will stay with their students' for the rest of their adolescent and adult lives.
_	As a result of the loss of the historic building, a group of city leaders held a series of meetings in 2013 to discuss reforms to historic building preservation in St. Louis, in the hope that another "Graham Paper Company" would not occur in a similar loss to the city's historic architecture.
_	She had been a reluctant nominee for the award, only accepting it in the hope that it might help to promote WILPF.
_	A group of backbench TDs began a "draft Jack" campaign in the hope that he would stand for the leadership.
_	Shortly after, Bass attended space camp in Titusville, Florida, and aspired to attend college and study engineering, with the hope that he would one day work for NASA.
_	Laurie has tried to get her life together with the hope that Michael would never come after her again.
_	The Akha call the Swing Festival, "Yehkuja", which translates as "eating bitter rice", a phrase which references the previous year's dwindling rice supply incorporates the hope that monsoons will soon water the new crop.
_	The movement had reached an impasse relying on three hopes: daily demonstrations to force the regime to respond to their demands, encouraging soldiers to defect and appealing to an international audience in the hope that United Nations or United States troops would arrive.
_	Despite the recommendations of the EIA consultants and the fact that livestock rearing has been a key element of their livelihood systems, no provision for livestock or grazing areas were made at the new resettlement sites, in the hope that villagers would sell off their animals.
_	Local cranks will wish him unlimited success in every undertaking, and bear on with the hope that he may again pilot base ball in Rochester in 1893.
_	The "Calgary Herald" mocked the rebels as a "group of farmer politicians who have always claimed to be purer than those of other parties" and yet "<nowiki>[threw]</nowiki> their leader to the wolves in the hope that they may save their own skins".
_	This view stemmed from the hope that education, science and technology would resolve such problems of humanity as slavery, religious discrimination, illiteracy, disease, poverty, war, and other scourges of mankind, and it gave utterance to his hope for brotherhood and equality among peoples."
_	In 1993, Ryder offered a reward in the hope that it would lead to the return of kidnapped child Polly Klaas.
_	Simultaneously, economic concessions were made to Germany in the hope that the overall cost of a German invasion would be perceived as higher than the potential benefits.
_	Pisanki are now considered to symbolise the revival of nature and the hope that Christians gain from faith in the resurrection of Jesus Christ.
_	Alternatively, they may offer allegiance to any of the particular named clans in the hope that the Chief will accept them as a member of his clan.
_	His duties were so onerous – by the 1830s he was hearing roughly 2,000 cases a year – that some Recorders sought promotion to the High Court bench in the hope that the workload there would be lighter.
_	Some of Essex's supporters had commissioned a special performance of Shakespeare's "Richard II" in the hope that the spectacle of that king's overthrow might make the public more amenable to the overthrow of Elizabeth (who later remarked, "I am Richard II, know ye not that?").
_	After one such re-airing in 2015, she expressed the hope that "one day ... instead of a question, there will be an answer."
_	In 1574, a local law was enacted demanding that all unemployed men were to assemble at the market cross each morning at 5.00 am, along with the tools of their trade, and remain there for an hour in the hope that they would be offered work; a bonesetter was hired to treat any men who claimed they were unfit for work through injury.
_	KQIV continued to identify itself as a quadraphonic station in the hope that Quadraplex testing eventually would be permitted.
_	After the Continuation War Virolainen moved to Lohja, but he remained one of the leaders of the evacuated Karelians, and never gave up the hope that Soviet Union and later Russia would return Finnish Karelia to Finland.
_	The band had written the album's intended singles with the hope that they would become "radio hits", and were disappointed with the limited success they received: the first single, "Northern Lites", charted just outside the Top 10 of the UK Singles Chart at number 11, while subsequent releases "Fire in My Heart" and "Do or Die" reached numbers 25 and 20, respectively.
_	"A few years ago we decided to make this project on the assassination of Rabin as a kind of a gesture about memory and even in the hope that sometimes when you resurrect memory, it can create movements.
_	Alexander lays out diamonds and gold in the hope that Moll will try to steal them.
_	Millions of fans signed an online petition with the hope that Fox would continue the show, and as a result 20th Century Fox released the DVD with all 13 completed episodes.
_	Yarrow decided that the best course was to complete the ship in the hope that she could be sold to another navy; she was launched without any ceremony in December 1966.
_	Campbelltown Council rezoned the entire area as industrial in the hope that other industries would also move into the area but for the most part the land remained vacant.
_	After the unexpectedly massive success of Pink Floyd's "The Dark Side of the Moon", EMI re-issued the Barrett-era albums "The Piper at the Gates of Dawn" and "A Saucerful of Secrets" as "A Nice Pair" in the hope that fans would be interested in the band's earlier work with Barrett.
_	He felt he had been forced into this action by necessity, asked for forgiveness and expressed the hope that his achievements would ultimately atone for any offence.
_	The letter was signed by Confederate Major General Sterling Price with the hope that his name would instill fear in McNeil that General Price was nearby.
_	He had his messenger deliver the woman to Li as a gift, in the hope that she would distract him from his military activities.
_	Having a legal drinking age of 21 allows for the hope that drinking would become less reckless and the people drinking would be more mature to make reasonable decisions when it comes to alcohol consumption.
_	His cough returned after eight days; he left Padova and went back to Montenegro in the hope that the country's fresh mountain air would alleviate his symptoms.
_	Without securing administrative permission, in 1976 Maksymowicz and Tobia dug a 4-foot by 6-foot impression in the earth and positioned the blocks, with the hope that it would last the year.
_	Irish independence from Great Britain encouraged the hope that descendants of Irish abroad who had retained a cultural connection and identified with Ireland would resettle there, as opposed to attracting immigrants from other cultures in other countries.
_	The awards were suspended in 2003 due to financial constraints, with the hope that they could be restarted if/when the Takeda Foundation's financial situation improves.
_	The last of these, 54398 "Ben Alder", was withdrawn in 1953 and placed in storage in the hope that it would be preserved.
_	When David unsuccessfully attempts to seduce Marie he plays her "Just Let Me Look at You" in the hope that Bowlly's words will make her understand his desire, while during his meeting with Dr Chilton he recites the lyrics of several Bowlly songs to explain the horror of his ordeal at the hands of his abuser.
_	The argument that evildoers should be allowed to live in the hope that they might be redeemed was rejected by Aquinas as frivolous.
_	Following the merger, the new library board undertook extensive planning for a new facility in the hope that a new central library might be part of the 1999 commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the city.
_	In an August 1992 "Elle" magazine article, McGann said that Golic intends to release the Alien in the hope that he can collaborate with it to kill the humans on Fury 161.
_	The commission was sponsored by the Russian government with the hope that the master farming techniques of the Mennonites could be introduced to Jewish, Tatar and Russian villages.
_	They are usually constructed with the hope that they can soon be redeveloped into a larger building capable of generating more revenue, or simply to hold a parcel of land along a new road or especially a streetcar line while waiting for value to appreciate.
_	The English released Rhys Gryg in the hope that he would start a civil war but instead Rhys joined forces with Llywelyn the Great, and he, along with Maelgwn and the sons of Gruffydd ap Rhys were with Llywelyn in the attack which captured many castles in South Wales in December of that year.
_	The Distribution of Industry Act 1945 prohibited all industrial development over a specific size without an "Industrial Development Certificate", in the hope that companies refused permission to expand in London or Birmingham would move instead to one of the struggling cities of the North of England.
_	The extermination effort was put on hold while individuals were captured and sent to institutions in Australia and around the world in the hope that they would breed in captivity and could eventually be reintroduced to their native habitat.
_	Early on in the film Scully is contacted by the FBI who are looking for Fox Mulder in the hope that he will assist them with the investigation of a missing FBI agent.
_	The British government in principle allowed for a decimal coinage but nevertheless held out the hope that a sterling unit would be chosen under the name of "royal".
_	It was given a flat roof in the hope that commercial development would take place on top, as at Queensway station, but so far this has not happened.
_	Black frequently stumbles upon memories that depict Ramsey as a driven man whose obsession with memory -- presumably due to his mother's succumbing to some form of mental illness -- and the hope that his Pandora device will change the world causes him to neglect his wife Lenore and Grace.
_	The judges (Lord Alverstone, C. J.; and Kennedy and Ridley, J.J.) stated that they came to the conclusion with "reluctance", and said: "We venture to express the hope that some amendment of the law may be made so as to extend the protection of the Truck Act to a class of workpeople indistinguishable from those already within its provisions."
_	Following his second beheading (during which Athammaus noticed disturbing distortions in Knygathin Zhaum's features, despite it only being the day after the first beheading), Knygathin Zhaum was buried beneath heavy boulders in the hope that if he were to come back to life he would not be able to escape.
_	In Mumbai, there have been attempts to put pictures of Hindu gods in places where people commonly tend to spit, in the hope that this would discourage spitting, but success has been limited.
_	However, the hope that this gave us for broader electoral progress was largely unfulfilled."
_	Egyptologists such as Wolfgang Helck, Nicolas Grimal, Hermann Alexander Schlögl and Francesco Tiradritti believe that Nynetjer left a realm that was suffering from an overly complex state administration and that Nynetjer decided to split Egypt to leave it to his two sons (or, at least, to two successors) who would rule two separate kingdoms, in the hope that the two rulers could better administer the states.
_	Bile bear farms were started (allegedly) to reduce hunting of wild bears, with the hope that if bear farms raised a self-sustaining population of productive animals, poachers would have little motivation to capture or kill bears in the wild.
_	Rob's problems went from bad to worse when Kurt, Jambo Bolton, Lucy, and Carol Groves followed Rob on a night's 'work' in the hope that he might incriminate himself.
_	Brian Ashton, who took over from Robinson, intentionally named his playing squad for Six Nations matches in 2007 early in the hope that their clubs would not play them in the weekend prior to a Test.
_	An English knight of 'The Old Code', Bowen, mentors a Saxon prince, Einon, in his ideals with the hope that he will be a better king than his tyrannical father Freyne.
_	Merton sent a copy to Suzuki with the hope that he would comment on Merton's view that the Desert Fathers and the early Zen masters had similar experiences.
_	The composer was thought to be expressing the hope that his operas would be performed in the extraordinary natural stage offered by the Massaciuccoli Lake.
_	The Girondins desired war in the hope that it would enable them to abolish monarchy altogether.
_	Doug Smith was later to admit that he had kept quiet about the feel Petite Etoile had given him in the Free Handicap in the hope that Piggott would choose one of Murless's two other contenders Collyria or Rose of Medina and that he would keep the ride.
_	The intent is to recruit from urban communities with the hope that the majority of the students would return to these communities to practice.
_	Towards the end of the shoot, using a perceived insult as a ruse, Rajappan leaves the set leaving the film half way with the hope that this will destroy Udayabanu's career for ever.
_	He told the court that he would plead guilty to the 12 lesser counts, in the hope that prosecutors would drop the 13th count to avoid a trial.
_	Muslims may also say "dua" in their own words and languages for any issue they wish to communicate with God in the hope that God will answer their prayers.
_	The purpose of scam baiting might be to waste the scammers' time, embarrass him or her, cause them to reveal information which can be passed on to legal authorities in the hope that they will be prosecuted, get them to spend money, or simply to amuse the baiter.
_	On legal advice, the Lubavitch Library obtained a temporary restraining order in the hope that this would resolve the matter.
_	Rose expressed the hope that the message of the play might cause one or two of these individuals to learn something about their own attitudes and to examine those of the society in general.
_	Mareczko was seen as one of the major hopes for , which had been in significant trouble on account of repeated doping cases; the team also signed the veteran sprinter Alessandro Petacchi with the hope that he would be able to help Mareczko to develop as a cyclist (in particular to get stronger on the climbs), as well as potentially leading him out in the sprints.
_	The "saints" and "people of the saints" in turn probably stand for the people of Israel – the author is expressing the hope that God will take dominion over the world away from the beast-like "nations" and give it to human-like Israel.
_	Siv Jensen was chosen as his successor, with the hope that she could increase the party's appeal to voters, build bridges to centre-right parties, and head or participate in a future government of Norway.
_	Faustus persuades Flavia Albia, the adopted daughter of Marcus Didius Falco and a "delatrix" in her own right, to help, with the hope that she could clear the names of the slaves.
_	Familiar with the play, Booth chose that moment in the hope that the sound of the audience's laughter would mask the sound of his gunshot.
_	In Catholic families where all the children are girls it is sometimes given to a new child in the hope that the next born will be a boy.
_	Religion Professor and Presbyterian minister Conrad Hyers finds humor in Elijah's ridicule of "the priests of Baal who wailed and slashed themselves in the hope that Baal would send fire from Heaven.
_	Their plan was based on the hope that archeologists would find remains of the southern end of the Cardo, an extension of the north-south Roman thoroughfare built during the Byzantine era (324–638).
_	The Governing Council scrambled to take an oath of loyalty to Russia in the hope that this would garner them further protection, to no avail.
_	It was the hope that Göring would manage the RFR with the same discipline and efficiency as he had in the aviation sector.
_	Frollo, fearing God's wrath, reluctantly agrees, and adopts adopts in the hope that the child will be useful to him one day.
_	In March 2015 she released a video "The Real Me (Perioral Dermatitis)" talking about her personal struggles with Perioral dermatitis in the hope that "talking openly about it could actually be a big support to lots of other people".
_	He went to Hot Springs, Arkansas, with the hope that the water would benefit his health, but he died there at age 48 on January 5, 1896.
_	Two males and two females were moved from Dvůr Králové Zoo in the Czech Republic in the hope that the climate and rich grasslands of Ol Pejeta, a native habitat for the animals, would provide them with more favourable breeding conditions.
_	After capturing Stark, Killian reveals that he has subjected Potts to Extremis in the hope that Stark will help fix Extremis's flaws while trying to save her.
_	English football was initially behind the plans when they were proposed in the early 1990s, in the hope that it would improve teams' stability and prevent agents from searching for deals all year around, but by the time it was eventually introduced they had to be persuaded that it would work.
_	He still maintains the ambition to play first-class cricket, once his rugby career is over, in the hope that he will be able to fulfil his dream of becoming a double international.
_	His brother and sister introduce him to Kitty McCarthy (Claire Luce), an American heiress, in the hope that he'll marry her and so gain access to her fortune which will help out his family.
_	At the Oakland Medical Center branch, they have created a Serenity Garden that displays many plants native to the community, with the hope that the increase in nature will be beneficial and therapeutive to patients.
_	At this point, Bartlett concluded that the rate at which "Britannic" was sinking had slowed so he called a halt to the evacuation and ordered the engines restarted in the hope that he might still be able to beach the ship.
_	An informal constitution and library board was created before the meeting in the hope that a new library would be created.
_	Two presents the carillon in this tower to Princeton University with love and gratitude and the hope that its bells may ever inspire coming generations of Princeton men to maintain the traditions of their alma mater in the service of God and of their country"
_	I've come to play rock 'n' roll for you in the hope that one day all the barriers will be torn down".
_	She and her accomplice (program director Robert Goldfarb) fired most of the staff announcers in the hope that new talent would attract new listeners.
_	Accompanied by the spirits of their fallen friends, Arthur and Guinevere leave together, with the hope that Camelot will one day rise again ("Vor langer Zeit / Long Ago").
_	Constant feeling of discomfort and dissatisfaction makes the hero rush between the people and do strange things in the hope that there will be a change in his life, that something will happen what was previously unavailable.
_	Instead of using the controller, two leads were touched together in the hope that the motor speed was set correctly.
_	Hayes was persuaded to stay on as manager for another year, in the hope that his Galway team could go one better and claim the All-Ireland crown.
_	This causes the President, (now the "Chairman of the board") to want a new item called "money" instead of the ice cream soda, in the hope that they will have something to store in Plain Awful's newly made money bin.
_	However, he seals Yaddle in a pit with the hope that he can use her as a future bargaining tool but she is soon forgotten.
_	The operators managed to open the swing in the hope that the vessels would pass by.
_	The objective was to launch Zara during the “16 Days of Activism for NO Violence against Women and Children” campaign, in the hope that the message creates awareness to men and women to combat violence and abuse.
_	It is disputed among historians as to whether King Charles did this in the hope that Baldwin would be killed in the ensuing battles with the Vikings; however, Baldwin managed the situation remarkably well.
_	Azimi then made contact with resistance leader Ahmad Shah Massoud, and urged him to seize the capital, in the hope that he might effect a peaceful transition of power, like Dostum had managed in Mazar-i-Sharif.
_	Lighting provided along the Walk of Remembrance plays an integral part in the design as a constant reminder of the hope that lived within the hearts of the heroes – the burning desire that could not be extinguished and eventually led to a new South Africa.
_	Because they were not finished when he wrote his review in , Kamin did not give the North Pavilions an overall star rating; he did express the hope that they would have a more pleasant appearance once completed.
_	Indigenous trees are placed along the Walk of Remembrance plays an integral part in the design as a constant reminder of the hope that lived within the hearts of the heroes.
_	She starts an affair with Henry in the hope that her bisexuality will get her sole custody of Angelica after she separates from Bette.
_	To achieve this goal, the CUP deployed the so-called "Special Organisation" to stage raids over the border into Russia in August–September 1914 out of the hope that the Russians would respond by declaring war.
_	The voice of her daughter ends the film with the hope that Hanna will one day be able to live completely in the "now" and no longer be haunted by the past.
_	Kushal (Rakshit Shetty) is sent by his radio jockey sister Rachana to Kodagu to meet her boyfriend's sister, Ithihasini, in the hope that the two will take a liking to each other, leading to marriage, and thus paving the way for her own marriage.
_	By the late 1920s, Hopkinson was expressing the hope that Stanley Baldwin would be elected as a free trader in order to save the country from David Lloyd George who had left the country open to socialism "and its twin brother, protection".
_	Bamber's lawyers argued that the 26 September 1985 letter to Julie Mugford from John Walker, assistant director of public prosecutions, raised the possibility that Mugford had been persuaded to testify in the hope that charges against her would not be pursued.
_	Referring to the Declaration of the Rights of Working and Exploited People, he said "The Central Executive Committee expresses the hope that the Constituent Assembly, in so far as it correctly expresses the wishes of the people, will associate itself with [the Declaration]."
_	Before the war the intention was to fall back to this position almost immediately, after a concentration phase (the so-called "Case Blue") in the Gelderse Vallei, inspired by the hope that Germany would only travel through the southern provinces on its way to Belgium and leave Holland proper untouched.
_	Similarly, The Earl of Clare, the Lord Chancellor of Ireland, wrote to the Privy Council in June 1798, "In the North nothing will keep the rebels quiet but the conviction that where treason has broken out the rebellion is merely popish", expressing the hope that the Presbyterian republicans might not rise if they thought that rebellion was supported only by Catholics.
_	He had supposedly placed it there in the hope that the Sodders would find it and be satisfied that the missing children had indeed died in the fire.
_	Chin Peng admitted that during the last few year, political progress had been made in Malaya and it was because of that he believed that the time had come when the Communist should come to the meeting with sincerity in the hope that they could solve their problems.
_	In 2008 a petition organised to have Numantia declared a World Heritage Site, in the hope that this would deter the local authorities from developing the area.
_	In his preface to "Architectural Designs" Pullan expressed the hope that illustrated volumes of his brother-in-law's work "would be warmly welcomed and thoroughly appreciated, not only by his professional brethern, but by all men of educated taste in Europe and America."
_	But they usually ate only their most valiant foes captured in battle in the hope that they would gain the bravery and power of their victims.
_	Indeed, a South Vietnamese scholar argued that the intellectuals were "encouraged by the hope that they might use the resistance organization to assemble nationalist elements and to create a force which would actually tip the scales against the communists within the ranks of the resistance."
_	Afshin allegedly encouraged Mazyar in secret, in the hope that `Abdallāh bin Tāher would be deprived of his governorship allowing Afšīn to take over the governorship.
_	It gives us the strength to face a new day and dream about something positive and the hope that something magical will happen to us".
_	The Catholic Church targeted prostitutes for convent life or helped them marry, in the hope that the women would leave their sinful lives.
_	Development of the Cheyenne continued in the hope that the helicopter would eventually enter service.
_	Major had deliberately delayed the election until close to the last possible moment in the hope that a still-improving economy would help the Conservatives hold a greater number of seats, and that voters would be deterred from Labour by exposing the party's policies with slogans like "New Labour, New Danger".
_	The unknown person then mails the potentially infectious matter to the requester, who gives it or feeds it to his or her child in the hope that the child will become ill.
_	This news prompts the Puppeteer Exodus, where the Fleet of Worlds flee the galaxy at just under light speed for the Magellanic Clouds, in the hope that by the time the explosion reaches the Fleet of Worlds, the Puppeteers will have found a way to protect their civilization.
_	Dr Phlox (John Billingsley) finds a way of curing Archer in the past, in the hope that it would undo everything since the Captain was originally injured.
_	Among the count's fellow passengers is Oscar Husson, a young good-for-nothing mummy's boy, who is being sent to a friend of his mother's Monsieur Moreau in the hope that a position can be found for him.
_	Nevertheless, authorities forcefully arrested Táhirih and one of her maids in the hope that she would testify against her.
_	Arnold embarked on his 11th solo album "Sonnet 155" by writing over 30 letters to Shakespearean actors, including Ian McKellen, Derek Jacobi, Pete Postlethwaite, Richard Briers, Janet Suzman and Emma Thompson in the hope that they would provide further inspiration and help turn ideas into songs.
_	To renew the rivalry, the schools agreed to a home-and-home series in which Georgetown hosted Syracuse this season and would visit Syracuse the next season, with the hope that the teams would continue to meet annually after that.
_	Still a novice she was sent to Rennes, in the hope that change of air would improve her health.
_	Lee had to order his hungry men to resume their march in the hope that they could find rations at Farmville, Virginia.
_	Kovel believed that Marcuse and Brown's place in history is uncertain, but nevertheless writes that they gave him the hope that psychoanalysis could be turned away from a narrow clinical orthodoxy and toward emancipatory purposes.
_	Mark Antony is instructed by Caesar to strike his wife Calpurnia, in the hope that she will be able to conceive.
_	The conference expressed the hope that Jewish authors and intellectuals in the Diaspora would help to further this cause.
_	By 8:30 am a request went out summoning all available tugs to the site of the grounding with the hope that they would be able to free the leviathan before any further damage occurred.
_	In 1859, Ramsaeur approached the Kaiser Franz Joseph I, in the hope that these records could be published, but this was declined, presumably because of the considerable cost of colour printing.
_	He requested that his ashes be buried at the convent where he was born in the hope that his mother would eventually be able to find his grave.
_	This planet is camouflaged by a F.A.K.K. 2 beacon and made to look like a biohazard-strewn wasteland in the hope that it will remain hidden from any threat.
_	It is said the county was so named in the hope that this land should become the garden of the West or with allusion to the "Garden of Eden".
_	Turnbull later recalled, feeling the pressure of the Carr Labor government, approached Clover Moore and encouraged her to run as Lord Mayor in the hope that Labor would not gain control of the City of Sydney.
_	Formerly operated by the Bernardine Franciscan Sisters, the Catholic fraternal organization Knights of Columbus purchased the retreat house for the Sisters of Life, with the hope that the Sisters' ministry would "help people from around the world to deepen their spiritual life and commitment to live the challenge of being a people for life."
_	The initial stakeholders for the most part had no intentions of physically making the journey to New Zealand to take up the land, and so in a hasty spot of double-dealing, the company had distributed these claims to the arriving settlers, in the hope that more land could be negotiated from the Maori.
_	Seth a prostitute, so he can lose his virginity, in an attempt to get close to Seth in the hope that he will hear what secret he knows about Mercedes.
_	The first is to simply perform a ring-closing reaction with the hope that some of the rings will form around other rings giving the desired catenane product.
_	He concludes by expressing the hope that with improved and more appropriate care during the dying phase of life, there will be less perceived need for these methods of self-deliverance.
_	He rallied the troops based on the hope that Yuan Shang's second brother Yuan Xi would soon come to the rescue from You Province, thus they have no reason to worry about Yuan Shang's rout.
_	Wingeyer was presented to the provincial government and states with the hope that it would be a large scale farm.
_	"The name was also associated with Ahura Mazda (God of Light)[sic], with the hope that it would brighten the image of these compact vehicles."
_	Appalled, they take her away to bury her in a hidden chapel in the forest with seven silver spikes driven through her body (a burial heard as the intro to the album), in the hope that this will prevent a further resurrection.
_	Joel decides to find Tommy, a former Firefly, in the hope that he can locate the remaining Fireflies.
_	This is similar to the military action taken by enemies of Egypt in later history: for example, upon hearing the news of Hatshepsut's death, the king of Kadesh advanced his army to Megiddo in the hope that Thutmose III would not be in a position to respond.
_	The rearmost of the fugitives having reached the river Sambre, at Charleroi, Marchienne-au-Pont, and Châtelet, by daybreak of 19 June 1815, indulged themselves with the hope that they might then enjoy a short rest from the fatigues which the relentless pursuit by the Prussians had entailed upon them during the night; but their fancied security was quickly disturbed by the appearance of a few Prussian cavalry, judiciously thrown forward towards the Sambre from the vanguard at Gosselies.
_	At the time of the report's release (July 9, 2004), Democratic members of the committee expressed the hope that "phase two" of the investigation, which was to include an assessment of how the Iraqi WMD intelligence was used by senior policymakers, would be completed quickly.
_	After US forces failed to capture Fallujah, they turned control of the city over to Saleh, and his own private militia in the hope that he could restore order to the city.
_	Marie sings about a girl from rural France who is boarding a train to Paris in the hope that she will find work there, despite not knowing exactly what she will do.
_	Goethe himself expressed the hope that it would have "some aesthetic value" and called it a "shibboleth to identify foolish or wicked unpatriots in Germany".
_	He asks Virginia to speak with her, in the hope that she will change Betty's mind.
_	On her relationship with Hemingway, she said "I provided sex only after all excuses failed and with the hope that it would be over quickly."
_	Namokalevu the Tui Naro delegated to his younger brothers Ravonoloa Sega and Josaia Samu; and a man from the Wailoli clan called Bai to settle at Liku with the chiefly ladies, with the hope that the ladies would eventually marry them.
_	In a startling burst of optimism, the last two lines express the hope that a "glorious Phantom" may spring forth from this decay and "illumine our tempestuous day".
_	Many were left at the doors of the sisters' schools and houses, in the hope that they might receive from them some special consideration.
_	He is believed to have articulated his appreciation three times to Asif Khan, his father-in- law, with the hope that he would gift it to him.
_	The conspirators were brought back on 22 November but sentencing was delayed in the hope that they could agree on the level of damages payable to Kent.
_	Verbeck stayed in Wisconsin for almost a year, during which time he changed the spelling of his name from "Verbeek" to "Verbeck" in the hope that Americans could better pronounce it.
_	Supporters of intelligent design have also reached out to other faith groups with similar accounts of creation with the hope that the broader coalition will have greater influence in supporting science education that does not contradict their religious views.
_	He discovers that Druitt is the murderer and so fakes his suicide in the hope that the police will lose interest once the murders cease.
_	Further blunders are made when Avery tries to retrieve Taylor's body in the hope that the film is still among his effects.
_	Instead of linking to PayPal.com, the site links to a convincing duplicate of the site at paypai.com, in the hope that the user will enter their PayPal login details, which the owner of paypai.com can then store and use.
_	The "Crimewatch UK" appeal included a direct appeal to Dowler in the hope that she had run away from home of her own accord.
_	The Attorney-General thereupon expressed his willingness to withdraw the note, in the hope that Fitzgibbon would withdraw the words which had elicited it, and Fitzgibbon disclaiming any intention to impute conduct unworthy of a gentleman to the Attorney-General, the matter dropped, and the trial proceeded
_	The newly appointed Chief of Staff to the Supreme Allied Command (COSSAC), Major-General Frederick Morgan, was directed to conduct military deception operations against western Europe, in the hope that it would tie down enemy forces during the assault on the south of the continent.
_	After giving birth to a daughter, Luciana leaves her baby on the doorstep of a wealthy house with the hope that the little girl will be raised there, but she is instead taken to an orphanage.
_	The Kempeitai took Li to Ipoh in the hope that he would reveal more information.
_	Merkel has defined the main aim of her government as reducing unemployment, and expressed the hope that posterity will judge the success of her tenure on the basis of this issue.
_	Over this period he transported numerous flightless birds, including kakapo, weka and kiwi to Resolution Island, with the hope that they would be safe there.
_	Lacombe only gave Balsara citizenship on the hope that the United States attorney would indeed challenge his decision and appeal it to create "“an authoritative interpretation”" of the law.
_	In the hope that he can recover, his aunt-in-law, Julia (Rachael Stirling), takes him to Llancebach, a remote military hospital in Wales run by Dr. Hal Burns (Julian Sands), known for his unorthodox treatment methods.
_	His letters were sent out to various celebrities and politicians in the hope that they would agree with his views and join his cause.
_	Arnhem was described as "a tactical change of plan, designed to meet a favourable local situation within the main plan of campaign" but the result "dispelled the hope that the enemy would be beaten before the winter.
_	According to the diary entry Zahir was the local elder chosen to thank the Provincial Reconstruction Team, and he expressed the hope that the PRT would ""do more projects, specifically another micro-hydro and improvements for the local clinic.""
_	The Cluny reform was an attempt to remedy these practices in the hope that a more independent abbot would better enforce the Rule of Saint Benedict.
_	Be's own systems, later Apple Inc.'s PowerPC Reference Platform and Common Hardware Reference Platform, with the hope that Apple would purchase or license BeOS as a replacement for its aging Classic Mac OS.
_	Oshima Masao, the "wokou" chief, is not content with defeat, so he bribes the eunuch Tong Dabao, a close aide of the incompetent emperor, to spread slanderous rumours about the Qi Family Army in the hope that the emperor will order the army to be disbanded.
_	In 1982, elections were held for an Assembly for Northern Ireland to hold the Secretary of State to account, in the hope that this would be the first step towards restoring devolution.
_	Leo to act as a consultant for Lassiter's, in the hope that he will improve takings at The Waterhole.
_	Helo that she can't get over the hope that Anders might still be alive, despite the unlikelihood.
_	When the Bear's paw strikes, no-one will remain to nurse the hope that their gold can rule the world.
_	In 1929, under new management, an attempt to rehabilitate the line was made and operations continued with the hope that a new ferry across the Chesapeake Bay to a point on Trippe's Bay in Dorchester County would drive new business.
_	Cleve diverts his daughter to a New Jersey health resort, where he introduces her to his friend Mr. Wilmot and handsome son Hector, in the hope that Clarice and Hector will hit it off.
_	She gave herself the name Sojourner Truth in 1843 after she became convinced that God had called her to leave the city and go into the countryside "testifying the hope that was in her".
_	It was propagation of these issues that enabled Unionist rural elites to win over the support of common peasantry who joined the party with the hope that their problems would be resolved."
_	It is the hope that these students turn this education into increased awareness of the conservation issues facing both these forests and vulnerable habitats everywhere in the world.
_	He left three posts unfilled in the hope that the Alliance for Democracy would also join the government.
_	Dawn was breaking by the time they returned and began the arson attacks, so efforts were concentrated on the coal ship "Thompson" in the hope that the flames would spread to adjacent vessels, all grounded by the low tide.
_	He went on, "Dozens of people who had known the Grand Duchess Anastasia were brought to see the girl in the hope that they might be able to identify her, but none of them could come to any definite conclusion."
_	"The Chronicle" expressed the hope that the game would spark interest in football in the West and opined that "the fever may now be said to be upon us."
_	In deference to the protests of this party Foster's nomination was withdrawn, but a few days later he was put up as a candidate for the Town of Melbourne, when the non-election party nominated Earl Grey, the Secretary of State for the Colonies, in opposition to him, in the hope that his election would call public attention in England to the grievances of which the colonists complained.
_	Additionally, the corrector step can be repeated in the hope that this achieves an even better approximation to the true solution.
_	Land speculators bought local land from the government (known as "entering land") on the hope that it would become possible to cultivate it in the near future.
_	After suffering a relapse, he was taken to Portland in the hope that "the climatic conditions would help to remove the severe strain to his nervous system."
_	Wanting to add some of these qualities to his own game, Danny has an idea: he'll take Samba lessons, in the hope that dancing like a South American will help him play like a South American.
_	Pavle Julinac, however, wrote ""in the hope that the Almighty might be pleased to deliver all the Serbs from the barbarian yoke,"" a statement that sounds very much like a precursor to an ideology of national liberation after many abuses Austrians levied on the Serbs.
_	Desire's intervention transfers the vortex to Unity's granddaughter, Rose Walker, in the hope that Dream will kill one of their relatives, and thus incur the vengeance of the Furies.
_	Lucas and Maggie speculate as to where they will be when the locusts return seventeen years later; both express the hope that they will still be in touch when the locusts return again.
_	After Neuve Chapelle, Loos and Gallipoli, the government was looking desperately for a success and the Prime Minister H. H. Asquith after seeing Townshend's advance was more than inclined to believe in the reports of Nixon and Townshend that they would soon take Baghdad, giving his approval out of the hope that taking Baghdad would at long last give his government a victory.
_	"The Musical Times" wrote: "The excellent vein of humour so apparent in ["Cox and Box"], as well as in the more important "Contrabandista", justifies us in the hope that Mr. Sullivan may give us, at no distant date, a real comic opera of native manufacture."
_	Louis de Rouvroy, duc de Saint-Simon, asserts that her family threw her in the way of Louis XIV in the hope that she would become a royal mistress.
_	The Simpsons helped Johnny by fabricating his past with the hope that it would be less painful than the truth.
_	In the prequel comic to the video game, Hippolyta first appears in Year Two to take her comatose daughter Diana back to Themyscira with the hope that she will be healed.
_	South African Foreign Minister Nkosazana Dlamini-Zuma described the first round as "free and fair" on 3 June and expressed the hope that the second round would be held under similar conditions.
_	The Serb side accepted the proposed ethnic cantonization of Bosnia and Herzegovina (the Carrington-Cutileiro peace plan), as did the Bosniak and Bosnian Croat sides in Lisbon in 1992, in the hope that war would not break out.
_	When he travels to Kenya, she follows him in the hope that he will sign her divorce papers.
_	Women help him reluctantly in the hope that he will marry them and save them from dishonour.
_	It was planning to again open for business in the hope that—as one employee commented—the restaurant would become "just another McDonald's".
_	Burgoyne, running low on men and food, was still in a very difficult position, but he decided to wait in the hope that Clinton would arrive to save his army.
_	Recent ultracold atom experiments have also realised the original, fermionic Hubbard model in the hope that such experiments could yield its phase diagram.
_	This move was made with the hope that the Jaffna Diocese of the CSI would join the federation of the College.
_	Alger Hiss ordered his team to send those documents to the U.S. Department of Justice, obviously in the hope that Justice would indict Chambers.
_	Shimmer is beautiful in the way that a collapsing building is; more beautiful, because throughout it you can cling to the hope that the building will somehow put itself back together."
_	In the hope that delay would bring a different result, Republicans adjourned the Senate for ten days.
_	It is traditionally used to try to combat unemployment in a recession by lowering interest rates in the hope that less expensive credit will entice businesses into expanding.
_	Despite this, the two rekindle their relationship in secret several times, with Rebekah harboring the hope that the two of them will flee her brothers' control and live happily elsewhere, since she has little hope of Klaus giving his approval.
_	The circumstances allowed the Asakuras to spare Yoh and Yohmei raised his grandson with the hope that he would be able to defeat Hao once and for all, thwarting Hao's plans to create a shaman only world.
_	She was a year in another country and moved again to a third Arab country "with the hope that, this time, it'll stick until...
_	He went to Bad Wildbad in the Black Forest in the hope that he might be healed by the southern climate.
_	In 485 Barsauma's political enemies consecrated the moderate churchman Acacius patriarch, in the hope that he would prevent the takeover of the Church of the East by the Nestorians, but Acacius, despite frequent quarrels with Barsauma, was unable to prevent the victory of the powerful Nestorian faction.
_	However, the hope that mental illness could be ameliorated through treatment during the mid-19th century was disappointed.
_	Pym also suggested that Willoughby disembark his men and set fire to his ship in the hope that the flames would spread to the French ships clustered on shore.
_	A related tactic is to quickly re-tag the runner after an unsuccessful tag in the hope that his hand or foot has lost contact with the base after a slide.
_	It aims to develop and advocate nonviolent options and actions in the pursuit of justice, in the hope that this will help break what the members see as the cycles of violence engendered by war and terrorism.
_	The videos include illustrations or photographs, but focus primarily on the emotive performances of the storyteller "in the hope that viewers will use their imaginations."
_	The main objective of NK95, outside the most obvious, the popularization of the 45 theses of the NK95 manifesto, is to galvanize the political life in Lithuania by bringing to the fore of public debate leftist political values and ideas, with the hope that sooner or later the whole political mindset and with it political practice will shift leftwards, given the unforgiving social and political reality which demands a new left approach and ideas.
_	Nile took a sample of Ego's form, in the hope that this could be used to fertilize sterile worlds being considered for habitation.
_	Qureshi had many Ahmadi family members and friends, and regularly encouraged Christians to consider gestures of solidarity with the hope that, somehow, this affection will trickle down.
_	Yukito is last seen leaving town in the autumn and promising to find Misuzu wherever she appears next in the hope that he will someday be able to break her curse and let her be free.
_	Her note closes with the hope that Hermie may be spared the senseless tragedies of life.
_	During test flights over Lake Maggiore prior to the 1921 Schneider trophy races, the S.22 crashed into the lake, ending the hope that it would represent Italy in the race.
_	On the way home, Hyacinth deliberately drops the brochures out of the car window in front of some friends of Delia Wheelright, in the hope that they will see the brochures and the news gets back to her that Hyacinth is going on an expensive holiday.
_	Because of the importance of Ca sparks in explaining the gating properties of ryanodine receptors in situ (within the body), many studies have focused on improving their detectability in the hope that by accurately and reliably detecting all Ca spark events, their true properties can finally help us to answer the unsolved mystery of spark termination.
_	McLeod also confirmed that Pete would not be killed off by the show's Gloved Hand Killer, as they wanted Cleo to reveal the truth about the abuse in "the correct way" in the hope that Pete would be dealt with by the justice system.
_	Both European Union President José Manuel Barroso and U.S. President George W. Bush also expressed the hope that Pakistan will continue on the path of democracy.
_	The Methodist Church instead took a middle path in the hope that the movement could facilitate a "revival within the Church" and advised tolerance and patience towards it.
_	However, he finally supported the passage of the constitution in order to avoid political chaos giving the Asian financial and economic crisis and the hope that many had set on this draft.
_	The performances were later edited into a music video with the hope that it would go viral.
_	Nynetjer decided to split Egypt to leave it to two chosen successors who would rule two separate kingdoms, in the hope that the state administration could improve.
_	Throughout the centuries use of the Maltese language was often discouraged with varying enthusiasm, ostensibly in the hope that supplanting it would strengthen ties with the country which held possession of Malta at that particular point in time.
_	Ultimately, it is the hope that these devices will have the ability to detect changes in human physiology within minutes without the need for repeated sample collection and analysis.
_	The original Eclipse (1764 to 1789), about whom it was said: "Eclipse first—the rest nowhere," was so outstanding that many people named their horses Eclipse in the hope that they had another horse of his quality.
_	Iconic use of the IPCC graph came to symbolise conflict in which mainstream climate scientists were criticised, with some sceptics focussing on the hockey stick graph in the hope that they could damage the credence given to climate scientists.
_	He also expressed the hope that "the European Union would soon follow with its own version of the Magnitsky sanctions."
_	In prison, the government offered him a chance to participate in a human-improvement experiment in the hope that (unlike the six previous guinea pigs) he would survive.
_	Over the ensuing years, the hope that U.S. support of the Chinese Republic would lead to the return of Chiang Kai-shek to the China Mainland never gained sufficient American backing to prevent the unrelenting growth of the Chinese Communists.
_	Ritual will also be enacted just before construction; offerings are placed in the foundations with the hope that the construction will go smoothly.
_	Sima Qian recorded a story that the Queen Dowager and the Zhao Xing invited Lü to a banquet with several Han emissaries where they hoped to find a chance to kill Lü: during the banquet, the Queen Dowager mentioned that Prime Minister Lu was against Nanyue submitting to the Han dynasty, with the hope that the Han emissaries would become enraged and kill Lü. However, Lü's younger brother had surrounded the palace with armed guards, and the Han emissaries, led by Anguo Shaoji, didn't dare attack Lü. Sensing the danger of the moment, Lü excused himself and stood to leave the palace.
_	He also expressed great pleasure at seeing [the flag of Apartheid South Africa] proudly on display ... and expressed the hope that one day it would be seen flying in Cape Town and Pretoria once again".
_	Witnesses reported seeing a parachute drifting away from the falling F-100F, leading to the hope that a pilot had ejected, but when the parachute was located it was determined to be a drag parachute that is meant to be deployed on landing to help slow the fighter down.
_	As a result, orthopedic surgeons have reported that parents of young pitchers have come to them and asked them to perform the procedure on their un-injured sons in the hope that this will increase their sons' performance.
_	As the physical sciences made significant advances, scientific concepts were applied to mental phenomena (e.g., animal magnetism), with the hope that this would help to understand paranormal phenomena.
_	With supplies and ammunition running out, and being attacked from the rear by Japanese forces that had pursued them from Bakri, the Australians were forced to leave their wounded behind in the hope that they would receive medical attention from the Japanese, while the remnants of the 2/19th attempted to reach the British lines at Yong Peng, trekking through thick jungle and Japanese lines.
_	One-name researchers often begin a study in the hope that obtaining a massive data set will give them sufficient perspective to break through a barrier in their own family history research.
_	Grant that we may always be ready to give a reason for the hope that is in us, and to suffer gladly for the sake of our Lord Jesus Christ; who lives and reigns with you and the Holy Spirit, one God, for ever and ever.
_	The success of this project encouraged Fr Willoughby in the hope that his students would have a chance to read for a university degree while doing their theological training: at the time, this was only possible at Oxford and Cambridge.
_	Cryonics (from Greek κρύος "kryos" meaning 'cold') is the low-temperature preservation (usually at −196°C) of human corpse, with the hope that resuscitation and restoration to life and full health may be possible in the far future.
_	"Look Back in Anger" provided some of its audience with the hope that Osborne's work would revitalise the British theatre and enable it to act as a "harbinger of the New Left".
_	Trust also owns the adjacent Hunter's Wood Nature Reserve, on which trees have been planted to act as a wildlife corridor, and with the hope that specialist plants from the ancient woodland will eventually colonise.
_	In the same book, Perigal expressed the hope that dissection based methods would also solve the 1925 Tarski's problem of circle-squaring by dissection.
_	Irfan Pathan who was in awe of the facilities in the stadium noted that "When opportunities are created, and such facilities are in place, there is the hope that cricketers will emerge."
_	When the magazine was needed during a firefight with the enemy, the bag would be torn open and discarded, in the hope that it would later be discovered by enemy troops who would read the text and consider defection.
_	In 1875, faced with starvation among his people, Pocatello led them to the Mormon missionary farm of George Hill in Corinne, Utah, with the hope that a mass conversion of his people to Mormonism would alleviate his people's suffering.
_	The negative examples also include stories in which the protagonist harms himself in the process of fulfilling filial piety, such as Wu Meng allowing mosquitoes to suck his blood in the hope that they would not bother his parents, and Wang Xiang lying naked on ice to thaw the ice so that he could catch fish for his mother.
_	He then embarks on a self-destructive sobriety binge, eventually cutting off his own antenna in the hope that he can move back in with Fry.
_	Although Lenin and Stalin had argued that peace be signed, Trotsky, who was chairman of the Soviet delegation at Brest-Litovsk, won the vote at the party's Executive Committee on 22 January 1918 and on 10 February 1918 promulgated his "no peace, no war" policy: the Soviet negotiators left the negotiations in the hope that pro-peace factions in the German Reichstag would ensure that Germany did not resume the conflict.
_	Despite no longer having a seat, he was appointed to the position of Minister of Forestry in Diefenbaker's pre-1963 election Canadian cabinet, in the hope that he and the Tories would both win the upcoming election.
_	According to Caroline's mother, who was British, all German princesses learned English in the hope that they would be chosen to marry George, Prince of Wales, George III's eldest son and heir apparent and Caroline's first cousin.
_	Under this model, companies or wealthy individuals buy a percentage of a young player in the hope that if his value increases in the future they will make a profit based on their percentage.
_	His mission included strengthening moderate ethnic Germans in the area in the hope that a negotiated solution could be found and a war avoided.
_	Pete tried to find his natural father by using the networking skills of an imprisoned Sicilian Mafia boss Bernardo Provenzano in the hope that "The Don" can help him trace his dad.
_	In the world of outlaw biking, members of a puppet club normally commit most of the crimes out of the hope that they will be promoted up to the "prospect" status within the Hells Angels proper.
_	While the Rebels had an opportunity to destroy the hybrid, Cassandra Spender, they choose to let her survive in the hope that the Syndicate will join them in fighting the Colonists.
_	At this point, a fully working vaccine has not been created, and it is therefore decided that the best thing for the Syndicate to do is to comply with the original deal and turn over the hybrid to the Colonists in the hope that they are spared the resulting takeover.
_	In an interview, Moore expressed the hope that by listening to his music the audience would understand the need to question authority and the information provided to them.
_	For example, Biden stated to a victim of sexual assault at Stanford University, "you did it... in the hope that your strength might prevent this crime from happening to someone else.
_	In Taranaki were laid out as military settlements with the hope that when men were released from military duty they would remain on their allotments and become permanent settlers.
_	She said she took the role with the hope that she would become better known in the United States.
_	He moved to the North Island, and even travelled to the South Pacific islands in the hope that the warmer climate would help, but after some years of illness he died in Wanganui in 1909.
_	On "Birling Day", the crew toady to Birling in the hope that he will give them all large tips.
_	When the resistance advances upon them Edward holds out a single piece of dynamite to ward off their attacks and when they reach the cave he lights the dynamite with the hope that it will seal the entrance to the cave that leads to the surface.
_	For unmarried recipients the apples would be placed under their pillows in the hope that they would bring dreams of their future wife or husband.
_	"What More Can I Give" was scheduled for release as a charity single in the hope that $50 million would be raised between downloads, sponsors, and donations to aid the survivors and the families of victims of the September 11 terrorist attacks.
_	In his first year, Tonelli came third in his age group at Western Districts Club, prompting his mother to send him at age nine to John Keating—a swimming coach who had guided several swimmers to national selection–at the Centenary Pool in the hope that he could improve to Olympic standards.
_	When that fails, she assigns the Feegles to build the King a shed in the hope that it will earn his allegiance.
_	Although heavily outnumbered, the Greek Allies were persuaded by the Athenian general Themistocles to bring the Persian fleet to battle again, in the hope that a victory would prevent naval operations against the Peloponnese.
_	Spindoe falls foul of one of these theories when he panics over a threatening letter, in truth sent to him by one of the Fellows in the hope that he will react exactly as he does.
_	For the five months following the Waco siege, McVeigh worked at gun shows and handed out free cards printed up with Lon Horiuchi's name and address, "in the hope that somebody in the Patriot movement would assassinate the sharpshooter."
_	Drake’s men destroyed church images and ornaments and even erected a defensive palisade with wooden images of saints in the hope that the Spanish soldiers’
_	Bertie does not tell Juan how to interact with the nodes' software, in the hope that Juan will be forced to send a high-powered signal from inside the forest to ask for outside help - not only failing the offline restriction of the exam, but also allowing Bertie to receive data from the nodes and steal Miriam and Juan's project.
_	As a subterfuge Gage wore an orange sash (usually worn by Parliamentary officers) in the hope that if seen from a distance the column would be taken for a Parliamentary one and perhaps if challenged he could bluff his way through enemy lines.
_	It had been the hope that the improvements in the valley's road transportation would benefit the remaining mines.
_	During the Great Plague of 1665, the City authorities ordered fires to be kept burning night and day, in the hope that the air would be cleansed.
_	After several violations, Germany stopped this practice but in early 1917 she decided to resume unrestricted submarine warfare, in the hope that this would starve out the British before the Americans could make any effective military retaliation.
_	In the period after the American Revolution (1783-1812), British merchants and government agents supplied weapons to Indians living in the United States in the hope that, if a war broke out, the Indians would fight on the British side.
_	Carter is sent to interview Carlsbad's niece, Rita Kenmore, at her home in the hope that she will reveal his plans.
_	There is nothing to support bitcoin except the hope that you will sell it to someone for more than you paid for it."
_	Beginning with Frederick Lewis Allen in the 1930s, scholars have followed the Lynds' efforts, producing "hundreds of books, articles, and films examining life in one small city in Indiana" with the hope that their studies provide a "better understanding of modern American life."
_	Berengaria and her father King Alfonso VIII harbored the hope that "Infante" Ferdinand of Leon, Alfonso IX's son by his second wife, Berengaria herself, would succeed his father, although first it was necessary to arrive at an agreement with the Leonese and the Portuguese to annul the rights to the throne of the sisters of the recently deceased "infante", Sancha and Dulce.
_	With the outbreak of World War I in August 1914, his brother John Redmond called on Irish Volunteers to enlist in Irish regiments of the 10th and 16th (Irish) Divisions of Kitchener's New Service Army in the hope that this would strengthen the cause of later implementing the Home Rule Act, suspended for the duration of the war.
_	The series was seen as an opportunity for manufacturer involvement in Australian racing since the 5.0-litre category was the exclusive domain of Ford and Holden under the regulations, in the hope that manufacturers like BMW, Nissan and Toyota who had been involved in recent years of the preceding category, Group A might continue to race in Australia.
_	In January 2014, Three Rivers Council announced that they intend to continue with submitting an outline planning application in June 2014, in the hope that a developer will show interest in the scheme after planning permission has been granted.
_	The story was originally conceived for adults, but Wu decided to aim the film at children in the hope that the film could influence the future generation.
_	Mussolini also mentioned to Italo Balbo his ambitions of capturing British and French territories in the Cameroons and founding an "Italian Cameroon", in the hope that Italy could establish a colony on the Atlantic coast of Africa.
_	A ray of light illuminates Mother-Superior Agnès Arnauld, who experienced on the ninth day of her novena for Champaigne's daughter, Sister Catherine de Sainte Suzanne, the hope that a cure would come for Sister Catherine.
_	Simeulue was once a part of West Aceh Regency but was split off in 1999 with the hope that the region's development would improve.
_	From there, they took the ship to Canadian waters in the hope that their daring act would provoke Union warships into violating British neutrality and thereby embroil the United States in a war with England.
_	The memorials were marked with silence, prayers, songs and presentations on the history of Rwanda; they expressed the hope that the world could learn from this tragedy.
_	Moffat, well-known to Lobengula, was given this position in the hope that he might make the king less cordial with the Boers and more pro-British.
_	In the hope that these may be of interest or service, I have included papers upon them.
_	Like her Irish forebears, she engaged her crisis with good humor and the hope that she'd learn something.
_	The suggestions made by this presumptious youth did not go down well at all with the Order and Vassalli was left with no other option but to enter into league with the Jacobites in the hope that the Maltese Islands would be taken away from the Order.
_	Auer upfront was now holding a two-second advantage over the rest of the field, with the hope that no accidents would occur that would necessitate the safety car's deployment.
_	He had convinced Balmain to forfeit the Final in the hope that the NSWRL would not earn enough money to pay off its debts or be able to reimburse Joynton-Smith.
_	Because the number 6 is considered an auspicious number in Chinese culture, red tortoise cakes are placed on the altar table in multiples of six such as 12, 24 or 36 in the hope that he will bless the people with good fortune and prosperity.
_	America's last great forests are preserved and sent into space inside huge geodesic domes, in the hope that one day they can be returned to an earth that can once again sustain them.
_	He sends Galahad south in the hope that the men of Gwent will come and fight now that they know battle has begun.
_	The arrangement was withdrawn in the hope that the government would introduce a proper legal aid system to allow access to justice for all.
_	When Fort Totten's Castle was restored in the 1990s, the Corps of Engineers was contacted in the hope that they would participate, particularly since the Fort Totten Castle was occupied at one time by the Corps of Engineers, but the military failed to show any interest.
_	Black Canary also discovers that the Joker's CAT scans were modified and that doctors lied to him about his death with the hope that it would cause him to lead a more sane life.
_	To avoid disenfranchising a significant portion of the electorate, the Chief Electoral Officer decided just to carry forward many old voter registrations in the hope that duplications and outdated enrolments would be purged later.
_	Ultimately, Sam is executed in the gas chamber, though Adam remains as a confidant and advocate for his grandfather up until his execution, and he and Lee embrace at the end, in the hope that maybe the ghosts of the past are gone.
_	Coringa consists of the village and one adjacent island, which was whimsically named Hope Island by British officials in the hope that it would be protected from environmental disasters.
_	In 1788, the tide began to turn in favour of the Nguyễn, after Pigneau de Behaine, a French Catholic priest who befriended Nguyễn Ánh in the hope that the young prince would gain power and give special privileges to his religion, recruited French military officers to fight for the Nguyễn.
_	The most important consideration however, was the hope that activities around Muxamba might divert RENAMO's attention from monitoring too closely the movement of the three heavily armed Zimbabwean infantry battalions marching from Chimoio towards the Gorongosa Mountains.
_	Members of this forum met with members of the House of Commons of Canada to discuss digital copyright and related issues in the hope that they will take the concerns of this group into consideration with proposed bills such as Bill C-60 tabled by the Liberal Government in June 2005 and upcoming legislation proposed by the Conservative Government.
_	I even had the hope that a book written honoring him, might be one of the things that might change his course.
_	One individual's response to the awakener was offered in the following apt summary: "We welcomed him with joy and love, in the hope that his service would be for our edification.
_	However, as he lay dying some of the leading emirs decided to invite An-Nasr back to Hama to usurp the throne in place of his brother, in the hope that they would be able to exercise real control under his nominal rule.
_	When the distributors presented the board with the picture on 12 May 1939 - in the hope that Czechoslovakia's occupation by Germany would change the censors' position - it took two weeks to agree to bar it from the cinemas of the United Kingdom.
_	Silas kept searching for his father, And sometimes addresses a random tree in the hope that it's his father,until when, the Wendron Witch mother, Morwenna Mould shows him his father's location.
_	Every one watched Mitchell in the hope that they might guess who he is by looking at him, and while they were gazing they saw some real spit ball pitching that was remarkable for the amount of juice he used to deceive the local batsmen."
_	The plans were reinvestigated in 1917 in the hope that they would increase the striking power of new German subs such as the long-range cruiser-type "Unterseeboote", which were to be equipped with small scouting seaplanes that could be assembled and dismantled onboard and stored in special compartments on deck - but the idea was abandoned as the war came to an end.
_	In the hope that a granddaughter would soften Derby's opposition to their marriage, the Burgoynes returned to Britain in 1755.
_	It is also a custom to eat toshikoshi-soba in the hope that one's family fortunes will extend like the long noodles.
_	Samsung agreed to an expedited appeal of the Australian decision in the hope that if it won its appeal before Christmas, it might salvage holiday sales that it would otherwise lose.
_	He was released in 1905 and Cohen's parents shipped the young Morris off to western Canada with the hope that the fresh air and open plains of the New World would reform his ways.
_	Perhaps it is not entirely surprising the Company acceded to his request with, among other considerations, the hope that it would help spread Christian faith:
_	On 14 June 2010, the "Irish Independent" reported that in 2006, O'Brien spent millions of euro on agricultural land outside the village of Inniskeen, County Monaghan in the hope that it would be rezoned for housing.
_	Gotō named the watch "citizen" with the hope that the watch, then a luxury item, would one day become widely available to ordinary citizens.
_	"You get the impression that Chandan is just having fun with language – chasing it around in the hope that it will lead him somewhere significant.
_	After the siege many of the local emirs cooperated with the Christians in the hope that they would move on and attack the territory of another ruler.
_	The program was constantly evaluated by MDRC, and data from the first two years of the program has been released, with the hope that research covering all 3 years of the program will be released in March 2011.
_	Before that, in the latter half of the 19th century, a road had been built through the village with the hope that it would become a major route to Western Norway.
_	Indeed, one of his major supporters, the eminent Metropolitan of Naupaktos, John Apokaukos, in a letter to the Patriarch in 1222 declared that the Epirotes already regarded Theodore as their "God-sent regent and emperor", and later wrote to Theodore's wife expressing the hope that he might be able to assist at their imperial coronation at Thessalonica.
_	His only option was to call a Parliament in the hope that it would cement his position by general recognition of the ruling class and by raising new taxes to pay the arrears owed to the Army.
_	Joe Maddon had called in Cubs closer Wade Davis to get the last out of the seventh inning and kept him in to pitch the eighth and ninth in the hope that he would get a seven-out save, an unusually long outing for him.
_	As chairwoman of the Assembly Insurance Committee, Farragher proposed legislation in June 1992 that would allow drivers to purchase no-frills insurance, that would be available with annual premiums as low as $250, in the hope that it would allow the estimated 500,000 uninsured drivers in New Jersey to have access to affordable coverage for their vehicles.
_	An expert noted for his narrative skills, he explained that he began "to write for a broader audience in the hope that my efforts to explain Russia's past may enable readers to better understand Russia's present.".
_	Hence, his friends plan to keep him in their company, enact a drama till he ties the wedding knot, with the hope that he would get back his memory soon, while covering Prem's disorder from everyone else.
_	Despite the lack of records in more than three decades, it is rated as critically endangered (rather than extinct) by the IUCN in the hope that a small undiscovered population remains.
_	These tortoise cakes are sometimes made larger than usual in the hope that the child will grow up big and healthy.
_	The "Glee" role initially had her as a guest star, in the hope that she could become a regular in the future.
_	Instead of accepting him as a suitor, Chloe travels into London with the hope that she will win a 10,000 pound lottery prize.
_	In 1920 Crown Prince Hirohito, later Emperor, also visited Great Britain, experienced Scouting first hand and expressed the hope that Scouting would develop fully in Japan and join the world movement.
_	I decided to stay behind and assist in the prosecution of the war, both for the sake of my friendship with Colonel Ojukwu and in the hope that having assisted to fight back the Northern threat to Biafra, he would assist me with troops to rid the Mid-West and Lagos of the same menace.
_	On 12 August, 178 drivers, firemen and fitters handed in their notices, sick of the injustices and financial penalties being inflicted on them and in the hope that Gooch would be forced to resign.
_	A Moroccan Government spokesman said that "India has been extraordinarily patient and a non-violent country has been driven to violence by Portugal"; while Tunisia's Secretary of State for Foreign Affairs of Tunisia, Sadok Mokaddem expressed the hope that "the liberation of Goa will bring nearer the end of the Portuguese colonial regime in Africa."
_	The commemoration at UNESCO itself took place on 6 September 2007; UNESCO issued a medal in Rumi's name in the hope that it would prove an encouragement to those who are engaged in research on and dissemination of Rumi's ideas and ideals, which would, in turn, enhance the diffusion of the ideals of UNESCO.
_	In 1838, weakened by pulmonary tuberculosis, Marie left for Pisa with the hope that the more favourable climate would help her to a cure.
_	Then comes a more explicit hint, as Pushkin voices the hope that the Finnish waves will not ‘disturb great Peter’s ageless sleep’.
_	He is shocked to learn that she left Michael in the hope that he would marry Miriam so that he could have children.
_	They would eat their seed corn, sacrificing next year's crop in the hope that more seed could be found.
_	Despite being on the football club's list, cricket initially remained Keath's primary focus season, with Adelaide's recruitment of him in the hope that he would switch to football at the end of the 2015-16 summer season.
_	A non-credible threat is made on the hope that it will be believed, and therefore the threatening undesirable action will not need to be carried out.
_	In 1902 an American newspaper alleged that Lord Arthur Somerset, having learned in some way that 19 Cleveland Street was under police surveillance and that he may have been identified as a visitor, contrived to bring the prince to the house on an innocent pretext in the hope that the police, seeing him cross the threshold, would be afraid to take the case any further.
_	With her active participation, December 12, 1995 was adopted by the UN General Assembly Resolution №50/80, which expressed the hope that "the status of permanent neutrality of Turkmenistan will contribute to the strengthening of peace and security in the region."
_	However, the Wilkes appreciated that such scholarships were really intended for talented children from less well-off families, and provided places at significantly reduced fees for deserving cases, in the hope that they would attain these scholarships.
_	Near the end of the musical there is a contest where the princesses of the land are to sing for Eric, in the hope that one of them will have the voice of the girl who saved his life.
_	Mort and Ysabell travel to Keli's palace, where the princess and Cutwell have organised a hasty coronation ceremony in the hope that Keli can be crowned queen before the alternate reality is destroyed.
_	He decides to add more estrogen to the mixture in the hope that it will prove less dangerous.
_	They co-wrote the book with the hope that Japanese teenagers would get a basic grounding and become interested in constitutional discourse, since despite the voting age in Japan has been lowered to 18 years old, education on the matter is considered lacking.
_	Coid was injured just before the start of the 2009–10 season, and by October 2009 had started light training with the hope that by the end of November he would be playing a full part in training sessions.
_	Muir died he expressed the hope that "some compensating good must follow" from the Raker Act.
_	King, the Canadian prime minister, quickly agreed "in the hope that such a visit would aid in some measure in throwing light on the present uncertainty and in establishing more friendly relations between the Government of France and the British Commonwealth".
_	Lord Rowallan, as Chief Scout of The Boy Scouts Association, opened the Indaba, expressing the hope that it would be looked upon as an historic occasion in the story of Scouting.
_	Agnes did her best to make her family appear favourable towards the royals, in the hope that Robert would consider a Durazzo match for Maria.
_	However, some activists are calling for "an all-out legal assault on "Roe. v. Wade"", seeking the enactment of laws defining legal personhood as beginning at fertilization or prohibiting abortions after a fetal heartbeat is detectable at six to eight weeks in the hope that court challenges to such laws would lead the Supreme Court to overturn "Roe v. Wade".
_	When Almodóvar was eight years old, the family sent him to study at a religious boarding school in the city of Cáceres, Extremadura, in western Spain, with the hope that he might someday become a priest.
_	Henderson was appointed in the hope that he might befriend Hitler and thus help to moderate the latter's behaviour towards Britain.
_	This offensive took place at French request, in the hope that the Germans would transfer more units to the East after their attack on Verdun.
_	He expressed the hope that the City Council "might approve of giving it a fair trial for this purpose ... before appropriating it for any other use".
_	Sanjay's solicitor manages to get him released and tells him they have no real evidence and were holding him in the hope that he would confess.
_	Although the election was boycotted by the Mujahideen, the government left 50 of the 234 seats in the House of Representatives, as well as a small number of seats in the Senate, vacant in the hope that the guerillas would end their armed struggle and participate in the government.
_	In 1635 Cardinal Richelieu sought to attract the attention of Louis XIII to her in the hope that she might counterbalance the influence exercised over him by Marie de Hautefort.
_	In addition to granting Palestine "non-member observer state status", the draft resolution "expresses the hope that the Security Council will consider favorably the application submitted on 23 September 2011 by the State of Palestine for admission to full membership in the United Nations, endorses the two state solution based on the pre-1967 borders, and stresses the need for an immediate resumption of negotiations between the two parties."
_	Despite their promises to settle the issue of the Hungarians in Slovakia, in 1948 Czech and Slovak ruling circles still maintained the hope that they could deport the Hungarians from Slovakia.
_	Stein then approached Celtic chairman Bob Kelly, ostensibly to ask his advice about the offer from Wolves, but in the hope that he would be offered the Celtic job instead.
_	The name Nitlapan is a Nahuatl word for “time to sow” and evokes the hope that the work of the institute will be fruitful.
_	Sing a song full of faith that the dark past has taught us,Sing a song full of the hope that the present has brought us;Facing the rising sun of our new day begun,Let us march on till victory is won.
_	In the hope that an undiscovered population remains, it is listed as Data Deficient by the IUCN.
_	So, with the hope that he can sniff out their pan and the traitors (and not get killed like their first spy), the government sends out Chow Tien (John Lui) to investigate and spy on the visiting Russian General, Tolstoy (Roy Horan), and his lackeys.
_	Vijay’s mother tells him that she is of the hope that Vijay will marry Kanchana and reunite both families.
_	As a consequence on 3 February, Major General Chauvel was forced to order the cessation of Allied bombing in the hope that retaliations would also cease, so that the work on the rail line and pipeline could continue.
_	Andrew Murray of Harvard University expresses the hope that such an approach "will save us from the era of "one graduate student, one gene, one PhD".
_	The judge Emile Henry Lacombe, of the Southern District of New York, only gave Balsara citizenship on the hope that the United States attorney would indeed challenge his decision and appeal it to create "“an authoritative interpretation”" of the law.
_	With a two-thirds majority needed to gain the Democratic presidential nomination, Willkie and others tried to deadlock the convention in the hope that it would turn to Baker.
_	The Bathurst Board consequently announced its intention to have the tower raised by approximately forty feet (12m) in the hope that, in future, Captain Butcher would not be "put to the inconvenience of sending his own children as messengers to arouse the Brigade".
_	With his now superior numbers, Jourdan decided to defend the line of the Lahn in the hope that he could keep the Archduke's army occupied, and prevent him from turning south to attack Jean Victor Moreau's army in the Black Forest.
_	Bligh ordered Hamilton to separate in the hope that he could escape without the slower "Alexander", Hamilton adjusting his course to a more northerly direction.
_	She leaves him a scrapbook with money hidden inside as "a picture of your good friend Mr. Franklin from the bank" in the hope that Billy can use it to help him escape.
_	This was usually done in the hope that the liege lord could defend his estate better in the event of a dispute in the field or at court.
_	Some clinicians may attempt to defibrillate fine V-fib in the hope that it can be reverted to a cardiac rhythm compatible with life, whereas others will deliver CPR and sometimes drugs as described in the advanced cardiac life support protocols in an attempt to increase its amplitude and the odds of successful defibrillation.
_	The rearmost of the fugitives having reached the river Sambre, at Charleroi, Marchienne-au-Pont, and Châtelet, by daybreak of 19 June 1815, indulged themselves with the hope that they might then enjoy a short rest from the fatigues which the relentless pursuit by the Prussians had entailed upon them during the night; but their fancied security was quickly disturbed by the appearance of a few Prussian cavalry, judiciously thrown forward towards the Sambre from the Advanced Guard at Gosselies.
_	In 1688, while attempting to flee to France, James II destroyed his Great Seal, apparently by throwing it into the River Thames in the hope that the machinery of government would cease to function.
_	He then tried to remove incendiary bombs from under the bomb bay in the hope that he could prevent a bomb from exploding, but it detonated and he lost his right arm as a result.
_	After capturing the destroyed oilfield at Tarakan from the Allies in the Battle of Tarakan, the Japanese force—the Sakaguchi Detachment (named for its commander, Major General Shizuo Sakaguchi)-moved on to Balikpapan with the hope that the oilfields there had not been destroyed.
_	While celebrating the victory, Thomas enters his room to discover Pandora sitting on his bed in her underwear, in the hope that he will take her virginity.
_	It was characterized by the hope that al-Nahda (Arab Renaissance) and enlightenment would allow the region catch up with more developed nations.
_	The next day, George meets Yukari at her school and takes her for a haircut by a friend at his institution as well as a trip to a fabric store with the ParaKiss members all in the hope that she might change her mind.
_	They flee the police through Mexico, trying to get to New York in the hope that Mohinder can cure her.
_	The Royal Navy had purchased "Bethia" for a single mission in support of an experiment: the acquisition of breadfruit plants from Tahiti, and the transportation of those plants to the West Indies in the hope that they would grow well there and become a cheap source of food for slaves.
_	I intend to file for nomination to the U.S. Senate with the hope that Montana will send new blood with a fresh outlook to Washington to best represent all Montanans."
_	After discovering that Rob is actually alive, the police publicise the disappearance of Tracy and Amy on television, in the hope that they will lead them to Rob.
_	They express the hope that the war will not last long, and they soon return home.
_	She revealed the story behind her songs, her journeys into psychosis and depression, and the hope that emerges from the other side.
_	This broad range of activity disqualified it as a specific antibiotic that could be used in the treatment of infectious diseases, however the hope that it could be used as an anti-cancer drug remained.
_	The reasoning behind implementing a fat tax is the hope that people will avoid risky dietary behaviours, improving health outcomes in society.
_	Currently there is a concerted drive to encourage economic development in the district seat, in the hope that it will become an economic hub.
_	The court-appointed attorney advised a "guilty" plea in the hope that, since it was Turner's first offense, he would likely be sentenced to probation.
_	Later, Sinuhe is brought before his old friend for preaching the same ideals Akhnaton believed in, and is sentenced to be exiled to the shores of the Red Sea, where he spends his remaining days writing down his life story, in the hope that it may be found by Thoth or his descendants.
_	Chloe vows to keep the Watchtower Jimmy gave her as a wedding gift open, in the hope that all lost heroes—namely Oliver and his team—will find their way home.
_	"An Appeal to the Christian Women of the South", published by the American Anti-Slavery Society, is unique because it is the only written appeal made by a Southern woman to other Southern women regarding the abolition of slavery, written in the hope that Southern women would not be able to resist an appeal made by one of their own.
_	New York regulation has "allowed consumers and businesses to choose their own supplier" of gas and electricity, in the hope that this will lower retail prices, as well as to spur the development of "more innovative products."
_	Thangaraj and Krishnan accept for the dowry with the hope that Sivaraman will provide the money.
_	To remedy the problem, psychological studies have been completed to ascertain how nurses feel about their career in the hope that they can determine what is preventing some nurses from keeping the profession as a long-term career.
_	The music is an attractive virtue, and reawakens the hope that some day Composer Chapin will have a really good book to work with."
_	Theater critic Karen Jean Martinson stated in her review, "As the characters sounded the battle cry in the final moments of the play, I felt the urge to yell out in solidarity with them, with the hope that we can forge such bonds across the lines that currently divide us".
_	With the hope that a good transport route from the Tyrone coalfields to Dublin could result in the city becoming self-sufficient in coal, rather than having to rely on imports from Great Britain, which were often intermittent, the canal was approved by the Commissioners.
_	During the mid-1950s features were released to television in the hope that they would broaden sponsorship and help distribution of network programs.
_	At Chen Jian’s suggestion, she buys a holiday package for Shuhui and family, in the hope that they would spend quality time together.
_	Shane enjoyed swimming and Max entered him into an Under-12s swimming team in the hope that Shane would make it to the Olympics one day.
_	The Doctor also expresses a desire to see "the final end" of the Daleks — a direct quotation from "The Evil of the Daleks" (1967), when his second incarnation expresses the hope that the Daleks have finally been destroyed for good.
_	In the June 2016 Democratic primary election–the real contest in this heavily Democratic district–Rangel supported State Assemblyman Keith L. T. Wright, expressing the hope that an African American would continue to represent the district.
_	At the invitation of Tsun’s mother, Ying goes to teach Latin dance at a local community center, in the hope that she can save up enough money for further studies abroad.
_	Adams told Alexander that "the president of the United States had desired him to express the hope that his mission would be considered as a proof of respect for the person and character of his majesty, as an acknowledgment of the many testimonies of good-will he had already given to the United States, and of a desire to strengthen commercial relations between them and his provinces."
_	At the opening ceremony, Forestry Minister Zulkifli Hasan expressed the hope that the Botanical Garden would rival Gardens by the Bay in Singapore.
_	Billy Cassidy visits St. John's Hospital in the hope that his paramedic girlfriend, Judy Moskowitz, has returned.
_	There was no 2004 season due to poor ratings from the third and fourth seasons but the show was revived in 2005 with the hope that ratings would again return.
_	Students report working hard in high school in hopes of earning scholarships and the hope that parents will pay the college costs not covered by scholarships.
_	For Parsons, the only option is acceptance and the hope that transcendence is still possible in this day and age.
_	If this was the case then Luke is trying to use Jesus' rebuttals and teachings to break down Theophilus' Sadducean philosophy, maybe with the hope that Theophilus would use his influence to get the Sadducees to cease their persecution of the Christians.
_	She moves their holiday quickly to Rome in the hope that Clara will soon forget Fabrizio.
_	In May 1941, Daniels testified in U.S. district court that he had perjured himself before the grand jury investigating a link between Atlantic City numbers bankers in the hope that he could resume the numbers business after his release.
_	They explained the terrible pay and working conditions that they suffered and the hope that a vote would enable women to challenge the status quo in a democratic manner.
_	However, they decided in late 1939 or early 1940 to instead all join the local Irish Republican Army (IRA), in the hope that this would reinvigorate it, and that its name and tradition would prove useful.
_	Britain courted Shishakli during the early period of his rule in the hope that Syria would join plans for a British-led Middle East Defence Organization.
_	The Qing commander in Liangjiang Province released 16 British prisoners with the hope that a ceasefire could be reached, but poor communications led both the Qing and the British to reject any overtures at peace.
_	The final novel, "Aunt Jane's Nieces in the Red Cross," was originally published in 1915, when the United States was still neutral in World War I; the nieces treat the wounded of both sides, and express the hope that the War will soon be over.
_	The Commission was aware however that the government wanted a fairly early report, rather than an exhaustive inquiry, in the hope that this itself would help to quell crofter agitation.
_	Meeting at the launch, they decide the best thing to do is to show the queen and the emperor the universe outside Zahir in the hope that they will then understand the peril they are in.
_	He continues to tell her about a boy from the Village who has blue eyes, is around her age, and is not injured in any way (alluding to Jonas from "The Giver") in the hope that will entice her to come with them.
_	The person perpetuating the scam calls the victim via a robodialer or similar means, sometimes at odd hours of the night, then hangs up when the phone is answered with the hope that they will be curious enough to call the number back.
_	The Royal Marines Annual Football Competition began in 1928, following the presentation of a challenge cup – the USMC Challenge Trophy – to the Corps of Royal Marines, from the United States Marine Corps (USMC), in the hope that the cup would be competed for by RM association football teams.
_	Captain George Tobin of "Princess Charlotte" decided to disguise his vessel as best he could in the hope that he could lure them to approach.
_	Around the start of the 20th century, the increasing range of naval engagements, as demonstrated by the Battle of Tsushima, prompted the introduction of the first camouflage, in the form of some solid shade of gray overall, in the hope that ships would fade into the mist.
_	In 1956 Parliament approved a major upgrade to the mining facilities, which would cost NOK 20 million, in the hope that production could reach 200,000 tonnes.
_	This prima facie taboo on the consumption of animal products is also brought to bear on the issue presented by those who entertain the idea of genetically engineering animals in the hope that doing so might reduce their capacities to feel pain or to suffer.
_	However, since Forbesii is a prince and she is just his maid, Sage does her utmost to be of service to Forbesii in the hope that she can stay in his service after he marries his fiancée, Ai.
_	"with the hope that the Chinese-Argentine friendship"
_	The daughter of Gold Root and Moon Scent, they named her Ah Chao, or Beckon, short for "Beckon for Brother, in the hope that a boy would follow in her wake."
_	David is unhappy and begins misbehaving in the hope that they will get back together.
_	Kutsenko plays Aye-Aye, who comes to the Crimea every summer to meet old friends in the hope that it will return his lust for life.
_	Once it was put down, Benjamin and Davis were in a quandary about what to do about its leader, William "Parson" Brownlow, who had been captured, and eventually allowed him to cross to Union-controlled territory in the hope that it would cause Lincoln to release Confederate prisoners.
_	Landais initially attempted to appease Richard, but later switched his support to Henry in the hope that he would overthrow Richard, thus producing an alliance between England and Brittany.
_	Some villages construct bee gums with the hope that a colony will nest there and their honey subsequently harvested.
_	The Sheene family moved to Australia in the late 1980s, in the hope that the warmer climate would help relieve some of the pain of Sheene's injury-induced arthritis, settling in a property near the Gold Coast.
_	On their wedding day, a drunken Sam grows frustrated and smashes up Den's grave and digs up his body in the hope that Chrissie will be sent down for his death.
_	With so many teachers, the school had trouble making ends meet, and in 1879 the Bethlehem elders sent a second principal, the Rev. Jesse Blickensdorfer, to replace the first, in the hope that he could make the school profitable.
_	The group was mainly used to introduce young players to futsal in the hope that more footballers will pursue this sport.
_	MPT also offers an internship program in the hope that younger demographics will become involved and gain knowledge and practical skills in nonviolent peacemaking; TPNI; the work being done in the larger, worldwide peace community; and the operations of nonprofit, grassroots organizations.
_	The mission would have carried a re-entry communications experiment, which involved injecting water into the plasma sheath surrounding the spacecraft on reentry, in the hope that it would disrupt the sheath enough to allow radio communications; this was later flown on Gemini 3.
_	Despite the option to board the DHARMA submarine and "go back to the real world", the survivors from 2004 stay on the island together in the hope that they can somehow return to the time that they knew.
_	After three seasons he joined Lille OSC in the summer of 2009, signing amateur terms to play with the B side still in Championnat de France Amateur, but with the hope that he could progress into the professional group..
_	The Macdonalds rented Bellevue from Charles Hales in the hope that the fresh air of what were then the outer suburbs of Kingston would assist in Isabella's recovery.
_	They were also encouraged by the friendly relations between Nazi Germany and Bulgaria, and by the hope that after the German army swept through the Bulgarian one succeed it.
_	Also when children with congenital (infantile) strabismus (e.g. infantile esotropia) receive strabismus surgery within the first few years or two of their life, this goes along with the hope that they may yet develop their full potential for binocular vision including stereopsis.
_	Reversible MAOIs were developed in the hope that they would exert efficacy in depressive disorders but with less of the toxicity of the older irreversible compounds; moclobemide's discovery and marketing brought the renewed interest in MAOIs due to an absence of dangerous tyramine food interactions and potent antidepressant effects.
_	They were accompanied by some Byzantine troops under Tatikios, and still harboured the hope that Alexios would send a full Byzantine army after them.
_	The other sons of Anh Tông all died at a young age so the Emperor had his relative and important figure of the Trần clan, Trần Nhật Duật, raise Trần Mạnh in the hope that he would survive and began a key figure in the family.
_	Merry, assigned to solve the murders by her aunt, Queen Andais, opts to bring in human forensics in the hope that science might be able to succeed where magic has so far failed - and bring a murderer to justice.
_	Cryonics (from Greek κρύος 'kryos-' meaning 'icy cold') is the low-temperature preservation of animals and humans who cannot be sustained by contemporary medicine, with the hope that healing and resuscitation may be possible in the future.
_	Filled with guilt May attempts to help Chun Tung understand Chloe in the hope that in doing so he can come to love the real Chloe and not the illusion presented to the world.
_	Unionist MPs expressed the hope that Beattie's membership of Parliament would be kept by a special Bill if he was found disqualified, as had been passed in the case of other MPs.
_	Shortly before a planned police raid was carried out on the bar, Brennan learned that Daniel was meant to sign for another delivery containing smuggled diamonds, so he told Amber's father, Constable Matt Turner (Josef Brown) in the hope that he could help.
_	Animals are sacrificed as part of the Hindu festival, with the hope that the sacrifice will lead to the fulfillment of wishes by the goddess.
_	More recently, interest has grown in Western countries for the possibility of using this pig in the female line of a breeding program with the hope that they can improve the taste, disease resistance and litter size while retaining the fast growth of Western breeds, possibly using genetic engineering techniques.
_	Spee ordered the light cruisers to detach and flee while "Scharnhorst" and "Gneisenau" turned on their pursuers, in the hope that he could cover their escape.
_	In the hope that she could eventually be identified by a DNA match with any living relatives, the body was exhumed in September 2005 to extract DNA.
_	Referring finally to relations between France and England, Poincaré expressed the hope that these would continue to be as cordial as heretofore, even should the two countries find themselves obliged to differ on any point.
_	One body was sent to a museum in the hope that research on how the environment affected its preservation would help unravel Ötzi's past.
_	The activity of the resistance groups was directly linked to the hope that "the Americans are coming".
_	Tal is shattered at first, but recovers in the hope that he might publish more, and will be "fully recognized after his death".
_	The Japanese professors were "astonished" by the "enthusiasm" which the students wrote their essays on these subjects as the students expressed the hope that the "wangdao" was a uniquely Asian solution to the problems of the modern world, and that Manchukuo represented nothing less than the beginning of a new civilization that would lead to a utopian society in the near-future.
_	Based on these representations, the Assyrians of Hakkari, under their Mar Shimun XXIX Benjamin and the Assyrian tribal chiefs "decided to side with the Allies, first with Christian Russia, and next with the British, in the hope that they might secure after the victory, a self-government for the Assyrians."
_	The Preamble to the statute expressed the hope that the decimal currency could "...hereafter be advantageously made common to all the Provinces of British North America, as being simple and convenient in itself, and well calculated to facilitate their commercial intercourse with other parts of this continent".
_	Christine feels responsible and blames herself for passing on the murderous "bad seed" gene to her child, yet clings to the hope that Rhoda might have killed
_	The six senior counties were all guaranteed a minimum of five competitive games, with the hope that standards all round would improve as a result of all the extra matches.
_	The opening of the convention was delayed until 10 January, partly in the hope that more Protestant princes would decide to attend in person.
_	It had recently adopted an experimental policy of sending lay preachers with practical skills to new missions, with the idea of bringing native peoples the benefits of English culture and religion – and the hope that men who could make their living from a trade might be welcomed by indigenous people where theologians were not.
_	"Just to be able to look in and see this, it's tragic, but it's historic," another told the "Sun" expressing the hope that the divided city could unite around its baseball team.
_	But then too, Ranjit Kumar kept Ravi away from her motherhood in the hope that one day Ravi would overcome his bad habits.
_	It was erected in 2009, with the hope that both Ukrainian and Polish presidents would attend the ceremonies, but there were spelling errors discovered in the names.
_	As time went on, this fear subsided and interest from the public sector emerged, in the hope that nuclear power could provide a viable energy alternative to coal.
_	After the battle, Kinana ibn al-Rabi was tortured by al-Zubayr ibn al-Awwam in the hope that he would reveal where he had hidden the treasure of the Abu'l-Huqayq clan.
_	In addition, the Francoist State overcame the storm through the so-called substitution policies, bridging with Spanish-American republics and Arab countries in the hope that the Western countries, driven by the Cold War, rectify their attitude towards Spain.
_	Some people use the leaves to make bookmarks in the hope that they will bring them good luck in their studies.
_	He supported the Warsaw Confederation in 1704 against August II and the proclamation of interregnum, in the hope that he would gain the Polish crown, with the help of Sweden.
_	The British response, which included the public executions of dozens of suspected rebels in Dunlavin and Carnew, along with other violence perpetrated by all sides, ended the hope that Protestants and Catholics could work together for Ireland.
_	His unscrupulous boss, Philibert, refuses to release him from his long-term contract in the hope that Albert will buy him off with a large payment.
_	Politicians in the area, most notably Sault Ste. Marie MP Carmen Provenzano, expressed the hope that the sale would result in the CBC launching new local newscasts, but when the deal was finalized in early 2003, the CBC simply converted them to full retransmitters of CBLT, Toronto's CBC owned-and-operated station.
_	In the months leading up to his death he had become a recluse, living in Monkstown, Dublin, apparently in the hope that the sea air would remedy his declining health.
_	In the hope that when they reach 30% [quotas] will be eliminated.
_	Thus the site was first designated Coronado International Memorial on August 18, 1941, with the hope that a comparable adjoining area would be established in Mexico.
_	At the same time, while Jovian expressed the hope that "all" his subjects would embrace the Christian religion, he granted the rights of conscience to all of mankind, leaving the pagans free worship in their temples, (barring only certain magical rites which previously had been suppressed), and freedom from persecution to the Jews.
_	As with Jon Jordan, he expressed the hope that future updates would add some depth to the game.
_	The idea is to cultivate personal relationships with prospective employers, selection panelists, and others, in the hope that these personal affections will influence future hiring decisions.
_	Both women utilized their gender to harness "the power of maternal symbolism - the hope that a woman could best close wounds left on their societies by war and dictatorship."
_	Manager Michael Jeffery arranged the accommodations in the hope that the respite might encourage Hendrix to write material for a new album.
_	Joeres explored the "paradox" of how a journal can be both an "agent for change" and regarded as "respectable in the academy," and concluded with the hope that "Signs" could retain its activist roots and transform the academy.
_	Barker stated in his address at her unveiling that "[i]t has been placed on the campus of the University of Oregon ... with the hope that so placed in the midst of the students and their activities, it may tell its story as a work of art and become a strong factor in implanting the love of the beautiful in the lives of the students as they go in and out before it."
_	The cities of New York, Boston, Los Angeles, Washington DC, Portland/Seattle, San Francisco, and Chicago will each send a winning vocal group to perform in the National Finals for a sold-out house of enthusiastic a cappella fans and celebrity judges, in the hope that theirs will return as the Grand National Champion.
_	I incriminated myself in the hope that by telling them lies I could end the ordeal.
_	It was noted that the local sentiment was generally pro-war and when Kingsbury read out a telegram of support from another MP expressing the hope that Rossendale would, like other places, ‘help our soldiers at the front’ it was received with great enthusiasm.
_	The British government in principle allowed for a decimal coinage but nevertheless held out the hope that a sterling unit would be chosen under the name of "royal".
_	During his time in prison Sentinel regained some of his old fire and a determination to make amends for his past failings, and got his chance when Starscream released him in the hope that he would destroy Megatron.
_	Originally created in the hope that Frank Sinatra Jr. would take the role, the character Vic Fontaine (instead played by 1960s heart throb James Darren) was introduced in the sixth-season episode "His Way".
_	In January 2012 a youth group from the Cathedral Parish launched a website "for realising the potential of youth and expressing their concerns in a Christian way", with the hope that it would help counter fundamentalism and fanaticism.
_	First they tried offering £1,500 to the Coventry Canal, in the hope that the compensation clauses would not be enacted.
_	The steward, with a stranger's advice, has him sent to the land of the dead to ask of the former King's behavior, in the hope that he never returns.
_	He was later sent as ambassador to Turkey (1969–70), allegedly in the hope that he would defect to the West, which however did not occur.
_	Afterward, Ibn al-Ashtar directed the right wing under al-Azdi to assault the Umayyads' left wing in the hope that Umayr ibn al-Hubab would hold true to his promise and fall back as agreed.
_	Prior to the Tokyo Olympics, Dickson was sent on an international tour to compete, along with Berry, O'Brien and Bob Windle, in the hope that their honed racecraft would help them in Tokyo.
_	Afterwards, Earth embarks on a major new campaign of space colonization, with the hope that the new colonists will prove more faithful to the Mother Planet than the earlier ones.
_	Here, The Pope, The Queen of England, Madonna, James Dean and other impersonators build a stage in the hope that the world will visit and watch them perform.
_	Near the end of the game, a team that is losing may purposefully foul offensive players to stop the clock and regain possession of the ball, with the hope that the player will miss his free throws.
_	The marches were called "snowball marches" in the hope that like a snowball rolling down a hill will pick up more snow, gaining more mass and surface area, and picking up even more snow as it rolls along, the marchers would also collect more marchers as they progressed to the recruiting depot.
_	It would remain selective – there would be no attempt to include all members of parliament, for example – but would seek to include significant, influential or notorious figures from the whole canvas of the life of Britain and its former colonies, overlaying the decisions of the late-nineteenth-century editors with the interests of late-twentieth-century scholarship in the hope that "the two epochs in collaboration might produce something more useful for the future than either epoch on its own", but acknowledging also that a final definitive selection is impossible to achieve.
_	Orders had been pushing "U-140" further into the Baltic during the preceding months, with the hope that she might achieve just such a victory.
_	Because rescue was uncertain, they engraved ship details and their names on the concave side of a large turtle shell, in the hope that it would be found in the future.
_	Centered on additional artifacts from the author's collections, the book traced the migration of settlers spurred west by "the hope that a better life awaits your initiative, your perseverance, your cleverness, your hard work."
_	I, who had signed a treaty of alliance with the British forces after they had freed him from Fort Santiago in Manila, where he had been imprisoned accused of treason, was also taken with the evacuating forces, in the hope that he could be of help to the aspirations of the East India Company in the Sultanate of Sulu.
_	Automated Content Access Protocol ("ACAP") was proposed in 2006 as a method of providing machine-readable permissions information for content, in the hope that it would have allowed automated processes (such as search-engine web crawling) to be compliant with publishers' policies without the need for human interpretation of legal terms.
_	Henry and Edgar Kaiser contemplated liquidation but decided against it in the hope that a new Kaiser for 1951, the Henry J, would help turn sales around.
_	For many hopeful, often vocal, followers, Schneerson's death did not rule out the hope that he could still be the Mashiach.
_	Paarthurnax reveals that Alduin was cast into the currents of time by the use of an Elder Scroll in the hope that he would never reemerge.
_	Farmers were given twelve months notice in the hope that the barley would be forthcoming.
_	The Vietnamese, aware of France's distraction in Italy, refused these moderate terms and spun out the negotiations in the hope that the allies would cut their losses and abandon the campaign altogether.
_	While pursuing her graduate thesis, she tried writing songs in the hope that she would soon make her professional début.
_	Bowing to pressure, he resigned, citing the "legitimate anger" of the public the "desire to place responsibility at higher levels" than the nightclub owners, and the hope that the expectations of the demonstrators had been met.
_	It was this—allied to Cromwell's toleration of private worship of non-puritans—that led to his encouraging Jews to return to England, 350 years after their banishment by Edward I, in the hope that they would help speed up the recovery of the country after the disruption of the Civil Wars.
_	In order to escape, fleeing adventurers could discard pieces of metal in the hope that the pursuing rust monster would stop for a few seconds to devour them.
_	The stories were somewhat re-written as they were adapted into movies, but they were still promoted as "B. Edgar Wallace Movies" in the hope that his name would attract a large audience.
_	Wong participated in a campaign of the Ocean Recovery Alliance in Hong Kong in April 2013, contributing "Death by Amputation" – a sculpture of a life-sized finned shark – to an exhibition in Stanley harbour in the hope that it will provoke thought on the source of food and the cruelty inflicted by humans on animals.
_	It was an awareness-raising style, in the hope that the paternalist elements of society would take heed but it also warned that the untouchables might leave India unless their situation improved.
_	At 14:00, the hunter set himself on a tree overlooking the boy’s corpse, in the hope that the leopard would return for it.
_	Instead of Rev. Battelle's resolution a policy of "Negro exclusion" for the new state was adopted to keep any new slaves, or freemen, from taking up residence, in the hope that this would satisfy abolitionist sentiment in Congress.
_	Nearly as many expressed the hope that Mercedes was not pregnant given her nausea in the first "booty camp" scene, including Vicki Hyman of "The Star-Ledger", "BuddyTV" John Kubicek, and West.
_	Parnell took up a tutoring position at Trinity College, at the University of Melbourne, between 1904 and 1911, with the hope that it would enable him to have time to pursue research, and then apply for a Fellowship position at the Cambridge.
_	Miles Glendinning and Stephen Muthesius's book "Tower Block" published the following year expressed the hope that it might also have "dealt a fatal blow to that most conspicuous ritual of Anti-Modernism–the demolition of tower blocks as public theatre".
_	Later it came to our attention that he said goodbye to Banovich [the company commander] with the hope that not a single Jew would be among those whom he would bring back home
_	For reasons of expediency, however, he was initially drawn into cooperating with the early Nazi regime in the hope that Hitler—an ardent Wagnerian and music lover who had admired Strauss' work since viewing "Salome" in 1907—would promote German art and culture.
_	It is their intention to increase the level of involvement by players and the general public in the hope that fun, discipline and competition of basketball can be a positive influence on Belizean youth.
_	He further called it a song about "the brutal war so many of us wage against fear, depression and anxiety in the hope that we might, one day, live a life filled with happiness and dreams".
_	They spent the winter of 1855–56 in Florida with the hope that the mild weather would help restore their health.
_	Since early in the 1980s, fetal, porcine, carotid or retinal tissues have been used in cell transplants, in which dissociated cells are injected into the substantia nigra in the hope that they will incorporate themselves into the brain in a way that replaces the dopamine-producing cells that have been lost.
_	All three main political parties in Bradford - Labour, the Conservatives and the Liberal Democrats declared their opposition to an elected mayor for the city, whilst the Conservative MP Kris Hopkins, who was previously leader of Bradford Council, also campaigned for a 'no' vote in his Keighley constituency in the hope that such an outcome would help the area 'break-away' from Bradford.
_	Fosdick greatly admired "Regent Square", and wrote his own "God of Grace and God of Glory" specifically in the hope that it would be generally sung to that tune.
_	Mort's father Lezek takes him to a local hiring fair in the hope that Mort will land an apprenticeship; not only would this provide a job for his son, but it would also make his son's propensity for thinking into someone else's problem.
_	On 14 April 2008, the newly elected president of Armenia, Serzh Sargsyan (former Prime Minister of Armenia), signed two decrees: one appointing Mikael Harutyunyan as Chief Military Inspector, and another appointing him as a Presidential Advisor, with the hope that his skill and experience would prove useful in the continual development of the military.
_	"While most traditional Buddhist fire rituals focus on personal purification and awakening, the Shinnyo-en ceremony is dedicated to awakening people to their innate compassionate and altruistic nature, transcending all boundaries of age, gender, nationality, ethnicity, and religious tradition, and directing the positive energy of the ceremony outward with the hope that all people can live in a world of hope and harmony."
_	The site in Bear Creek Valley southwest of the Oak Ridge township was selected in the hope that the surrounding ridge lines might contain a major explosion or nuclear accident.
_	For example, in 1926, the Ukrainian Party Central Committee passed a resolution in which they expressed the hope that:
_	In the final days of Earth 2, Lois' instincts as a journalist lead her to attempt to preserve and record the history and stories of Earth 2 in her large memory bank in the hope that someday, someone will read the data and rebuild this world.
_	In 1998, she appeared on "60 Minutes", saying that she was still in pain and had felt great pressure to continue living; she expressed the hope that she would soon die of natural causes.
_	At this point Tālivaldis chose to support Albert, in the hope that the Germans would help the Tālavians to resist the pressure on them from the Russians.
_	Chet works up the courage to buy it at a convenience store a considerable distance from his house, in the hope that no one will see him there.
_	The five cerulean five-pointed stars arranged in an X pattern centered in the white band represent the five nations of the former Federal Republic of Central America (El Salvador, Costa Rica, Nicaragua, Honduras, and Guatemala) and the hope that the nations may form a union again.
_	However, according to a report in "The Independent" written by the paper's Law Editor, Robert Verkaik, Davis and one of his original trial barristers, David Whitehouse, now a QC, intended to make representations to the Criminal Cases Review Commission in the hope that they would return to court citing new evidence and establish Davis's innocence and seek compensation for his period of imprisonment.
_	But he continued to hold out the hope that Michaels himself might yet be persuaded to return in some capacity, as he had suggested he might.
_	In 1937, Maniu agreed to sign an electoral pact with the Iron Guard's Corneliu Zelea Codreanu, in the hope that this would block the monarch's maneuvers.
_	Davis and Leo are taken to a prison camp and forced by the Lutadores to dig in a tunnel system, Davis only getting by on the hope that his daughter is still alive.
_	The vigilance of the imperial officers in the interior forbids the hope that a foreigner can penetrate far without detection".
_	""[...] the field of computational fluid mechanics has been advancing rapidly in the past few years and now offers the hope that "computational aeroacoustics," where noise is computed directly from a first principles determination of continuous velocity and vorticity fields, might be possible, [...]""
_	He also expressed the hope that Adelaide and the State would flourish under what to him would be the wisest and greatest advance in the history of Australia — Federation of the Colonies.
_	Very frequently, but not always, a getaway car is stolen and is abandoned soon after the crime, in the hope that the vehicle cannot be traced to the offender.
_	It is administered as a stand-alone procedure in the hope that the tissue which obstructs the patient's airway is localized in the back of the throat.
_	He called on Reform Jews to “stand up for Israel” against its critics while fighting to ensure that Israel preserves the democratic and liberal ideals dear to the Reform Movement at the same time, and expressed the hope that “one day soon the State of Israel will live in peace side by side with the State of Palestine.
_	Strangeways chose the name R Force in the hope that if the Germans discovered it, they might assume that the R stood for reconnaissance.
_	Burns decided to go for a walk on the Bridge or Miller's Holm in the hope that Kate would return with the lost cow.
_	Greek Cypriot nationalism made its presence known to the new rulers, when, in a welcoming speech at Larnaca for the first British high commissioner, the bishop of Kition expressed the hope that the British would expedite the unification of Cyprus and Greece as they had previously done with the Ionian Islands.
_	An investment is an acquisition of an asset in the hope that it will maintain or increase its value over time that will in hope give back a higher rate of return when it comes to disbursing dividends.
_	And on March 4, 1812 he wrote: "I am still pursuing my profession in the hope that, at a future time, a proper amount will be realized from my works, either to myself or family, but at this moment all pursuits which are not among the essentials of life are at a stand".
_	Meeting with his confidante, Archbishop (later, Cardinal) Spellman in New York on September 3, Roosevelt stated, "The European people will simply have to endure Russian domination, in the hope that in ten or twenty years they will be able to live well with the Russians."
_	That same month, Ayanbadejo said there were up to four NFL players who were considering coming out on the same day with the hope that any backlash would be shared and the pressure on one person reduced.
_	In March 2001, about 27 million children were vaccinated across the country in the hope that Pakistan could be virus-free by the end of that year.
_	NREL allows industry members to test and evaluate potential products, with the hope that it will lead to more cost effective and reliable technology.
_	Jane and Lisbon then realize that Brett Partridge was chanting the phrase "Tyger, Tyger" to Lisbon just prior to his death, in the hope that she was a member and could help him.
_	Laurence vehemently rejects the offer, instead offering the money to his younger (and gender-neutral) brother, Phil, in the hope that his brother will share the estate with him upon their father's death.
_	Krishnan lives with the hope that the two families will unite someday paving the way for his wedding.
_	Pushkin dedicates the poem to unnamed young beauties, the “queens of my soul” (души моей царицы "dushi mojej tsaritsy"), and states that his reward is the hope that some lovesick girl will read the poem in secret.
_	Madison accepted Napoleon's proposal in the hope that it would convince the British to revoke the Orders-in-Council, but the British refused to change their policies.
_	She refused to reveal anymore information on the rest of the Conners in the hope that it "may be developed later".
_	Instead of going to Wellington he stayed at St Cyprian's for an additional term in the hope that a place at Eton would materialise.
_	It was decided that Tebbit should persuade the Bank of England to co-operate with the main creditors in the hope that a recovery plan and new management would end the threat of receivership.
_	Though the Conservative mayor, Axel Buch, was expected to be re-elected, Kristiansen chose to support the Labour candidate Olav Gjærevoll, in the hope that a socialist majority would ensure the future of the trams, and thus making Gjærevoll mayor.
_	The LRA declared a short-lived ceasefire for the duration of Ugandan presidential election, 1996, possibly in the hope that Yoweri Museveni would be defeated.
_	Supplies were left at Elmwood in the hope that they would assist any future stranded expeditions.
_	Bufan tells his boss, Liang, the truth in the hope that the latter will understand and retain him (based on their relationship and knowledge about how aids is being passed), but worried about the supermarket’s business and the employees’ safety, Liang wants Bufan to resign on his own accord.
_	She resorted to all sorts of bogus treatments and remedies and moved to Italy for 18 months in the hope that the climate would have a beneficial effect.
_	Danny Churchill, a young philandering playboy, is taken out of college by his concerned father and sent to 'Cody College', somewhere in the American West, in the hope that he'll stay away from girls and knuckle down to his studies.
_	Both the 118th and 111th Battalions and local citizens' recruiting committees used various methods to attract new recruits: speeches and recruitment rallies were frequently held at local movie theatres; military parades and drills were held in public areas in the hope that civilians would be inspired to enlist; posters were hung throughout each recruitment area; ads and articles were run in local newspapers, and recruiters visited homes, work places and local businesses to encourage individuals to enlist.
_	The Blessing of the Bikes, also The Blessing of the Bicycles, is an annual tradition in which riders of motorcycles or bicycles are blessed by a priest in the hope that it will bring safety for the coming season.
_	The original intention was to propose the idea to other national space agencies, including the European Space Agency and the Japanese space agency, in the hope that they would offer similar prize purses.
_	Seeing no other alternative, she decides to drive to the location they originally lived, where her estranged lover lives with the hope that some sort of fatherly bond will cure her son.
_	Katz says that Villa wanted to put one of his generals, Felipe Ángeles, up to it because in the past he had spoken of the ""need for reconciliation with the Americans"" and the hope that the US would then ""change its attitude"" toward the Villistas.
_	In 1754, Le Roux Deshauterayes who at the time was professor for Arabic at the Collège Royal, showed Anquetil a facsimile of four leaves of a "Vendidad Sade" that had been sent to Deshauterayes's uncle Michel Fourmont in the 1730s in the hope that someone might be able to decipher it.
_	The hostile environment policy, which came into effect in October 2010, is a set of administrative and legislative measures designed to make staying in the United Kingdom as difficult as possible for people without "leave to remain", in the hope that they may "voluntarily leave".
_	I present the reader with the whole of Capt. Poduval's article in the hope that it will bring converts to the great cause of Daridranarayan."
_	During this time Rumbold was in favour of appeasing the Brüning Government in the hope that this would stave off German nationalist parties, like Adolf Hitler's Nazi party.
_	Despite her rants and temper tantrums, the tired men only rolled over and ignored her in the hope that she would leave.
_	Past wishes have ranged from world peace and senior's acceptance to college to the hope that cookie Tuesday could happen everyday.
_	On April 5, 1968, King arrived in Memphis to retrieve her husband's body and decided that the casket should be kept open during the funeral with the hope that her children would realize upon seeing his body that he would not be coming home.
_	They kept the voting lines open for a long time I think in the hope that she would get over the line.
_	After Britain declared war on Germany in September 1939, Hepburn's mother relocated her daughter back to Arnhem in the hope that, as during the First World War, the Netherlands would remain neutral and be spared a German attack.
_	The cavalry horses were freed and driven into the sea in the hope that they might be able to swim ashore.
_	Conservative Judaism does not sanction intermarriage, but encourages acceptance of the non-Jewish spouse by the family in the hope that such acceptance will lead to the spouse's conversion to Judaism.
_	One spring, a relative of the Mistress brings her invalid toddler, Baby, to the Place in the hope that the weather will help her grow stronger.
_	The United Nations Human Rights Council was created "with the hope that it could be more objective, credible and efficient in denouncing human rights violations worldwide than the highly politicized Commission on Human Rights."
_	Swartz created the angel figures with the hope that “their presence might help my mother go to heaven."
_	To go into production, Gillis raised 70,000 dollars through private sponsors (Michael Huffington, Jacqueline Gill, and Ruth and Hans Blixt), and 30,000 dollars via Kickstarter together with co-EP Lucy Bidwell, in addition to the 47,000 dollars that he personally borrowed and the 30,000 dollars that More Media lent to the production on the hope that the film would eventually be picked up by The Swedish Film Institute.
_	Depleted uranium was originally stored as an unusable waste product (uranium hexafluoride) in the hope that improved enrichment processes could extract additional quantities of the fissionable U-235 isotope.
_	He strips any "local conditions" peculiar to Earth from these milestones which he calls "thresholds", in the hope that these "thresholds" will be applicable to an alien evolution in an alien planetary system.
_	On her death in 1914 she bequeathed the collection to the "Musée social" in the hope that it would organize a feminist institute.
_	Though Lila left Dominic and took their daughter, Sally Ann, when Sally was 7, Dominic always kept his cottage in San Remo in the hope that Sally would return.
_	Gunther offered the rest of his collection to the city, with the hope that the city would build a museum for it in Garfield Park, but Illinois law prevented such a building from being constructed on parkland.
_	In the half people's caves, Richard is imprisoned; but discovers Zedd, who tells him the half people bleed him in the hope that his blood will resurrect their dead emperor.
_	Sir John Betjeman tells the story of a Balliol aesthete called Michael Dugdale who used to walk into Brasenose College, dominated by the Hearts, with a stick and limping, in the hope that the Hearts would be too sporting to attack him.
_	It was Van Marum's dream to create a larger version, and he applied to the Teylers Stichting in 1783 for funding to create such a large instrument in the hope that it would add a valuable contribution to the science of electricity.
_	Chani's rebirth as a ghola, and the hope that Duncan Idaho's memories might be reawakened, in return for Paul sacrificing the throne and going into exile.
_	This was partly in the hope that the vessel would be used for a further search for the Franklin expedition.
_	The Prince chose the spirit of the his uncle, Governor Johann Georg, Chevalier de Saxe to be evoked, partly in the hope that this would reveal where in the palace the Governor had hidden the large sums of money that he supposedly had amassed.
_	Samuel Oughton had to decide between the Baptist's cherished principles of self-government or upholding the literacy entry requirements arising from the hope that education would be "the great leveller".
_	Santa has also been revealed to be a Paladin of Hope, specifically the Hope for Justice, and the Hope for Reward as well as the hope that everything will turn out all right in the end, claiming that this is why Christmas takes place at the end of the year.
_	The rocket is then launched into deep space, in the hope that the Super-Beast would never be seen again.
_	They are promoted in bookstores, in the hope that the "Canada Reads" audience will purchase and read them all before the programs air.
_	Pecknold later sent some demos to producer Phil Ek and expressed the hope that the second LP would emerge in late 2010.
_	The SMC's stated aim is to "facilitate more scientists to engage with the media, in the hope that the public will have improved access to accurate, evidence-based scientific information about the stories of the day".
_	Susan Stryker describes the relationships between Bannon's characters as mostly positive, satisfactory, and at times complex depictions of lesbian and gay relationships, which Bannon attributed to not letting go of the hope that she could "salvage (her) own life."
_	He called the admission "the most devastating moment of my life." A 2006 "E! True Hollywood Story" profile of Hefner revealed that Mildred allowed him to have sex with other women, out of guilt for her own infidelity and in the hope that it would preserve their marriage.
_	Unaware that Guzzoni had already ordered a major counterattack on 11 July, Kesselring bypassed the chain of command to order the "Hermann Göring Panzer" Division to attack that day in the hope that a vigorous attack could succeed before the Americans could bring the bulk of their artillery and armoured support ashore.
_	The labels lyrical approach, as explained by Frank Tate, was "...if you search the lyrics and ponder what they're saying, you'll hear the hope that they've found.
_	While at the Musée social, Pinot joined the Grand Cercle Républicain, organized by the "Revue politique et parlementaire" with the hope that it would supply leaders of a new conservative party.
_	The UK Club is planning a new, in depth health survey to be run late 2012 early 2013 in the hope that the longevity can be more accurately represented.
_	Olivia returns to Summer Bay in the hope that her mother's former foster carer Irene Roberts (Lynne McGranger) will look after her, following some trouble at her school in London.
_	Uther by sacrificing Nimue in the hope that Merlin will break his vow not to use magic.
_	To facilitate this prayer, resources listing topics to pray for are mailed out around the world, to encourage more Christians to pray, in the hope that Muslims will be blessed and to come to know the saving knowledge of Jesus Christ, and to increase this interest and vision.
_	Shy by nature, he began climbing in college in the hope that mountaineering would increase his self-confidence.
_	He remarked that an intelligent and happy crowd had assembled to welcome him and he could do nothing more than greet them and bid them farewell with the hope that our country would continue to prosper forever.
_	To help herself cope, she moves her family to Hollywood with the hope that her daughters will break into the movie business.
_	Most of these were billeted with local families in the hope that the local husbands and sons fighting in the war would be well supplied by people in the occupied lands.
_	The person perpetuating the scam calls the victim via a robodialer or similar means, sometimes at odd hours of the night, then hangs up when the phone is answered with the hope that they will be curious enough to call the number back.
_	Hooker says, 'We figure it on account of its great beauty, a beauty which is scarcely altered by drying, for the form and colour of both leaves and flowers is truly of that kind called everlasting; and partly with the hope that our cultivators may be induced to import this lovely plant as an ornament to our greenhouses.
_	The spot was supposedly chosen for its lovely setting, in the hope that the condemned prisoner’s punishment would thereby seem all the worse.
_	Originally, radiosurgery and the gamma unit were developed with the hope that it would offer a bloodless, and less risky, method to be applied principally in functional neurosurgery, for example in thalamotomy for Parkinson's disease.
_	Cyprus therefore sided with the Avignon Papacy in the Western Schism, in the hope that the French would be able to drive out the Italians.
_	During the late eighteenth century with the Bourbon reforms, the crown established a new administrative system, the intendancy, with much better paid crown officials, with the hope that graft and other personal enrichment would not be so tempting.
_	Copps Coliseum was built in the hope that it would allow Hamilton to acquire an NHL franchise.
_	The aim was to give universities greater financial autonomy from the government to make them more responsive to research needs and better able to forge links with the private sector, in the hope that this would nurture a culture of entrepreneurship in academia.
_	The Harpers appreciate the hope that the goddess and her faith represent and assist them on the surface of Faerun.
_	The goal of the embargo according to Chomsky has been to implement "intensive U.S. terror operations" and "harsh economic warfare" in order to cause "rising discomfort among hungry Cubans" in the hope that out of desperation they would overthrow the regime.
_	Despite broad church support for it (even many Confessing Christians advocated such an approach, in the hope that the disaffiliation of 1937 to 1940 could be curbed), the first edition of the text did not meet with the expected enthusiastic response.
_	Alex by doing more embarrassing acts in the hope that everybody will turn their attention to him and forget what Alex has done.
_	Ford cited Morton's extensive business experience as the primary factor for selecting him and expressed the hope that Morton would be able to "encourage American business to expand energy development and conservation efforts".
_	On the advice of doctors, Hastie travelled to Melbourne later in the year, with the hope that the long sea journey would aid his recovery.
_	This time, a route was chosen along the north coast, in the hope that the Allies would be deceived into thinking that the convoy’s objective was Madang.
_	I came here to play rock-and-roll for you East Berliners in the hope that one day all the barriers will be torn down."
_	This was a deliberate link by the producers of "Enterprise" to both "Space Seed" and "The Wrath of Khan", and was one of several plots during the fourth season of the show to include elements of "Star Trek: The Original Series" in the hope that this would boost ratings.
_	De La Warr expressed to Stonehaven the hope that the local Conservatives would accept a National Labour candidate, but Stonehaven wrote back that the suggestion amazed him.
_	However, the issue did not die there, and on 6 April 1785 Rufus King introduced a resolution to re-implement the slavery prohibition in the 1784 ordinance, containing a fugitive slave provision in the hope that this would reduce opposition to the objective of the resolution.
_	the central portion of the city's metro line has seen renewed construction efforts and the metro has been transferred to municipal ownership in the hope that this will help it secure a loan from the European Bank for Development and Reconstruction.
_	Before reaching their final destination, Camila wrote to Manuelita Rosas, with the hope that she might persuade her father into granting clemency.
_	Rognvald agreed to provide Einarr with a ship and crew in the hope that he would sail away and never return.
_	He based it primarily on the Classical Mongol script, expressing the hope that it would also help Buryats to read materials in the old script.
_	After Pompey defeated him in Pontus, Mithridates VI fled to the lands north of the Black Sea in the winter of 66 BC in the hope that he could raise a new army and carry on the war through invading Italy by way of the Danube.
_	Instead, the aim of content providers is to make illegal downloads statistically less likely to be clean and complete, in the hope that users will be discouraged from illegally downloading copyright material.
_	Speaking for the government, Fidele Ngouandjika expressed the hope that the broad political agreement on the January 2011 date would mean that international financial assistance for the election would come soon.
_	"Remlik", although prohibited from using her depth charges by her speed - only 2 knots against the gale - remained in the area in the hope that the submarine would reappear.
_	A common technique used to maximize the probability of a message being successfully transferred is to replicate many copies of the message in the hope that one will succeed in reaching its destination.
_	The relatives of the dead receive it with great celebrations and then push it back down the rod in the hope that this ancestral ghost will prosper exceedingly down below and become the powerful protector of the family and, for that matter, the whole village.
_	We joined the Guard voluntarily with the hope that this was one way to serve our country in her time of need.
_	It was not formally described at the time in the hope that more specimens, particularly a male, would be found and more data would be available.
_	Her father throws Sedna overboard in the hope that this will appease the angry god.
_	Amanda, a poor milliner and look-alike of the singer, is called upon to seduce the prince, in the hope that life will prevail over memory.
_	In a letter Bruckner wrote to the conductor Felix Weingartner in January 1891, he mentioned the hope that these cut passages would prove “valid for posterity and for a circle of friends and connoisseurs.”
_	Pepperberg was training Alex to recognize English graphemes, in the hope that he would conceptually relate an English written word with the spoken word.
_	When Aslan called his first council-of-war to deal with the Jadis situation, Digory announced his desire to seek an audience with Aslan, in the hope that Aslan might give him some kind of cure for his ailing mother.
_	He pointed out that the martyrs had died forgiving their enemies, and expressed the hope that their example would help to remove the end of hatred and resentment still felt in Spain from those times.
_	The plot of the book concerns a Chinese Dragon, Karen, who falls in love with a mortal, Paul, and so decides to become mortal herself in the hope that they get together.
_	Marcus reveals that Moon brought him into the game in the hope that he would be the only survivor.
_	And just like Rewa has the hope that Mehroo (the man who is supposed to be her saviour) will come and take her across the desert, we all harbour hopes that someone else will come and break this ever compulsive repetitive cycle of our pain and suffering and free us from its seemingly inescapable clutches.
_	Singh was initially against the appeal but later agreed to it in the hope that the appeal would popularise the HSRA in Britain.
_	This song is about that feeling, and the hope that I still have, buried deep in my chest.
_	He also explained that he had performed this calculation purely to raise awareness of the risks of payday loans and concluded by expressing the hope that his example would make people "think twice before getting payday borrowing".
_	With characteristic modesty she expressed the hope that her sketch might "serve as an inducement to some young readers to make acquaintance with the delectable old Canon (Froissart) for themselves".
_	It was the creation of both the British as well as Indian residents who were eager to know India's life, society and history, in the hope that useful and interesting information might be gathered of the history, growth and source of the civilization in which people lived.
_	The MEK under their leader Massoud Rajavi harbored the hope that the attack would lead to a general uprising against the Islamic government of Ayatollah Khomeini.
_	She was hurt by her reputation in Darmstadt, and she became increasingly bitter towards it; Louis wrote in August 1877 expressing the hope that "bitterness of the salt water will drive away the bitterness that you still feel against Darmstadt.
_	The person perpetuating the scam calls the victim via a robodialer or similar means, sometimes at odd hours of the night and then hangs up when the phone is answered, with the hope that the victim will be curious enough to call the number back.
_	He also played a gunslinging professional killer in the pilot for the television version of "Gunsmoke"; but many changes were later instituted on the series, such as the marshal's office and Long Branch Saloon looking markedly different and the relationship between Matt Dillon and Kitty being subtly more formal as well, so the episode was buried deep in the season in the hope that viewers would not notice, which apparently worked.
_	The writer added that subsequently the character "impulsively" agrees to a date with Pete "P-Dog" Reeves (James Saunders) in the hope that he can distract her from the predicament.
_	His unscrupulous boss, Philibert, refuses to release him from his long-term contract in the hope that Albert will buy him off with a large payment.
_	When he died, Isaac Oliver left his finished and unfinished drawings for Peter, with the hope that he would live to exercise the art of his father.
_	Because he recognized that social behavior is often grounded in faulty reasoning, he expressed the hope that a critique of rationality might reduce its scope:
_	As during the First World War, two caretakers were retained, and the pumps continued to operate, in the hope that it could be reopened.
_	The attack was probably made by the Chinese in the hope that the French had lowered their guard after the failure of the previous day's assault.
_	This ensures that companies are not wholly reliant on one firm for its income, in the hope that they do not need to act unethically to keep a steady income.
_	Little girls would hang these little shoe charms over their beds in the hope that they will help them find love.
_	To discredit the legitimacy of the Chongqing government, Wang adopted Sun's flag in the hope that it would establish him as the rightful successor to Sun and bring the government back to Nanjing.
_	Watt's work was well known, and a number of mines that needed engines put off purchasing them in the hope that Watt would soon market his invention.
_	Thus, when you were on the point of returning to the country, the people as a whole entertained the hope that it would find again under your guidance the peace that is necessary to give meaning to existence, to reconstruct the destroyed homes, put to the plow again the abandoned lands.
_	Bugzilla was originally written in Tcl, but Weissman decided to port it to Perl before its release as part of Netscape's early open source code drops, in the hope that more people would be able to contribute to it, given that Perl seemed to be a more popular language at the time.
_	MCC runs a "conscientious objector registry" in Canada, taking statements from Canadians in the hope that they will be recognized by the Canadian government should the government restart drafting citizens into the military.
_	His governorship of Bombay was not without extensive criticism, with one anonymous writer penning a poem expressing the hope that Bombay would not suffer too greatly from Harris' political inexperience.
_	During the visit of Pope John Paul II to the United States in 1979, Callahan implored priests "to refuse to help the pope in celebrating Mass" in the hope that "more lay women would then have to be enlisted to assist at the services."
_	Some common sea containers include: aqua pod (completely sealed bubble), open water (with the hope that the fish will naturally return), sea cages (simple netting tied to the ocean floor), and raceways (often in rivers or ponds).
_	UMMC partnered with the Moscow State Institute of International Relations in 2013 to educate and train people in international transportation, in the hope that the training will satisfy UMMC's employment needs while offering new jobs to local people.
_	So I guess that's the inspiration—the hope that that happens to someone someday."
_	Patty and Selma once kidnapped Homer and imprisoned him in a cellar in the hope that Marge would find someone else.
_	Cross expressed the hope that his reputation would 'span the Atlantic,' and that those in the industry would not ignore him because he did not live in Los Angeles or New York City.
_	The Soviet 26th Tank Corps, having destroyed a large portion of the Romanian 1st Armored Division, continued its advance to the southeast, avoiding engaging enemy left behind, although remnants of the Romanian 5th Corps were able to reorganize and put up a hastily constructed defense in the hope that it would be aided by the German 48th Panzer Corps.
_	Despite the disagreements, popular culture grasped onto the implications in the field of applied psychology with the hope that the research could improve their lives.
_	At the young age of eight, a mysterious carpenter was introduced to her in the hope that his facial features would inspire Akiane.
_	Madeline and Raoul’s love is a candle in the wind: the constant fight to free Raoul, even after a year, and the hope that he still loves her.
_	Nelli tries to be a good housekeeper, but at the same time a bad wife, because she wants to annoy her husband in the hope that he will leave her.
_	In 2014, the President of MCA approved the relocation of Kojadi Institute to Tunku Abdul Rahman University College in Setapak, Kuala Lumpur in the hope that this new premise will have a more conducive environment for the students.
_	Some doctors give the therapy in the hope that a response is seen, and they can then decide what is the best course of action.
_	Despite pressure from the Spanish clergy, Ferdinand chose a laissez-faire policy towards the Muslim in the hope that interaction with Catholics will make them "understand the error" of their faith and abandon it.
_	Their leader, Vargo Hoat, cuts off Jaime's sword hand in the hope that Tywin will blame Roose and prevent the Boltons defecting to the Lannisters.
_	Her condition was severe enough that she was not expected to survive for more than 24 hours, but doctors decided to fly her to Adelaide in the hope that she might be helped.
_	In a final irony, the printer gave the entire print run of the magazine to the Niggerati, in the hope that they would sell better in quantity, only for several hundred copies to be lost in a fire in the basement in which they were stored.
_	Paolo Fresco became chairman of Fiat in 1998 with the hope that the veteran of General Electric would bring more emphasis on shareholder value to Fiat.
_	Boers returned to their local districts in the hope that locals that knew them would offer sustenance and support.
_	Some Mexicans in the north perhaps welcomed the US invasion with the hope that the U.S. would be more successful in fighting the "barbarians" than Mexican forces had been.
_	Papen called a national election for July 1932, in the hope that the Nazis would win the largest number of seats in the "Reichstag", which would allow him the majority he needed to create a dictatorship.
_	Later, he reveals that he is searching for super-powered beings in the hope that he will find the murderer of his mother, and exonerate his father for the accusation.
_	He chose the name "Advanced Headquarters 'A' Force" - the 'A' being a subtle reference to airborne - in the hope that it would help support the existence of paratroopers in the area (as well as hide the true purpose of the department).
_	On 15 July it was revealed that the club were negotiating with Blackpool Council about opening at least part of the stand before work on it is complete, in the hope that at least 1,000 seats would be available to use by mid-September.
_	Emsley Carr, an athletics fan and the editor of "The News of the World", created an annual mile race in the hope that the first four-minute mile would be achieved on British soil.
_	In a conversation Ōshima had with Heinrich Himmler on 31 January 1939, he expressed the hope that German-Japanese cooperation in the field of intelligence would lead eventually to the disintegration of the Soviet Union.
_	During the Poetic Games at the 42nd Olympiad (about 608 BC) a woman poet named Saffo sings so effectively against the practice of tossing felons and undesirables from a cliff on the Island of Leucadia in the hope that Apollo will catch them before they drown in the sea (the Leucadian Leap) that the god's high priest, Alcandro, is driven away in contempt.
_	Many luxury items were bought and shipped back to the Soviet Union on the Lend-Lease aircraft with the hope that they would reach their final destinations in Russia.
_	She undergoes chemotherapy in the hope that the tumour will not return, but is devastated when her hair starts falling out.
_	The week after Smith lost a split decision to eventual Contender and WBC champion Sergio Mora, Ahmad was matched with Alfonso Gomez (who went on after the show to challenge for the WBA 147 lb and WBC 154 lb titles) by the same boxers who brought Kaddour back, with the hope that the two tough fighters would battle hard and the winner would be less ready for the semi-finals.
_	The next few years of life were a gallant fight to attain sufficient strength to warrant a strenuous application to the musical career she was so bent upon, and a residence in the genial Maryland climate and in New York City and Washington stimulated the hope that, in the end, she might accomplish the longed-for results of her pains and energy.
_	The Brisbane Courier of March 1, 1866, commented that their progress was being followed with great interest in their home towns and expressed the hope that this would encourage the immigration of similar groups.
_	Prior Manning, still Suffragan of Ipswich, on the same day sent Cromwell another gift of fowl (herons and pheasants) for his table and expressed the hope that they would not forget his pension.
_	During the May 1998 riots in Java, Timor owners would remove the "T" logos in the hope that they would not be targeted by protesters.
_	The employees decide not to tell David about Andy's unapproved absence, but at the meeting they cannot resist crafting made-up recent events in the hope that he will blow his own cover.
_	Chesterfield led Barry to promotion in 2008, with the hope that a winning run of form in the second tier would see the club's dwindling support return.
_	During production, Callaway imagined the series as a "companion piece" to "", with the hope that it would have a shared viewership.
_	The original intention was to create a building every year in the hope that more businesses would move in, but this was suspended after two years due to a recession.
_	It is the definitive history and analysis of American environmentalism, from its early seeds in efforts to preserve wilderness through its maturity as a social, political and cultural movement; it offers the hope that “we will be able to save ourselves from the grave dangers we have created by our destructive use of the natural world.
_	This meant that it was for a very long while impossible to turn the machine off without committing murder, despite lawyers' best efforts to argue about what murder actually was, including trying to redefine it, repronounce it, and respell it in the hope that no one would notice.
_	Advocates of the exploration and settlement of Mars have designed, manufactured, and sold Mars flags, sometimes with the hope that their designs may one day be adopted and used by real Martian governments.
_	After appearing in just one minor league intra-squad game after his demotion, on March 21, Gagné asked for and was granted his release from the Dodgers, with the hope that he could find another opportunity with another team.
_	The reason for this frantic expansionism was the hope that the Mekong river would prove to be navigable to the Chinese frontier, which then would open the immense Chinese market for French industrial goods."
_	Waxman used the drug to switch off the activity of testes and ovaries in patients about to have chemotherapy, in the hope that it would prevent its sterilising effect.
_	Schmitt closed the letter with the hope that his forthcoming meeting with Gašparovič in Budapest would focus on the two countries’ common values.
_	In 1971, Rand decided on another format change, going back to a newsletter style publication, in the hope that this would allow her to reach a larger audience.
_	In the hope that the Clan Akkaba would still continue, Apocalypse's servant Ozymandias, made sure that Frederick would sire a child with a woman known as Miss Ferguson.
_	She gave birth to a child and left him in the cave in the hope that the god would save him.
_	The Arecibo message is a 1974 interstellar radio message carrying basic information about humanity and Earth sent to globular star cluster M13 in the hope that extraterrestrial intelligence might receive and decipher it.
_	The initiative sought to attract another engineering school to the city in the hope that it would produce entrepreneurial engineers who would in turn start job-creating companies.
_	Towards the end of the summer STATIONER began to attack railway targets, power stations and aircraft works, in the hope that more adventurous sabotage was possible.
_	On 5 November, South Vietnam's new Foreign Minister sent a message to the Embassy officially informing Lodge of the change of government, and expressing the hope that relations between the two countries would continue and be strengthened.
_	On the website itself, he mentions that it was created in the hope that when this topic comes up again, those who seek to defend the public interest have more ammunition for it.
_	He tells Iolanta Vaudémont will die if the physician fails to restore her sight, in the hope that this will restore her will.
_	At the foot of the final climb, Landa was ordered by his team to wait for Aru with the hope that, by working together, the two riders could put enough time into Contador to win the Giro.
_	In 2009, Soros funded the launch of the Institute for New Economic Thinking with the hope that it would develop reflexivity further.
_	In June 1905, Fra Pio's health worsened to such an extent that his superiors decided to send him to a mountain convent, in the hope that the change of air would do him some good.
_	In January 2009 local community and business leaders began to refer to the Greater Tri-Cities area as the Great Lakes Bay Region with the hope that a cooperative regional focus could spur economic development in the area.
_	His initial plan was to model each governor in clay and later plaster and with the hope that individual states would then purchase marble renderings post facto for the sum of $500, thus helping him recuperate his costs.
_	He tries arranging a marriage for her, in the hope that destroying her subsequent marriage or child will cause her to cry.
_	Following the presentation of "Adelson e Salvini" and while he was in Milan, Bellini—requesting help from Florio—began to make some revisions, expanding the opera to two acts in the hope that it might be given stagings by Domenico Barbaja, the Intendant at the Teato di San Carlo since 1809.
_	Bangladesh also sought more favorable relations with the oil-rich Muslim Middle East in the hope that foreign aid would be forthcoming.
_	After many attempts by Rayber to "civilize" the reluctant Tarwater, and many attempts by Tarwater to figure out his true destiny (be it as a prophet, which was his great-uncle's wish, or as an enlightened, educated modern man, which is his uncle Rayber's wish), Rayber devises a plan to take Tarwater back to the country where the damage had been done in the hope that confronting his past will allow him to leave it behind.
_	The signers expressed the hope that Great Britain and the colonies would be reconciled, but vowed that, if necessary, they would "go forth and be ready to sacrifice our lives and fortunes to secure her freedom and safety".
_	In the "Minor Section" section of the magazine "The Horseless Age" they said "The Peoria Rubber & Manufacturing Company of Peoria is pushing the motor gun carriage which they are making for Major Davidson in the hope that the Major may reach New York with it in time for the Dewey celebration."
_	"Men could not sustain a war of such magnitude and pain without hope–the hope that its very enormity would ensure that it could never happen again."
_	They programmed a course that should bring the Savior back to the Sol system 350,000 years later in the hope that the conflict will be resolved and Earth would be united.
_	Of the project Hernández wrote "the strength and spirit of these murdered women has been carried to all corners of the world with the hope that violence, in any of its manifestations, will be eradicated from the face of the earth."
_	Hirschfeld expressed the hope that his host and translator, Wilhelm Grundert, the director of the German-Japanese Cultural Institute, be made a professor at a German university.
_	Tao's parents, who knew about their son's sexual orientation and accepted his relationship with Hirschfeld, threw a farewell party when the two left China, with Tao's father expressing the hope that his son would become the "Hirschfeld of China".
_	The theme of the forest and of shepherds at play, the image of confident waiting for the loved one, produced an original offshoot; for this is the region of Maayon ( Ancient Tamil god ), and the love theme it represents symbolizes the devotee waiting in the hope that Maayon will eventually come and fill his soul, thus experiencing the joys of expectation.
_	An even newer hymnal, "Lutheran Service Book" (2006), has restored many of the former hymnal's features in the hope that more widespread use can be achieved.
_	Based on his information, a week later Irgun made arrangements to kidnap them in the hope that they would return to the café.
_	At first, the Adelantado tried to ride out the storm in the hope that the weather would relent; but at dawn the next day, the winds only intensified.
_	The song expresses the hope that they get better treatment in the future".
_	Juston's search for his mother leads him to an estranged aunt named Ginny Baker, who allows him in only with the hope that she be repaid with money that Juston received from all his media appearances following his "heroics" at the school from the previous volume.
_	Holt "never deviated from his whole-hearted support for American bombing of North Vietnam and the hope that steadily increasing the number of foreign troops deployed to South Vietnam would lead to military victory and a solution to the crisis".
_	The last two remaining missionaries chose to continue teaching practical skills in the hope that the restrictions might loosen, but one year later, after receiving indirect information that the government desired their departure, they shuttered the LMS mission and left Madagascar.
_	Drawing on the ground-breaking insights of the Oxford Preschool Research Project, the Program began with the hope that every child's first five years might be put to their fullest use towards the goals of lifelong physical, emotional, spiritual and relational health along with personal contentment, self-awareness discipline, a strong moral character and a sense of community responsibility.
_	He increasingly came to rely upon contacts with the British in the hope that London would successfully exert its influence on Hitler, where he had failed to, through threats and warnings.
_	Cold weather particularly bothered Perrine after his arsenic poisoning, and in 1824 he moved to Natchez, Mississippi (leaving his family in Illinois) in the hope that the climate would aid his recovery.
_	Barnard’s assistants continued to work for him in the hope that they would eventually be paid, and this was accomplished by Barnard’s collecting old Gothic and Romanesque sculpture remnants from the French countryside and selling them.
_	The Railway Commissioners promoted the plan since 1915 and Bathurst held off developing its own power generation scheme in the hope that the Railway scheme would proceed.
_	Dent does this out of jealous bitterness and the hope that Sloane would commit crimes based on the number two, thus confusing Batman.
_	The stream, among other things, published a primer to develop a basic lexicon in the hope that speaking “a common language” may help to better communicate and develop concepts of increasing clarity and meaning.
_	Indeed, that was the reason North Vietnam supported the Khmer Rouge during their fight against the Lon Nol regime, in the hope that the Kampuchean communists would adopt a pro-Vietnamese line upon their victory in the same way the Pathet Lao had done.
_	Micky and Jake start having counselling sessions at ACON in the hope that it will help
_	As a result, they counted on the hope that Greeks had, that by supporting them those countries would also help the Greek Kingdom to fulfill its expectations for economic progress and territorial expansion.
_	The battalion spent most of its time guarding areas of the United Kingdom against German invasion and grew to a size of well over 1,000 officers and men, with the hope that they would be able to see action overseas.
_	Besides M5S and League, Conte received two votes from independent deputies and one vote from Vittorio Sgarbi, a notable and controversial member of Forza Italia who has always heavenly criticised the M5S, but decided to support the cabinet in respect of Salvini and with the hope that a M5S government could lead toward their failure.
_	The donor expressed the hope that the City Council "might approve of giving it a fair trial for this purpose ... before appropriating it for any other use".
_	In 1794 yet another move was forced upon the school, and a new home was found at Stonyhurst Hall in Lancashire, an ideal county for the school to settle in because it was still a Catholic stronghold and its rural, isolated character provided the hope that the school would be left alone by the authorities.
_	While he was away, Whiteman famously kept his chair open in Beiderbecke's honor, in the hope that he would occupy it again.
_	During this time, a great many CB clubs emerged in the UK and they became centres of protest in the march towards legalisation, in the hope that existing equipment could be used legally.
_	Levy is heard, saying that the universe is a dark and indifferent place which human beings fill with love, in the hope that it will give the void a meaning.
_	En konung offras för folket" ("a dream vision, a king sacrificed for his people"), a text which was possibly added in the hope that it would not be considered to be an attempt at a historically faithful reconstruction.
_	Katherine then sleeps with Bobby's brother, J.R. Ewing, in the hope that it would persuade J.R. to help her in breaking up Bobby and Jenna.
_	The city granted the planners "exceptional building rights" in the hope that the project would boost business and commercial activity on Jaffa Road.
_	We might not be able to relate to the violence, but we comprehend the humanity — the flaws, the deceits, the crushed dreams, the hope that rises like a delicate flower from ashes."
_	At the story's end Paul dies at the hands of the Man-Thing and Barbara expresses the hope that she can "go back to just being a scientist again".
_	In desperation, Arbustus enlists the aid of Lester to fake she and Mary getting kidnapped in the hope that this will bring the men to their senses.
_	On 5 June, the Chinese embassy released a statement claiming that Chen was due to return home and had invented allegations of wrongdoing in the hope that he would be allowed to stay.
_	More recently, physicists at the University of Washington published an article discussing the hope that the technique will be useful to test aspects of what until now has been purely theoretical physics, and they also hope it might have practical applications for sensing conditions at atomic and molecular scales.
_	Four years before demolition, two water turbines of and diameter were installed, and were retained after the demise of the mill, in the hope that they could be used to generate DC power for the village.
_	Flo Richards is a farmer's wife with four grown children who had bought a small flock of type C Delaine Merino sheep and some angora rabbits before the Ring of Fire in the hope that she'd see more of her youngest daughter, Jen, once she'd finished her studies out of town.
_	Meeting with Archbishop Spellman in New York on September 3, U.S. President Franklin D. Roosevelt stated, "The European people will simply have to endure Russian domination, in the hope that in ten or twenty years they will be able to live well with the Russians."
_	After closer inspection, Pritchard ordered that the majority of the explosives be placed around the western pier and the rest against its abutment, in the hope that this would cause enough damage to destroy the aqueduct.
_	Intelligence agencies tested these drugs in the hope that they would provide an effective means of interrogation, with little success.
_	However, while the Jehovah's Witnesses sought to reassure the Nazi government that their goals were purely religious and non-political and they expressed the hope that the government would allow them to continue their preaching, Hitler still restricted their work in Nazi Germany.
_	The aim of the bombing campaign was to demoralize the North Vietnamese, damage their economy, and reduce their capacity to support the war in the hope that they would negotiate for peace, but it failed to have those effects.
_	There was still no majority in the "Reichstag" for any government; as a result, the "Reichstag" was dissolved and elections took place once more in the hope that a stable majority would result.
_	The victory of Western liberal states ending the Cold War inspired the hope that international relations could be guided by the ideals of democracy and the rule of law.
_	After a sixth-place finish, Trappatoni returned to Italy, whereupon Otto Rehhagel was appointed manager with the hope that he could bring the success he had earned with Werder Bremen to a team that was by then often referred to as "FC Hollywood".
_	In 1859, the Crown Land Department of the Province of Canada offered the ten townships of the area for sale with the hope that private enterprise would be enable them to be open to settlement.
_	He succeeded in getting all his works out of Germany and in the following years participated in a number of expositions of Holocaust art; he often expressed the hope that his works be kept together.
_	Cennet is silent in the hope that Safiye will come and rescue her.
_	In late October, Bryan was invited to train with Hawthorn in the hope that he might be drafted by the club who at the time were in need of a ruck.
_	Besides realizing the Social Duty, Djarum Scholarship Plus was made to increase Indonesian education quality with the hope that it will also improve the people’s welfare.
_	The pessimistic belief of resource scarcity emerged once again in the 1990s, and with it the hope that the newly independent states of Central Asia and the Caucasus would provide a resource boom - the new "Persian Gulf" - and with it competition for oil and gas in a 21st-century version of The Great Game.
_	According to Pierre-Simon Laplace in his "Essai Philosophique sur les Probabilités", Grandi's series was connected with Leibniz seeing "an image of the Creation in his binary arithmetic", and thus Leibniz wrote a letter to Jesuit missionary Claudio Filippo Grimaldi, court mathematician in China, in the hope that Claudio Filippo Grimaldi's interest in science and the mathematical "emblem of creation" might combine to convert the nation to Christianity.
_	He resigned on March 26, 2002, in the hope that Justice would reconsider the indictment.
_	For several weeks, the Bush administration considered the possibility of foregoing the use of force against Iraq, with the hope that economic sanctions and international pressure would eventually convince Hussein to withdraw from Kuwait.
_	But symptoms of tuberculosis brought his academic life to a close and, in the hope that the sea might benefit his health, he joined the medical department of the Royal Navy in 1848.
_	The former offers the hope that can be found in change that comes gradually until "I can see the way free from yesterday to a new beginning."
_	But he expresses the hope that, if Amenaide is indeed innocent, then "May the torch of love return shining, smiling and fair".
_	She expresses her gratitude to Mick, with the hope that they will get to know each other better.
_	In another letter he wrote: "I still cherish the hope that one day I'll come to write the chapter called 'The Travellings of Oblomov' and in it will try to show, how it is for a Russian man to search for things in his bags, to learn where this or that object lies, then ten times a day go mad with desperation, sighing for his Mother Russia...
_	During his internment in Trent Park many of the officers’ private conversations were secretly recorded by the British in the hope that they might reveal strategic information.
_	To relieve Turkish pressure on the Russians in the Caucasus, Churchill was part of a plan to distract the Turkish Army by attacking in the Dardanelles, with the hope that if successful the British could seize Constantinople.
_	The Curia supported Charles Philip's claim that the marriage was legal, in the hope that he would convert to Catholicism.
_	However, her uncle persuades her to encourage his affection, in the hope that being close to a son of Priam will protect against the hostility of the Trojans to the family of the traitor Calchas.
_	All attempts to reconcile this discrepancy are based on the hope that an accelerated staccato may appear to our senses as a legato."
_	Miles embarks upon a bizarre, if typically complicated, strategy: he will woo Ekaterin without telling her, in the hope that she can be persuaded to reconsider her stance.
_	The conference was opened by UNESCO Director General Koichiro Matsuura, who praised the project, saying that "UNESCO offers its support to this initiative, in the hope that it will enhance in a durable manner educational means for peace and tolerance."
_	As part of the HMI inspection in 1950, Mr Bernard Shore, a distinguished musician, visited the School and voiced his pleasure at the 'beautiful tone' of the School choir, expressing the hope that it would soon tackle four-part music.
_	Stryfe is defeated by Cable and both X-Force teams, but before escaping he telepathically forces Hope to mimic his vast and nearly uncontrollable psionic power in the hope that she will destroy her friends.
_	Hart calls for the use of empirical research in determining drug-related incidents across greatly varying scenarios, with the hope that scientifically grounded research will trump the racist policies currently in place, and decrease the unjust incarceration and punishment of black communities for drug use.
_	Tchaikovsky's father, who had also contracted cholera but recovered fully, sent him back to school immediately in the hope that classwork would occupy the boy's mind.
_	Wilson devoted a large percentage of his last days to Cancer Awareness and recovery and the hope that Cancer could be cured.
_	Marshall's widow expressed the hope that the tribute would inspire all law students at SMU to pursue the qualities of passion, diligence, courage and integrity that had distinguished her late husband's remarkable achievements.
_	A system relying on security through obscurity may have actual security vulnerabilities, but its owners or designers deliberately make the system more complex in the hope that attackers are unable to find a flaw.
_	There was also the hope that the sale of scrap material would be utilized to pay off loans and debts that the council had accumulated (ibid).
_	The Greer Bankhead Preservatioon and Restoration Project's Facebook page remains active in the hope that this historic property can still be saved.
_	Jeong intentionally focuses on suffering in the hope that in despair some hope can be found and that this can become the basis for a more successful future.
_	Two years pass and Emma has moved to Paris, where Dexter visits her on 15 July in the hope that they will get together again, this time for good.
_	Jinpachi, in his last act of morality, had announced the tournament in the hope that someone would be able to kill him before his potential reign of terror could start.
_	Because of this, parents are sometimes forced to abandon the child with the hope that the state-run orphanages will support them and provide adequate healthcare.
_	In the statement published after the sentence had been announced, the Russian Orthodox Church stated that while the actions of Pussy Riot were offensive to "millions of people," the Church called "on the state authorities to show mercy to the people convicted within the framework of the law, in the hope that they will refrain from repeating blasphemous actions."
_	Meanwhile, Janeway becomes delirious after coming into direct contact with the energy field, which is penetrating further into the ship, and is brought to the holodeck by Harry Kim in the hope that The Doctor can help her.
_	Its goals were to make a more exciting and challenging game in the hope that this would help advance "Q3A" as a professional sport.
_	Professor Will Harcourt-Smith and Dr. Esteban Sarmiento explain the limits of fossil evidence and the hope that this family might provide a new source of evidence.
_	The Jumanos were recruited to harvest mussels in the hope that they would contain gem-quality pearls.
_	Kofi Annan, United Nations Secretary-General, commended on August 18, 2005 what he called Israeli Prime Minister Sharon’s "courageous decision" to carry through with the painful process of disengagement, expressed the hope that "both Palestinians and Israelis will exercise restraint in this challenging period", and "believes that a successful disengagement should be the first step towards a resumption of the peace process, in accordance with the Road Map", referring to the plan sponsored by the diplomatic Quartet – UN, EU, Russia, and the United States – which calls for a series of parallel steps leading to two states living side-by-side in peace by the end of the year.
_	In "", author Matthew Alford observed that the American political characters in the film act benevolently; declaring, "When the President and his advisers do apply force it is with heavy hearts and purely as a way of demonstrating 'deterrence' in the hope that this will encourage the Russians to back down.
_	The Italians obliged in the hope that doing so would win the Chetniks over to collaboration and seriously weaken any future uprising in the area, which would have further disrupted rail traffic along the Split–Karlovac line.
_	Finally having a good income, he began collecting works of Polish art and art connected with Poland, in the hope that they would ultimately reach his homeland.
_	He claimed that Britain would not surrender because Churchill held out the hope that the Soviet Union might enter the war on the Allied side and so Germany had to eliminate that hope.
_	There they are given their next mission: infiltrating one of the Strogg's central communication hubs, the Tetranode, with an electromagnetic pulse bomb in the hope that it will put the main Strogg Nexus in disarray.
_	Haynau wanted to start a frontal attack in the hope that the three legions jointly would destroy the Hungarian troops.
_	Valérian is sent to try to familiarise them with Galaxity's high technology in the hope that they will then accept the relay.
_	CAPA encourages competition in the marketplace in the hope that their program will ultimately reduce expense to the consumer and the industry while increasing and assuring part quality.
_	And that led me logically to the hope that a number of zoos would collaborate on expeditions, prorating the animals among them [...]
_	They are in no way included as a definitive statement, but rather in the hope that they may be of assistance to musicians discovering these pieces for the first time.
_	Moxey ended his preface by stating that "the book offered to those interested along cost accounting lines, with the hope that it may help to a clearer understanding of the true aims of this important branch of accounting science."
_	It also outlines an abiding desire in his work to articulate cultural truths that remain unspoken in daily discourse, in the hope that they will bring a sort of redemption:
_	Permitted bootlegging is research time where technical staff are allowed to spend a certain amount of their time working on ‘pet-projects’ in the hope that some day there is some return for the company.
_	During this time, the leaders of the Jewish community in Zagłebie including Moshe Merin (Mojżesz Merin, in Polish) cooperated with the Germans in the hope that the survival of the Jews might be tied to their forced labour exploitation.
_	In his foreword to the published edition of the play, Oboler expressed the hope that its vision of a potential future would prove to be "a playwright's fancy".
_	In his last years, Joseph spoke eloquently against the injustice of United States policy toward his people and held out the hope that America's promise of freedom and equality might one day be fulfilled for Native Americans as well.
_	The Founders, led by a character identified only as the "Female Changeling", acquiesce to Odo's request in the hope that he will ultimately rejoin them.
_	However, the wounds of Christ, believed to offer healing to wounded souls and bodies, are mentioned throughout the poem in the hope that this sin of prideful "stiffneckedness" will be healed among fallen mortals.
_	For a long time people in Freiburg had lived in the hope that they would not have to suffer a major attack.
_	he wrote to the chief political figure in post-colonial New Hampshire, Meshech Weare, deploring that those who disagreed with the revolution had their property confiscated and expressing the hope that "politeness, justice, and lenity [be] among the shining characteristicks of the American States..."
_	In some versions of "Garners Gay", the narrator plucks up all rue and plants a sturdy oak in its place with the hope that it will grow strong and remain as true as the stars do to the sky.
_	According to "Design and Trend", it all started when a fan got the "Five Nights at Freddy’s: The Silver Eyes" novel with the hope that the novel will have the answers to the mysteries on the game franchise.
_	This success has given many young players in American Samoa the hope that one day they will be able to play professionally in the U.S.
_	If there is no particular suspect, a witness may be shown photographs or be taken to a neighbourhood in the hope that he recognises the perpetrator.
_	Promos are normally sent directly to broadcasters, such as music radio and television stations, and to tastemakers, such as DJs and music journalists, in advance of the release of commercial editions, in the hope that airplay, reviews, and other forms of exposure will result and stimulate the public's interest in the commercial release.
_	All sing of the sorrows of war and the hope that this will be the last, joined by a female chorus who carry pictures of their loved ones killed in the war.
_	Her voice here is mercilessly biting and derisive ("they count, and count, and lick their fingers, and count some more" "sc." the remaining winter pages in the tear-off calendar on the wall, and the money to be saved) as she accuses the potentates of stalling for time in the hope that the cold spell will pass and they will not have to make good on their pledges.
_	An early piece of work was an examination of the coal resources of the Cooktown district, and in August 1879 he began an exploring expedition to the most northerly part of Queensland in the hope that payable goldfields might be found.
_	Hewett returned to Sydney that year with the hope that this move would further her career as a playwright.
_	He then is allowed to escape from the Prussians in the hope that he will lead them to the secret notebook.
_	Sherman-Palladino cast her that day, on the hope that Graham's other show ("M.Y.O.B.") would be cancelled, which it soon was.
_	Meeting the real Molly again, Sir Timothy is overcome with guilt and tells her his life story in the hope that she can prevent her Tim from becoming him.
_	For several years Charles II had considered abdicating in favour of Ferdinando Carlo, but he delayed in the hope that when he did so things would be more secure for his son.
_	He expressed the hope that his client could address the court on 22 August and that a verdict would be delivered by 1 September 2017.
_	"On the other hand, it has been proved to the hilt that the three accused and their witnesses have fabricated evidence to pervert the course of justice in the hope that they would succeed in creating a reasonable doubt that would entitled them an acquittal."
_	Gull was reported as saying that her academic achievements answered any objections to the involvement of women in medicine; and expressed the hope that the scholarship would lead to a liberalisation of attitudes and greater recognition of women across the profession.
_	However, there was another Rolf Harris in captivity, in the Moscow Zoo, which Graeme had arranged to have delivered to the safari park in the hope that they would breed — and, a year later, in the ""Rolfus Harriscus"" enclosure, a baby Rolf Harris can be seen.
_	Barnett also suggested that either Henrik or Daniel opt out of the 1999 draft, in the hope that the same team that selected the first twin would select the other the following year.
_	Expecting a Labour victory in Newport, the meeting was scheduled for 19 October in the hope that the result would persuade many Conservatives of the merits of remaining in alliance with the Liberals as the only way to keep Labour out of power.
_	He was sent to travel abroad in the hope that he would forget his attachment.
_	In the episode "Shake Up," after learning about the Earthquake phenomenon, Blades expresses the hope that there is no such thing as a "Sky Quake."
_	When the Russian revolutionaries assassinated Tsar Alexander II of Russia, Marx expressed the hope that the assassination foreshadowed ‘the formation of a Russian commune’.
_	Astronomers had made careful photometric measurements of several stars known to be orbited by planets, in the hope that they might observe a dip in brightness caused by the transit of the planet across the star's face.
_	Bradford immediately put the settlement on military readiness and had the ordnance discharge three rounds in the hope that the shallop had not gone too far.
_	In 1943 Peev, an active anti-fascist, was executed by firing squad on suspicion of sending a coded message to the Soviet Union, after he sent an example of the text to Soviet archaeologists, in the hope that they could decipher its meaning.
_	As the British fell back, troops in the redoubts fought on, in the hope that they would be relieved by counter-attacks or to impose the maximum delay on the German attackers.
_	United Nations Security Council Resolution 344, adopted on December 15, 1973, on the eve of the peace conference arranged for in resolution 338, the Council expressed the hope that speedy progress would be made toward the establishment of the just and durable peace in the Middle East.
_	Ellie is then given the laptop by Director Bentley, posing as a Buy More customer who was given the laptop by mistake, in the hope that Ellie will be able to decode it.
_	Nearly as many expressed the hope that Mercedes was not pregnant given her nausea in the first "booty camp" scene, including Hyman, Kubicek, and West. Benigno felt Mercedes was acting "wildly out of character" in the episode.
_	Overall, he expresses the hope that viewers have "wised up and abandoned HIMYM until May’s series finale."
_	Maclaren was loaned to Scottish club Hibernian in January 2018, in the hope that more playing time would boost his chances of being selected by Australia for the 2018 FIFA World Cup.
_	When Declan states that his kind are forced to return to Tír Na nÓg when their homes are destroyed, Tess realises that Maurice had intended to sell the land in the hope that Declan would be banished from his life forever, and that Declan is therefore holding Maurice's children hostage.
_	President Garfield was brought to Long Branch in the hope that the fresh air and quiet might aid his recovery after being shot on July 2, 1881, an incident that left the assassin's bullet lodged in his spine.
_	In July, experiments were made with parasite fighters, in the hope that they could defend the airship.
_	Sabbath explains that the clocks were not invading the universe but fleeing Sabbath's allies in the time vortex, and that both the clocks and the Doctor were manipulated into coming here, in the hope that the Doctor would destroy them.
_	When Roquebert's ships appeared off Grand Port, Hillyar had his three ships in the harbour ready to sail at short notice and ensured that French tricolours were flying from Île de la Passe and other landmarks in the hope that the French could be lured into the shallow waters of the bay and defeated in a similar manner to the British defeat at the battle at Grand Port the previous year.
_	Recognizing the potential hazard of courting donors who wanted to avoid student activism, Birnbaum together with Irving Greenberg and Mel Stein created the non-profit Center for Soviet Jewry in 1965 in the hope that it would have more appeal donors.
_	As the story opens, Hagire's vessel become terminally ill with Tsunenaga Tamaki running the prison with the hope that what he presume to be his father dies so he can reign Deadman Wonderland unopposed.
_	He sings that "Our love has become salt like sea water/Our parched lips don't have words any longer", but clings to the hope that "It isn't true that our love has ended", indeed even as he farewells his former lover for the last time he sings "we love each other and that we're breaking up".
_	The letter was written in response to two compulsory purchase orders made by the Stevenage Development Corporation; it expressed the hope that 200 acres of countryside around the house could be preserved both as one of the last beauty spots within 30 miles of London and "because it is the Forster country of Howards End."
_	The publication of another new hymnal, "Lutheran Service Book" in 2006, has restored many of the former hymnal's features in the hope that more widespread use can be achieved.
_	Ten thousand doses of the drug are already being manufactured alongside the clinical trial in the hope that it will be approved for use in the coming months.
_	These lines were proposed before the economic potential of the Rhodesias was fully known, and in the hope that the expected gold discoveries would promote economic development.
_	Having established the stability of the clocks, the researchers are studying external influences and evaluating the remaining systematic uncertainties, in the hope that they can bring the clock's accuracy down to the level of its stability.
_	Over a three-year period, FXB provides communities with necessary life skills in the hope that they will become physically, financially and socially independent.
_	A strict set of rules that the Blue Bloods follow with the hope that it will eventually lead them back to Paradise.
_	Alwa recalls his mother's death, and how he had hoped that Lulu would replace her, while Lulu observes that his father put her on the stage in the hope that somebody rich would marry her and take her off his hands.
_	To counter this, Eddie Paynter was introduced into the side in the hope that his aggressive style and left handed batting (in contrast to the rest of the batting line-up which was right-handed) would disrupt the Australian bowlers.
_	Price action traders expect the market to adhere to the two attempts rule and will be waiting for the market to try to make a second swing in the pull-back, with the hope that it fails and therefore turns around to try the opposite - i.e. the trend resumes.
_	However, after some lackluster performances and criticism of his off-pitch lifestyle, the club decided to loan him to Nottingham Forest with the hope that the move would mature him and help him rediscover the form that got him into the Polish international set up in the years prior.
_	In the hope that the University could pull more excitement for events at the facility, the Coliseum underwent a significant renovation in 2005, which cost over $24 million.
_	Except for a local attack on the Roanoke Front that pushes the U.S. out of western Virginia, the Confederates stay on the defensive through the autumn, attempting to drain the U.S. dry in the hope that the U.S. population will become sick of the war.
_	This information is ultimately recalled at a later period with the hope that the previous priming will improve recall ability.
_	Steel expressed the hope that Thorpe would, "after a suitable period of rest and recuperation ... find many avenues where his great talents may be used."
_	He paid Australasian a fee of £2,100, partly in the hope that Australasian would distribute – an opportunity they declined after the film's screening.
_	The remains of these sailors were transferred to the Joint POW/MIA Accounting Command (JPAC) at Hickam Air Force Base, Hawaii, in the hope that they could be identified.
_	A designated camp site near Thomas and Blue Lakes within the wilderness was created by wilderness managers for the Gifford Pinchot National Forest, with the hope that it would mitigate resource damage in high use area and focus visitor use impact to smaller, more compact areas.
_	("The Americans are coming!") was a slogan used in Romania in the 1940s and 1950s, encapsulating the hope that an American-led invasion of Eastern Europe would topple the Soviet-backed, Communist-dominated government installed in early 1945.
_	Edmunds also sent parcels to herself, claiming that she, too, was a victim of the poisoner, in the hope that this would deflect suspicion from her and on to the shopkeeper, John Maynard, from whom the victims had purchased their chocolates.
_	Tarr wrote one play, "The New Frontier," a comedy that held tryouts in New Haven and Philadelphia, with the hope that it would make it to Broadway.
_	In addition to granting Palestine "non-member observer state status", the draft resolution "expresses the hope that the Security Council will consider favourably the application submitted on 23 September 2011 by the State of Palestine for admission to full membership in the United Nations, endorses the two state solution based on the pre-1967 borders, and stresses the need for an immediate resumption of negotiations between the two parties."
_	Although the Cost of Knowledge movement was not mentioned, the statement indicated the hope that the move would "help create a less heated and more productive climate" for ongoing discussions with research funders.
_	They have been reinstated for the 2006/07 season, with the hope that the stars of the future will progress to the National League Squad.
_	They had no scruples in shooting any blacks in the hope that the victim might be the escaped murderer.
_	MacArthur expressed the hope that the Eighth Army could withdraw to Japan by the end of the year.
_	Noted efficiency expert Frederick Taylor recommended that university president James A. Beaver hire Hugo Diemer, a professor from the University of Kansas, in the hope that Diemer would create an industrial engineering curriculum at Penn State.
_	Records, the first record label to sign the band, pressured Trent Reznor to record a very similar album with the hope that it would have similarly successful singles.
_	In a speech to his men, Hood expressed the hope that they would give their support to Taylor and avenge their comrades "whose bones lay bleaching upon the fields of Middle Tennessee."
_	It is almost certain that the Zangid rulers delayed sending troops to Damascus out of the hope that their rival Unur might lose his city to the Crusaders.
_	In 1824, Thomas Jefferson wrote to Alden, expressing the hope that his University of Virginia could someday possess the richness of Allegheny's library.
_	It also expressed the hope that there would be an English equivalent of Cuvier's work, given the popularity of natural history resulting from the works of Thomas Bewick ("A History of British Birds" 1797–1804) and George Montagu ("Ornithological Dictionary", 1802).
_	When the ship SS "Morea" reached the port of Marseille on 8 July 1910, Savarkar escaped from his cell in the hope that his friend would be there to receive him in a car.
_	Rather, they felt her comment was genuinely expressing the hope that, the next time an assassination was attempted, the President would be killed.
_	The move to April was prompted, in part, by the hope that a $75,000 D.C. government grant would allow the festival to occur.
_	Peter, however, does everything he can to make Simon spend more time with Carla, in the hope that Simon will warm to her.
_	Sixtus himself has never explicitly asserted his right to the throne; rather, he has stated that he would prefer to remain regent in the hope that one of Carlos Hugo's sons may return to traditional Carlist ideology.
_	Covenant joins them in the hope that the recovery of the Staff of Law will somehow assist in his return to his "real" world.
_	In 2007, for the first time, the grand final was staged in the larger Goulburn Valley Football League ground, Mooroopna in the hope that it would attract a larger crowd, in excess of 3,000 people turned up to watch the game.
_	Streator wants to destroy it, believing that the knowledge contained in it is too dangerous, while the others in his group want to learn what other spells it contains—partly in the hope that there is a spell to resurrect the dead.
_	Rather, he argues, jizya allows the non-Muslim to live amongst Muslims and take part in Islamic civilization in the hope that the non-Muslim will convert to Islam.
_	The NZCPA supports this decision as it enables him to preserve a strong relationship with the board of NZC in the hope that he can again contribute to the game in New Zealand at some stage in the future.
_	The comic was part of an experiment for Marvel where they published a number of new titles for only 99 cents, in the hope that they would attract new, young readers who might have been put off by the then US$1.50/1.95 standard prices for comic books.
_	But he had been followed by a tout, and a British Secret Service surveillance team working under Winter's direction and led by Major Carew and Lt Gilbert Price were stalking him in the hope that he would lead them to Collins or to other high-value IRA targets.
_	Through his company Helicon, Tully subsequently began working to develop a drug to raise levels of the CREB protein, in the hope that it would improve memory in humans.
_	The Confederate States entered the war with the hope that its near monopoly of the world cotton trade would force the European importing countries, especially Great Britain and France, to intervene in the war on her behalf.
_	Lattimore's lawyer Abe Fortas tried to defend him by claiming McCarran had deliberately asked questions about arcane and obscure matters that took place in the 1930s in the hope that Lattimore would not be able to recall them properly, thereby giving grounds for perjury indictments.
_	Fred in the hope that she will be able to use her genius level intellect to find out how to solidify him and bind him to the mortal plane.
_	In January the club signed former Linfield midfielder Philip Lowry in the hope that fortunes would improve with Lowry creating a reasonable impact scoring an amazing outside of box shot to beat Coleraine in the Irish Cup and he scored again in a 2–1 win over Linfield.
_	These include "apricot-stone fire sparrows" carrying burning tinders attached to their legs inside an apricot stone, with the hope that they would fly into the enemy's granaries and set them on fire, and "magic-fire flying crows", artificial birds powered by four rocket tubes.
_	Will is distraught, but he holds onto the hope that they will be re-united.
_	The vote was a major precondition for the EU and IMF to jointly release the funds, which are supposed to cover all financial needs in 2012 and 2013, with the hope that Greece can start lending again at the private capital markets in 2014.
_	While the majority of people who initially arrived at Jamestown in the first few years of colonization were Englishmen, the Virginia Company did hire artisans from Prussia, the Netherlands and Poland to fill the ranks of colonists, with the hope that they would be able to produce profitable goods for the company to sell in England.
_	The German bombardment caused many casualties as the British infantry assembled but no retaliatory fire was opened, in the hope that the German artillery would not be provoked.
_	(The application for this status is said to have been made in the hope that it would bring in additional funding: both to counteract the impact of anticipated cuts, and to enable new building works to be undertaken.)
_	The shapes are also being made available to others, with the hope that people will come up with many interesting ways to use them.
_	The declarer goes through the motions of executing a genuine squeeze where none exists, in the hope that a defender misreads the actual position and misdefends.
_	Major high-tech companies such as Google, Verizon and Microsoft have funded schools to provide them the ability to teach their students through technology, in the hope that this would lead to improved student performance.
_	Off the field plans were under way to secure a permanent home for the club instead of their rented home and several sites were being looked at as possibilities with the hope that one would be secured by the end of 2009.
_	The Commission presented the British Government with $500,000 to establish the squadron with the hope that it would be manned by Newfoundlanders.
_	Antoinette, the main female character, at first has a passionate crush on an older woman, and then falls for Dennis, a homosexual who had previously courted her, partly as a disguise for his actual sexuality, and partly in the hope that she might cure him.
_	Also in 2001, in the village of Sungai Temun, supported by private sponsors, opened a Seletar Cultural Centre with its own museum exhibition, which aims to preserve cultural heritage in the hope that the younger generations will not forget the about their roots.
_	After the affair between David Longfield and Katrine became known, David Longfield's father (Beatty's grandfather), David Vandeleur Beatty (1815–1881), arranged for his son to be posted to India in the hope that the scandalous relationship might end.
_	A financier on the brink of ruin reflects over his failings, and gives £50 to various down-and-outs in the hope that they can make something better of their lives.
_	The experience also left him with the hope that the Spirit of Beauty would free "this world from its dark slavery."
_	Jimmy offers the hope that they will someday be in a position to change their society.
_	One of the warehouses, containing some 45,000 books, was emptied according to the instructions of shareholder Sophie Choi, and one helper at the bookshop said that Choi ordered the stock destroyed in the hope that the return of Lee Bo, her husband, would be expedited.
_	Markets immediately responded well to the suspension, in the hope that the decline in prices would finally end.
_	Initially named Oron Training Institute (OTI), the school was established in order to turn the brightest schoolboys into teachers, and in the hope that some of them might eventually become Ministers.
_	By the summer of 1922, a vicious circle had been created: the more Germany defaulted on reparations, the more the British pressed for reductions in reparations, which in turn led to further defaults by the Germans out of the hope that reparations might be cancelled altogether.
_	It was British policy to encourage Germany to default on reparations out of the hope that this might force the French to occupy the Ruhr in response.
_	In November 1922, the British member of the reparations commission, Sir John Bradbury, told the American Colonel James Logan that the British government wanted "to let M. Poincaré try out his policy in the face of their sulky disapproval in the hope that, when M. Poincaré had gone a little way in his independent policy, the French people, feeling consequently the weakening of the franc, increased taxation, etc., would rise in their wrath and oust M. Poincaré before too much harm had been done."
_	The station had been constructed by the London and South Western Railway (LSWR) in the hope that the area would attract residential development, but in the event this never materialised.
_	Publication was suspended by the Board of Directors in 1942 with the hope that it would be reinstated at the resumption of peace.
_	Hinnerk Schaper intervened, however, and buried most of the statues in the grounds of the nearby Schloss Bellevue, today the official residence of the Federal President of Germany, in the hope that one day, when Germany could be more accepting of monuments to its past, they might resurface.
_	Vera wants to help Vladimir repay his debts and offers him her jewels, but Vladimir starts courting a young and rich widow in the hope that she will marry him and he will pay off with all his debts.
_	Those strikes, lasting from 3–22 January 1945, included a thrust into the South China Sea, in the hope that major units of the Imperial Japanese Navy could be drawn into battle.
_	In 1423, Despot Andronikos Palaiologos ceded it to the Republic of Venice with the hope that it could be protected from the Ottomans who were besieging the city.
_	The tie was played on clay courts in the United States in the hope that the Americans would defeat Murray on his weakest surface.
_	By the strain of anxiety and hard work his health and strength were seriously impaired, while the death of his wife was also a great shock to him; in the hope that rest in his native land might restore him, he left India, reaching England in April 1862.
_	Fred is gay and is too afraid to admit his sexuality to Mick, so takes him to a gay club in the hope that Mick might 'cotton on'.
_	She tries many different things in the hope that Suraj will fall in love with her, but to no avail.
_	The inscription reads: "This memorial, dedicated to the memory of 63 persons who died in an airplane crash at this location, March 17, 1960, was erected by public subscription in the hope that such tragedies will be eliminated."
_	The Army Corps expressed the hope that federal funding can be found to conduct emergency infrastructure repairs.
_	Male bees that are away from emergence areas stake out flowering plants in the hope that virgin females will arrive seeking food.
_	At Rome he was able to vindicate himself, but he was not allowed to return to Ireland by the English authorities until 1665, and then only in the hope that he would favour the Remonstrance of Peter Valesius Walsh.
_	In August 1992 VUWSA decided that Radio Active could not make any more losses, and sold the station to radioactive ltd in the hope that the station could become financially viable.
_	An increase in business leads him to advertise for a third, and he hires the forlorn-looking Bartleby in the hope that his calmness will soothe the irascible temperaments of the other two.
_	The inclusion of the celestial bodies indicates Nepal's permanence, and the hope that Nepal will enjoy the same longevity as the Sun and the Moon.
_	She allegedly made overseas telephone calls to government officials she knew with the hope that he would be arrested, thereby giving her a good excuse to forbid her husband from communicating with his friend.
_	Finally realising the price he has paid, he breaks off the affair and takes a job as a mobile librarian, in the hope that this will keep him away from predatory women.
_	Crosses of this nature were erected in the hope that pilgrims and those passing by would pray for the soul of the Queen.
_	A donation campaign was simultaneously launched, its goal being to facilitate improved care for Tim with the hope that the proper neurological treatment it would fund would help him regain control of his body, as he had responded positively to similar, but minimal and inconsistent treatment in the past.
_	In 1944, with Germany rapidly losing ground in the war in the face of the advancing Allied armies, Bandera was released, in the hope that he could deter the advancing Soviet forces.
_	Sixteen years later, Londo sacrifices his life to rescue Sheridan and Delenn from the Drakh, in the hope that they in turn can save Centauri Prime.
_	Thorne to send the now-popular Jon on an expedition to kill the mutineers at Craster's Keep in the hope that he will be killed before he can be elected the new Lord Commander.
_	In the letter to his sons, whom he addresses as "dulcissimi" (“my sweetest”), Marcellus expresses the hope that they and their families will, in case of sickness, find support and remedies in their father’s manual, without intervention by doctors ("sine medicis intercessione").
_	Frederick died in December 1510, and Albert of Hohenzollern was chosen as his successor early in 1511 in the hope that his relationship to his maternal uncle, Sigismund I the Old, Grand Duke of Lithuania and King of Poland, would facilitate a settlement of the disputes over eastern Prussia.
_	According to testimony by Vafiadis, Zachariadis had expressed the hope that if the city fell and became the Communists' capital, the PDG would be recognized by the Soviet Union and other Eastern Bloc states.
_	Unlike the Germans, MI5 was eager for Chapman to return, in the hope that, as a trusted asset, he could pick up significant information about the enemy.
_	The title reflected the hope that the publication would become an intellectual "beacon".
_	Anton reveals that Kit was allowed to escape from Spain, and that he has been watched constantly ever since in the hope that he would betray himself.
_	The House was named in honor of Gerard Manley Hopkins, the “greatest poet in the Jesuit order” and “the first modern poet throughout the world, with the hope that those working for the Scranton student publications would look to him as a role model and a source of inspiration for their work.
_	Akasha and Enkil had summoned the twins in the hope that the witches could enlighten them on the form that they had taken, and how they could satisfy their endless thirst for blood.
_	In a ceremony involving the newlyweds exchanging a handful of flame, Prince Colwyn and Princess Lyssa plan to marry and form an alliance between their rival kingdoms in the hope that their combined forces can defeat the Beast's army.
_	Simultaneously, it serves as a reminder that insulin controls diabetes but does not cure it; ultimately, it stands for the hope that a cure will soon be found.
_	It is alleged that soccer federation president João Havelange appointed him in the hope that journalists would be less critical of the national team if one of their own was in charge.
_	When the siege on Erunmu began, Akogun was assigned to the warfront with the hope that he could turn the tides of war while Ijaola was sent on a mandatory royal assignment to Ibadan with a message for Maye, an Ibadan warlord.
_	The club employs a Youth Development Officer whose role is to introduce the game into new schools and propagate interest in the sport with the hope that some of these young players will join the club during or after school.
_	Huch lamented the aspirituality and technocentrism of her own day and expressed the hope that after the rejection of Romanticism in the first half of the 19th century the intellectual achievements of Romanticism would be regenerated.
_	In 1895 Drinkwater fell ill and went on a visit to Wokingham, Berkshire in the hope that it would improve his health.
_	Because Northcott did not seem to know whether he had even met Walter, much less killed him, she clung to the hope that he was still alive.
_	"Shimmer" is beautiful in the way that a collapsing building is; more beautiful, because throughout it you can cling to the hope that the building will somehow put itself back together."
_	Cryonics is the low-temperature preservation of humans who cannot be sustained by contemporary medicine, with the hope that healing and resuscitation may be possible in the future.
_	The Chinese government attempted to stall for as long as possible and leaked the full contents of the Twenty-One Demands to the European powers in the hope that due to a perceived threat to their own political and economic spheres of interest, they would help contain Japan.
_	When Hardie arrived from Exeter Hall, he expressed the hope that "no working man bring discredit on the class to which he belonged by denying to women those political rights which their fathers had won for them".
_	As Jim leaves, a prized colt is let loose by a farmhand named Curly in the hope that Jim will be blamed.
_	He showed the book to Martin Scorsese on the set of "Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore" in the hope that he would consider the project.
_	The local council granted a lease on the Llangollen railway station building, as well as of track, with the hope that the railway would improve the local economy and bring more tourists to Llangollen.
_	It concentrates on identifying the physical traces of radical Melbourne, in the hope that geographical familiarity will provide a cultural and political bridge between the struggles of the past and the people of the present.
_	The newspaper further commented that the summit had "a sort of "Waiting for Godot" quality about it — European leaders biding time, neither creating a crisis nor mending fences, in the hope that the American election in November will somehow spare them from the choice between having to deal with Bush and letting Iraq, and NATO, slide into further disarray."
_	Such treatments include those targeted to associated sleep disorders with the hope that it would play an essential part of the treatment process of NSRED.
_	As a result, the Banker offered her the chance to return her winnings in the hope that she would leave with 1p.
_	It "is enabling scientists to begin unravelling the complex world of small-amphibian behavior in the hope that better understanding will improve conservation."
_	Their stated objective in designing the MLI program was to reach those large segments of mainstream North American Muslim and Jewish communities between which there are few, if any, substantive relationships; their objectives for the program furthermore indicated the hope that the MLI program would educate North American Muslims about Judaism, Zionism and Israel, but that an outcome of the program would be reciprocal.
_	Former UN Special Rapporteur on the occupied Palestinian Territories Richard Falk said of the verdict that it was "a sad outcome, above all for the Corrie family that had initiated the case back in 2005, but also for the rule of law and the hope that an Israeli court would place limits on the violence of the state, particularly in relation to innocents and unarmed civilians in an occupied territory".
_	There they see the fruits of their victory, a newly restored land and the hope that the Earth will be fully restored one day.
_	In fact, as British government papers now show, the British entertained talks with the IRA in the hope that this would fragment the movement further, and scored several intelligence coups during the talks.
_	For similar reasons to their young acquisitions, Watford loaned players such as O'Toole, Billy Gibson and Marvin Sordell to lower-league sides, in the hope that they would gain first-team experience.
_	To prevent morale from dropping further, Cao Ren recruited 300 volunteers to form an assault force led by general Niu Jin, in the hope that they could score a minor victory or demonstrate bravery on the field to boost morale.
_	Alice steps outside of the abandoned house, which the pair have settled into, and decides to try to get upstairs, beyond the broken staircase, in the hope that she will find medicine.
_	Jack David, senior fellow at the Hudson Institute and former presidential deputy assistant secretary of defense for combating weapons of mass destruction states that "by clinging to the hope that Pyongyang can be induced to give up its ambitions for nuclear weapons and long-range missiles, officials are distracted from pursuing policies that might actually enable the people of North Korea to end the Kim dynasty" and that America's goal should be regime change.
_	She said "the situation in Romania remains fragile", expressing the hope that all political actors in the country are determined to bear "durable and irreversible" the rule of law and judicial independence.
_	The intention was to arrest more drug offenders, given the hope that a higher risk of getting caught in itself would have a more preventative effect then a long sentence.
_	Timmes acted as a go-between for the US Embassy and the South Vietnamese Government during the Fall of Saigon and was instrumental in facilitating the resignation of President Nguyễn Văn Thiệu on 21 April and the ascent of Dương Văn Minh to the presidency on 27 April in the hope that he would be able to negotiate a ceasefire with the North Vietnamese.
_	The Missouri legislature hastily passed a bill appropriating $275,000 ($ in modern dollars) to convert an old beauty school in St. Louis into the new Lincoln University School of Law, in the hope that would satisfy the court.
_	After the song is sung (usually just once), party guests sometimes add wishes like "and many more!" expressing the hope that the birthday person will enjoy a long life.
_	From 8–18 February, the Free State suspended executions and offered an amnesty in the hope that Anti-Treaty fighters would surrender.
_	The vacated site which fronted onto Great Junction Street was bought by the hospital in the hope that it might be used for future expansion.
_	Disa knows that a life living rough on the streets is no place for a new born baby, so that same day she decides to leave her baby in a cardboard box on the Butcher's doorstep, with the hope that Diane will take her in.
_	Despite the distance, Agnes treasured the hope that she would reunite with her parents once again when she passes the nursing exam and applies to work in the States.
_	In early planning for the library the President expressed the hope that Eleanor Roosevelt's papers would eventually find a place here.
_	James I began his reign in the hope that he could reconcile the huge Puritan/Anglican divide — a divide that was as much political as it was religious.
_	In 1967, former Searchers drummer Chris Curtis contacted London businessman Tony Edwards, in the hope that he would manage a new group he was putting together, to be called Roundabout.
_	Lithuanian diplomacy characterized the concession as a "necessary evil" that would enable Lithuania to preserve its independence and maintained the hope that it was merely a temporary retreat.
_	The dedication is addressed to his 'Dear Boys', 'in the hope that they will hate all that is low and base, and love all that is noble, great and good.
_	Steph lets Charlie leave the cabin on his own in the hope that Toadie finds him.
_	The newspaper accepts that the list is an artificial exercise, but seeks to celebrate people representing much-needed values, in the hope that they will be seen as role models.
_	In the hope that he would be redrafted, Begley trained with Collingwood prior to the 2008 AFL Draft.
_	Clym studies night and day to prepare for his new career as a schoolmaster while Eustacia clings to the hope that he'll give up the idea and take her abroad.
_	In early and developing states, this role was often played by the "stationary bandit" who defended villagers from roving bandits, in the hope that the protection would incentivize villagers to invest in economic production, and the stationary bandit could eventually use its coercive power to expropriate some of that wealth.
_	A patron of the club, Singh would often donate a month's salary to organise an annual tournament in the hope that drawing the youth to sports would prevent them from going astray and help in their job prospects as well.
_	In letters written February 21, Knox unambiguously indicated he would play no such part, expressing the hope that the army's force would only be used against "the Enemies of the liberties in America."
_	To take one example, the "Dezir al nacimiento de Juan II" expresses the hope that the prince Juan will prove to be the “maestro de los que ssaben” (the master of those who know).
_	The idea behind is the hope that the experience of these players will help improve the standards, and give the youngsters at home a boost.
_	It was donated to the state by the Asheville Chamber of Commerce in 1964, in the hope that future governors would spend more time in—and hence pay more attention to—the western portion of the state.
_	It had been introduced to Canada in the hope that it would survive the severe Canadian winters.
_	Nathan is absent, having gone to Las Vegas in the hope that his new ability of magic will make him a millionaire.
_	IndiaGlitz called "Businessman" a "Mahesh-Magnified film" and stated "It is clear that the director throws all logic to the winds in the hope that Mahesh the Prince and a few cheeky one-liners will salvage the film.
_	Magistrates were appointed to administer the territory in the hope that they would gradually, with the help of missionaries, undermine tribal authority.
_	India provides an example of the British Empire pouring its money and expertise into a very well built system designed for military reasons (after the Mutiny of 1857), with the hope that it would stimulate industry.
_	Besides M5S and League, Conte received two votes from independent deputy and one vote from Vittorio Sgarbi, a notable FI member who have always heavenly criticised the M5S, but decided to support the cabinet in respect of Salvini and with the hope that a Five Stars government could lead toward their failure.
_	The title character, Florencia Grimaldi, is a famous opera soprano returning to her homeland to sing at the opera house in Manaus with the hope that her performance will attract her lover Cristóbal, a butterfly hunter who has disappeared into the jungle.
_	Studies are underway to use and develop the dog as a model of this devastating disease of humans in the hope that characterizing and successfully treating these tumors in dogs may lead to improved therapies for humans afflicted with this disease.
_	According to Electronic Privacy Information Center director Marc Rotenberg, a lawsuit challenging Google's privacy policy practices as a violation of California law was not filed in the hope that their informal complaints could be resolved through discussions.
_	Prince Mansour bin Turki bin Abdulaziz Al-Saud expressed the hope that women would be able to vote in the 2009 elections.
_	Chinese Boy charms (Traditional Chinese: 童子連錢; Simplified Chinese: 童子连钱; Pinyin: "tóng zǐ lián qián") are Chinese numismatic charms that depict images of boys in the hope that these charms would cause more boys to be born in the family of the holder, they usually have an eyelet to be carried, hung, or worn.
_	The defence sought to delay the trial as long as possible by making procedural difficulties, in the hope that the publicity surrounding the vom Rath murder would quiet down and the trial would be less politicized, but the prosecution was also in no hurry.
_	He joined the navy and served in the Crimean War, then took up a post in Indochina in the hope that the climate would help his chronically ulcerated throat.
_	For Yahoo's ranks, still shell-shocked from deep cuts in 2008 — including 1,600 axed jobs — the hope that Bartz brings is increasingly mixed with a dose of fear and uncertainty.
_	In the 1980s, milk cartons in the United States often printed photos of missing children with the hope that someone would recognize the photograph and provide information to police.
_	The aim was to restore endemic species to the area, with the hope that they would once again thrive there.
_	It limits the newcomers on sharing a variety of social public goods offered by municipal government, which instigates their desire for housing in the hope that they could be treated as local residents by purchasing real estate.
_	As Ty wants Rachel Kinski (Caitlin Stasey) to be the lead singer, he organises a group of bad singers to audition first, in the hope that his bandmates will pick Rachel.
_	A large crowd heard the Revd Basil Bourchier express the hope that "no one here today will forget what Mr Bottomley did to revive the spirits of our men at the Front".
_	Sometimes, in that situation, a fielder will not try to catch a ball that is close to the foul line in the hope that the ball will go foul at the last second—neither catching the ball nor letting it drop would prevent a defeat.
_	We must give those who need it the hope that science is actively probing the affliction robbing them of their sight."
_	Others, such as Chakravarti Rajagopalachari, advocated offering an olive branch to the British, supporting them in this crucial time in the hope that the gesture would be reciprocated with independence after the war.
_	Although the election was boycotted by the Mujahideen, the government left 50 of the 234 seats in the House of Representatives, as well as a small number of seats in the Senate, vacant in the hope that the guerrillas would end their armed struggle and participate in the government.
_	Sometimes, fishermen's wives would keep black cats at home too, in the hope that they would be able to use their influence to protect their husbands at sea.
_	The Vatican issued statements concerning the hope that the peace talks could resume between Israel and Palestine.
_	Her very public antics to draw attention to Morple's despicable conduct come to the notice a rival newspaper, who send journalist Jim Brent (Lyon) to offer to write up Jill's story, in the hope that he will be able to dig up some dirt on Morple.
_	In the hope that the victim will hand over his money without the need for force, he hides the revolver in his pocket.
_	In the film she expresses the hope that someday future human explorers might somehow have the opportunity to investigate the Kepler-186 system in person.
_	The gang soon begin threatening Miss Morstan in the hope that she will hand over her share of the treasure to them.
_	It has been contended by some supply-side critics that the argument to lower taxes to increase revenues was a smokescreen for "starving" the government of revenues in the hope that the tax cuts would lead to a corresponding drop in government spending, but this did not turn out to be the case.
_	The reviewer of "The Times" expressed the hope that people in Ireland would not hear of the show: "Ireland has enough grievances to go on with".
_	On 23 August 2005 the farm's owners announced that they would be ceasing breeding of animals in the hope that Mrs Hammond's remains would be returned.
_	Climbing pioneers would attach the rope to themselves; in the event of a fall, the rope would usually cause injury to the climber in the hope that it prevented death.
_	It is presented as a tribute to the brave men and courageous women who gave their all so that Democracy might survive, and in the hope that America may continue to remain honorably at Peace."
_	Adam explains that Loretta had told him about Jake and that he was the biggest mistake of her life in the hope that Adam would take her back.
_	At the release, Wagner expressed the hope that the memorial "would be at least partially built" by the 2016 anniversary, indicating that the original time line would not be met.
_	The new edict declared freedom of conscience, but not of open worship, to all peaceful dissidents in hope of their conversion to what it declared as the truth of Roman Catholicism along with the hope that the Catholic hierarchy would accept the reforms asked for by the Protestant Estates General of Orleans.
_	After Powers' criminal identity is revealed to the public and he finally brings retribution to his father's killer, Terry decides to continue his role as Batman to make up for his past sins, in the hope that it is his chance at redemption.
_	The only reason he gives these sermons, Fabrice says, is in the hope that Clélia will come to one, allowing him to see her and speak to her.
_	Some schools integrate music with other subjects in the hope that the music and the other subjects enhance each other.
_	Also, much of the plot revolves around Jones' efforts to obtain an appointment to see President Franklin Roosevelt, with the hope that he can convince the President that the Allies can use his supernatural abilities to help the war effort.
_	He made this move in the hope that he could use the Chateauguay Patriotes as a stepping stone to eventually coaching in the NHL.
_	They are investing $10.1 million to collaborate with Spira's lab with the hope that his discoveries—and potential therapies—could then apply to the population at large.
_	News of Dac's defection leaked within days and the Politburo decided to proceed with the offensive given that Dac's knowledge was limited to the planned attacks on Saigon but to delay the start of the offensive by 1 week, other than around the DMZ, in the hope that the Allies would think the Saigon attack had been cancelled and lower their guard.
_	Worse, the only other voices opposing the war emanated from the extreme right, particularly America Firsters, a group suspected of harboring the hope that Hitler would eventually triumph . . . .
_	With full knowledge of the deep bond of sympathy which has existed and has been strengthened over the past thirty years between the Government of the United States and the Jewish people of Palestine, I have been authorized by the provisional government of the new state to tender this message and to express the hope that your government will recognize and will welcome Israel into the community of nations.
_	But when she hears word that Tito has sent Berenice, of whom she was jealous, back to Jerusalem, Vitellia tells Sesto to delay carrying out her wishes with the hope that Tito will choose her (Vitellia) as his empress.
_	The protagonist of has plastic surgery done in the hope that she would become beautiful and loved, but after meeting a girl stitched from corpses, realizes that it was the girl who was truly beautiful since she gave love.
_	He expressed the hope that his experiment would "help to change this prejudice."
_	The 18th-century saw many wealthy residents of Batavia build country houses outside the city wall in the hope that they could live free from the malaria disease plaguing the Old Town.
_	She is known to have traveled to several cities in Western Europe, and to have become a mistress of Philipp Ferdinand of Limburg Stirum, apparently in the hope that he would marry her.
_	In addition to granting Palestine "non-member observer State status", the resolution "expresses the hope that the Security Council will consider favourably the application submitted on 23 September 2011 by the State of Palestine for admission to full membership in the United Nations", endorses the two state solution based on the pre-1967 borders, and stresses the need for an immediate resumption of negotiations between the two parties.
_	Adolf Diestelkamp, another member of the commission, expressed the hope that the work of the commission would be a "decisive factor in our fight to win back the German east", that is, territories which Germany ceded to Poland after World War II.
_	Against the advice of his Minister of Finance, Hernán Sáenz Jiménez, and the International Monetary Fund (IMF), Carazo instructed the Central Bank of Costa Rica to borrow heavily to maintain the value of the colón, the local currency, in the hope that an economic recovery was close at hand.
_	Following creative disagreements between Dontnod and Sony, and the subsequent cancellation of the project in February 2011 because of budget cuts, the project was presented at the 2011 Gamescom trade fair in the hope that it would garner the attention necessary to secure another publishing deal.
_	Wachner co-wrote a paper for the Audio Engineering Society (AES) in 1975, addressing the problem of differing power claims in the amplifier industry and the hope that power rating standards set by the Federal Trade Commission would narrow the 'credibility gap'.
_	The male, to reduce the risk of this, often presents the female with a gift such as a fly when approaching in the hope that this will satisfy her hunger.
_	It extends the hope that "the company will keep a good ring which was very much wanted at Barnes Common".
_	In July 1999, at the end of its mission, the Lunar Prospector probe was deliberately crashed into Shoemaker crater, near the Moon's south pole, in the hope that detectable quantities of water would be liberated.
_	Its operational capacity was retained until 31 July, in the hope that a new investor would come forward.
_	The expedition was also intended to demonstrate to the Spanish that Allied forces could strike along their vulnerable coastline with ease, and was co-ordinated with a French offensive on eastern Spain, in the hope that this would force Spain to the peace table.
_	In a recent "What If?" issue, Logan was present when Daken was born and was able to save him from the people who would have raised him in the original course of events, taking him to live in seclusion in the mountains in the hope that he could raise Daken away from the kind of life he has lived himself.
_	Sreekumar watches it leave, and when he turns away he sees Kunjoonjamma refixing the door bell with the hope that Girly will return one day.
_	There are also a few isolated instances where Hutu have converted in the hope that they could hide within the Muslim community and thereby escape arrest.
_	Hamber as a new protected area which bridged the gap between several existing mountain parks in the hope that his action would spur the Canadian government to declare Hamber a new national park.
_	Sisko also notifies Kira that he will endorse the non-aggression pact offered to Bajor by the Dominion, in the hope that it will keep Bajor out of the coming fight and in turn, war.
_	The Samsung Chairman and principal owner Lee Kun-hee, given a 3-year suspended sentence for tax evasion and illegal bond dealing, was reportedly pardoned by the South Korean president Lee Myung-bak with the hope that his connections and financial support would boost the chances of Pyeongchang.
_	In the next season the team will change a lot of coaches, Stelian Gherman, Alexandru Pelici, Gheorghe Mulţescu, Marcel Rusu, Alin Artimon, in the hope that the team will keep their position in the first league, but without success.
_	He finally manages to completely destroy the career and life of an aspiring young author (Ridges) and his girlfriend (Haydon), who curses him with the hope that he will die friendless.
_	His passionate address, “Charity, or How the Jews Care for Their Poor,” deeply moves the audience, particularly affecting one philanthropist who donates a large sum of money to the Federation in the hope that his act will serve as an example to all Jews to further the Federation's charity work.
_	He is devastated, and Leanne tricks him into believing that she visited Amy and she wrote him a letter, when in fact, unbeknownst to Lee, Leanne wrote the letter herself in the hope that Lee would take her back.
_	This leads Spencer to imagine that something more serious will happen between them, and he adorns Kelly with gifts and flowers in the hope that she will agree to date him.
_	In 1942, nest boxes were erected, in the hope that pied flycatchers would control oak leafroller moths, which were defoliating trees.
_	The Guins had moved to El Paso in the hope that the dry climate would alleviate the impact of the tuberculosis which James had contracted during World War I while serving in the United States Army.
_	Following the Iran crisis of 1946, Harry S. Truman declared what became known as the Truman Doctrine in 1947, promising to contribute financial aid to Greece during their Civil War and to Turkey following World War II, in the hope that this would impede the advancement of Communism into Western Europe.
_	The quarries have been leased for development as a recreation center and is currently being operated by Brownstone Exploration & Discovery Park, with the hope that awareness of the historic landmark will strengthen the local economy.
_	Minnie is a happy child and Vidya dotes on her, working hard to save money so that she can take Minnie to America in the hope that the girl will walk again.
_	He wiped the patient's cloaths, comforted [him] ... arranged the bed, [and] inspired with courage, by renewing in him the hope that he should recover.
_	They had been bought by Thomas Crowley at auction in 1926 for $25,000 in the hope that they would become the western terminus of the Richmond–San Rafael Bridge.
_	To slow this process, May agrees to let the ATCU put him in stasis, in the hope that they will find a cure.
_	There would be no more than sixteen persons present for that first dinner but one place would be set aside for Harvey in the hope that he would fulfill the legend and return to Lampeter to take his rightful place.
_	Initially, she settled at the Mariyinsky Palace, the Emperor's residence in Kiev, in the hope that she could recover.
_	Grassroots draft campaigns also developed with the hope that they could encourage Gore to run.
_	Jake asks the visser to fire on the Blade ship with the hope that the shots will disable it, but the Dracon beams miss and Erek drains the remaining power from the weapons.
_	Loosely following the plot of the first two games, Heihachi throws Kazuya off a cliff as a child, and sixteen years later, hosts the King of Iron Fist Tournament in order to lure Kazuya out in the hope that he will accept his destiny as his heir.
_	I straddle the poles of helping those on the ground stay in their homes, find the hope that is medically proven to prolong and improve the quality of their lives, even as I battle with the donor agencies whose policies are set in the metropoles and who all too often find their hands tied by right-wing politics that dominate the West.
_	Kawaguchi was one of two Japanese players (the other being Seigo Narazaki) to be named for their national team's 4th consecutive FIFA World Cup. Despite his period of inactivity and having fallen to third in the pecking order, Okada selected him in the hope that his leadership and experience would aid the team's progress.
_	On 6 October 1945, Hauptmann sent a message to the Communist-dominated 'Kulturbund for the Democratic Revival of Germany' wishing it well and expressing the hope that it would succeed in bringing about a 'spiritual rebirth' of the German people."
_	He was taken to Australia with the hope that a long sea voyage might be of benefit to his health but it proved to be quite the contrary.
_	Special forces units are often sent on missions that are exceedingly dangerous with the hope that their superior training and abilities will allow them to complete them successfully and survive.
_	During this time she displayed a keen interest in Rex, even taking him to different places that comforted her in the hope that he would learn to understand her.
_	This led to the Hòa Hảo becoming less of a religious and more of a military-political movement, as people such as landowners converted in the hope that they could buy protection.
_	Singh expressed the hope that Fiji Government's partnership with the European Union would go some way towards avoiding strike action.
_	When Azusa sees Yuzuru with Satomi, she tries to scare Satomi off in the hope that Yuzuru will return to her; but instead, he goes back to Satomi.
_	Mae decides to accept, even though she does not love or even respect her future husband, for the security and in the hope that she can change.
_	Clark told Bundy that if either of them were apprehended, he would take the blame in the hope that Bundy would be allowed to go free.
_	In a suicide note to his wife he reportedly expressed the hope that his "final play" would be of some benefit in atoning for his error at Marshall Field.
_	The two brothers are creating Stand users in the hope that one can kill their father, a former lackey of DIO implanted with a "flesh bud" made from Dio's cells which has turned him into a hideous monster following Dio's death.
_	At the age of 10, Pangborn’s mother sent him to the United States with Catholic missionaries in the hope that he would have an easier life.
_	Peukert noted that instead of blaming Hitler, most Germans held to the hope that if only "der Führer" would pay attention to domestic policy, then matters would be set right.
_	In the hope that the Tahitians would spend their time on more pious occupations than dancing and drinking, a system of licences was introduced.
_	That motion was tabled indefinitely by the BoA in the hope that it would presented again at the next GA.
_	This annual lecture series was established by philanthropist Obert Clark Tanner with the hope that the "lectures will contribute to the intellectual and moral life of mankind."
_	Slipping to the bathroom, Laureline takes a Tchoung tracer from her handbag and releases it in the hope that it can find Valérian.
_	The performances were later edited into a music video with the hope that it would go viral.
_	More recent Middletown studies continue to examine modern life in Muncie with the hope that research on this particular Indiana community will provide a "better understanding of modern American life."
_	Before his death he arranged to be buried at the Sean Ross Abbey, in the hope that his mother would find his grave.
_	Business groups made significant financial contributions to the Nazi Party both before and after the Nazi seizure of power, in the hope that a Nazi dictatorship would eliminate the organized labour movement and the left-wing parties.
_	Though the experts briefly ponder the possibility of naming Shelby as the worst in the hope that both he and Jason will give up driving, Andrew reminds them that the show is about deciding who is Canada's Worst Driver and the experts quickly agree that overall, Jason is clearly a worse driver than Shelby.
_	The Mysore Maharaja (according to some accounts, the Governor of Seringapatam) gave orders for the house and furniture to be maintained as it is, on the hope that Col. Scott would return one day.
_	This was done with the hope that it would treat or prevent peptic ulcers.
_	"The Chronicle" expressed the hope that the game would spark interest in football in the West and opined that "the fever may now be said to be upon us."
_	In January 1914, the couple moved to Paris, in the hope that a change of setting would make writing easier for both of them.
_	Constantine's father, still a formidable player, did not put himself forward for selection into the Trinidad team in 1921, in the hope that his son would replace him.
_	While many of the children harbour the hope of eventually being adopted into a loving family, Maki clings onto the hope that her mother would return one day to claim her from this orphanage.
_	Leon Poliakov wrote in 1950 that Pius XII had been a tacit supporter of Vichy France's anti-Semitic laws, calling him "less forthright" than Pope Pius XI either out of "Germanophilia" or the hope that Hitler would defeat communist Russia.
_	The expected growth of the space tourism industry was expected to be one of the key trends of the next 20 years and Virgin Galactic had agreed to help develop the IGT blueprint in the hope that the UK could mirror the legislative measures of USA and Japan to enable the UK to stay at the forefront of the global space tourism industry.
_	After it became clear that Congress would pass the recharter but Jackson would veto it, Clay and his allies ensured that Jackson would have to veto the bill (rather than use a pocket veto) in the hope that it would hurt Jackson politically.
_	Ahead of its public auction in Australia in 1924, Lionel Lindsay extolled the work in the hope that it would enter a public gallery:
_	The name "Porta Venezia" (literally: "Venice Gate") was formally given in 1862, possibly in the hope that Venice would soon join Milan in the newly born Kingdom of Italy.
_	The board seeks to play shareholder and bondholder interests off of one another in the hope that the balance of power can remain in the hands of a few cozy fat cats".
_	She stays with the hope that he will arrange things and will return, but the days pass and Marcelo does not return.
_	Since this proclamation, schools, communities and organisations have united around the world on this day to raise awareness in the hope that it will enable increased accessibility to education in developing nations.
_	The chairman presented medals to the players, congratulated them on their showing thus far, and proposed a toast to their health, in the hope that a full-strength team might be available by the next League match in ten days time.
_	In 2002, Dudley wrote the Federal Reserve should have "tightened policy earlier and more aggressively during the 1996-1999 period", with the hope that the downward forces would not have been so intense after the collapse of the stock market that began in 2000.
_	It has been argued that Cressingham believed that Chien, Comyn, and Mar were “exaggerating the value of the services they had rendered” in the hope that the king, in his gratitude, would reward them with “the estates of their rivals.
_	It is the hope that they will be enfolded into their community and become an asset to the country.
_	In response to the Prime Minister's answer, Brockway said "May I express our appreciation of this new arrangement for answering Questions and the hope that it will be convenient for the Prime Minister as well as useful to the House?"
_	Czechoslovakia adopted the "Ribbentrop line" in the hope that it would receive a guarantee of new borders from the side of Axis powers and proposed it officially on October 22.
_	ASLEF aims to increase basic pay so the "overtime culture" is reduced or eliminated, in the hope that more jobs will be created to cover the work that is not covered by overtime.
_	A large part of their motivation, besides the desire to secede from North Carolina, was the hope that this course of action would bring relief from Indian attacks.
_	Furthermore, the Dead Sea scroll 4Q372, which recounts the hope that the northern tribes will return to the land of Joseph, remark that the current dwellers in the north are referred to as fools, an enemy people, however they are not referred to as foreigners.
_	Benny Green, in particular, derided Whiteman for being a mere "mediocre vaudeville act," and suggesting that "today we only tolerate the horrors of Whiteman's recordings at all in the hope that here and there a Bixian fragment will redeem the mess."
_	When Megatron begins a war to control it for himself, Optimus sends it into the depths of outer space in the hope that he can defeat him quickly.
_	According to what was revealed by Cossiga and by Pieczenik himself, his initial idea was to show the will to negotiate, with the goal of gaining time and in the hope that the terrorists would make some error from which they could be detected.
_	The promise lies in the hope that charge carriers on these graphene structures, like carbon nanotubes, remain ballistic.
_	Operation Crupper began when two ships in civilian guise, sailed from Britain with Convoy KMS 1 to Gibraltar, then detached for Malta, in the hope that the Vichy French authorities would be incapable of preventing their passage.
_	By employing advergaming, a company typically provides interactive games on its website in the hope that potential customers will be drawn to the game and spend more time on the website, or simply become more product aware.
_	However Fitzroy president Leon Weigard asked for more time in the hope that he could raise a substantial amount of money in the hope of keeping the Fitzroy Football Club as an independent entity in the then VFL (now AFL).
_	Minygululu tells this story in the hope that Dayindi learns of the added responsibilities of a husband and elder statesman in the tribe, and in the end we see Dayindi withdrawing from his pursuit of Minygululu's young wife.
_	Therefore, on this occasion, Prince Chiêu Quốc decided to defect to the Yuan side with the hope that they would help him take over the position of Emperor of Đại Việt.
_	At 03:00 on 13 March, lookouts on "Marengo" sighted sails to the southwest and despite his officers' misgivings Linois ordered "Marengo" to investigate, in the hope that he had discovered another merchant convoy.
_	The final, played on 23 March 2003 at the Wanderers Stadium in Johannesburg, saw Ganguly electing to field first after winning the toss, in the hope that his pacers would exploit a damp pitch.
_	Sir James was persuaded to accept the office of Lord High Commissioner of the Ionian Islands, in the hope that the climate of the Mediterranean would improve his poor health.
_	Later that year, he was sent by Caesar as a legate under Gaius Scribonius Curio in the hope that Rebilus would compensate for Curio's lack of military experience.
_	The construction of the ark lasted fifty-two years; Noah purposely working slowly, in the hope that the people would take warning therefrom and would repent (Pirke De-Rabbi Eliezer l.c.).
_	Farhad tries hard by day and night in the hope that Khosrow let him to marry Shirin.
_	England began day two in the hope that Robin Smith could go on to a big score, and the tail would be there to provide support.
_	The U.S. had included China in top-level diplomacy in the hope that large masses of Chinese troops would defeat Japan with minimal American casualties.
_	Its people, together with many squatters, cherished the hope that the town might become the capital of the prospective Colony of Queensland, however, Brisbane assumed that role after separation from New South Wales in 1859.
_	Inspired and led by Father James, they 'discover' a rare seagull that only nests on Todday, in the hope that tourists will come.
_	He concluded his 29 October letter to her with the hope that she would like them and ""... one is a little intimidated when one is composing for a singer one considers the greatest among the great"".
_	Portsmouth managed to sell a few players, garnering the hope that bills and staff might get paid on time.
_	He wrote her cold, calculated letters in order to make it seem that he didn't love her anymore, but Olsen clung to the hope that they would get back together, desperately pleading to him to take her back.
_	Released as his debut for RAK Records, and produced by Mickie Most, Harley had originally offered the song to Rod Stewart, who encouraged Harley to record it in the hope that it would put him back in the charts.
_	This last day is devoted to a recapitulation of the message of these days, with the hope that it will be retained the rest of the year".
_	Ministry officials Culpepper Brown (Eric Barker) and Butters are invited and their superior, Under Secretary Gore Blackwood (Dennis Price), encourages them to go and make detailed notes about the show, which they all believe will be a fiasco, in the hope that, with their report, they can convince the Minister of Education (John Le Mesurier) to shut the school.
_	The chairman of the committee that handled the fund-raising for the 1914 fellowships, Edward H. Doyle, expressed at the time of the presentation the hope that the Order would donate another $100,000 to pay for a dormitory for the 50 fellows.
_	He also commended the courage of abuse survivors in giving evidence against their abusers and expressed the hope that the trial would further underline the commitment of the authorities to end CSE in West Yorkshire.
_	Villa sent a letter to Obregón asking him to abandon Celaya in the hope that civilian casualties could be avoided.
_	The dog leg was introduced to give the impression that a different target was the destination in the hope that the Luftwaffe night fighter controllers would concentrate their forces in the wrong location.
_	In May 1824, Friar Ripoll of Mission Santa Barbara wrote an appeal to the governor of California that defended and explained the actions of the Chumash with the hope that the governor would pardon the rebels.
_	The filterers constantly had to make a relatively difficult decision of "whether to put down an arrow on the strength of his (her) first guess, or to wait for another plot in the hope that it would confirm or confound his (her) suspicions."
_	The governing coalition postponed the election by one year in the hope that the current economic conditions would improve by 1935.
_	Lucie refuses to believe the Doctor could be dead and looks over the balcony, clinging to the hope that he might be holding onto something just below them – but there’s nothing there.
_	He refused to speak to any of the policemen attending the scene, so Cleland was called upon in the hope that her female sensitivity and Scots voice would be familiar and calming to French.
_	In a larger sense, however, it was clear from the start that the "Dr. Dolittle" series was about the cruelty of war itself and the hope that Lofting saw from peace and cooperation.
_	Initially, suitable wooden poles were prepared and then treated in various ways in the hope that they would be colonized by the fungus.
_	The list was established to create a large electoral list for the centre-left bloc, in the hope that it will lead the 34th government.
_	In 1824 Sam Bennett (Richard Roundtree), a fancy carriage driver and a suitor who seeks to impress, takes Kizzy for a short visit to the plantation of Dr. William Reynolds, in the hope that she can see her parents.
_	He had previously named the boy 'Yang Guo' in the hope that the boy would redeem his family's honour, which had been tarnished by Yang Kang's villainy.
_	Simultaneously, economic concessions were made to Germany in the hope that the overall cost of a German invasion would be perceived as higher than the potential benefits.
_	Ord proceeded to experiment on Colossus and with the assistance of the human scientist Dr. Kavita Rao using his DNA to develop a cure for the mutant condition in the hope that this would prevent the destruction of his planet.
_	Osbourne told the "Birmingham Mail" in July 2010 that he expected to remain with Aston Villa for the remaining year of his contract, in the hope that he could force his way back into the first team.
_	Argenta became in a shipping point for Austin, Nevada, and its residents had the hope that Austin would help make Argenta the railroad center of the Lander County.
_	Dogs are trained to smell Japanese American soldiers, with the hope that when the dogs are released in the Pacific theater they will track and kill the Japanese soldiers.
_	Over the course of his stay it gradually becomes apparent that other house guests are ascribing healing powers to one of Logan's children, David (Ted's other godchild), and indeed it is in the hope that he might bestow his 'talent' upon them that they have descended upon Swafford Hall.
_	Despite the hope that they could negotiate with the owners, the skilled workers lost control of the movement.
_	A solution is to increase the interrogation rate so as to receive more replies, in the hope that some would be clear of interference.
_	A lower court may not rule against a binding precedent, even if the lower court feels that the precedent is unjust; the lower court may only express the hope that a higher court or the legislature will reform the rule in question.
_	Nemo tells Professor Aronnax that his intention was to have his autobiography sealed in an unsinkable casket and thrown overboard by the last survivor of the "Nautilus"'s crew, in the hope that it would be washed up somewhere.
_	Orb, Niobe's daughter who is slated to become the next Gaea, and decides to court her in the hope that he could later take advantage of Gaea's powers to defeat God.
_	On April 12, 2011 it was confirmed that Hirsch would return to Coventry Blaze, in the hope that he could help the team claim back the EIHL title.
_	The services end in joy with the hope that all have been inscribed in the Book of Life.
_	There seemed to be no use to wait by the small door, so she went back to the stand with the hope that she might find a key to one of the large doors, or may-be a book of rules that would teach her to grow small.
_	The system was built to the unusual gauge of , in the hope that coal wagon from neighbouring coal tramways, which used that gauge, could be moved around the system.
_	His wife decides to go, with the hope that the intimacy will help revive their marriage.
_	Each individual gave a pledge and swore an oath to one another in the hope that when they seized the sovereignty that they would be the three most powerful and valiant nations.
_	He also recurrently thanked 'Our Lord Jesus Christ', and referred to 'The Divine Providence' and 'Our beloved Lord', expressing the hope that 'He might help us to do the right things'.
_	Mastegui and a U.S. Treasury agent plan to have Ned followed in the hope that he will lead them to the head counterfeiter.
_	Another alternative Japanese approach to victory in China was the establishment in November 1938 of a puppet government under Wang Jingwei, the leader of the Kuomintang's left-wing who had lost out to Chiang in the succession struggle following the death of Sun Yat-sen out of the hope that it would lead to an exodus of Kuomintang leaders to Wang's government and thereby cause the collapse of Chiang's government.
_	Epstein's jealous wife Margaret had shot and wounded Kathleen in 1923, and encouraged him into multiple affairs in the hope that he would tire of Kathleen and "return home".
_	After the season concluded, rumours began to circulate that Ferguson was about to break the English transfer record once again and sign Leeds United central-back Rio Ferdinand in the hope that his side would return to their winning ways in 2002–03.
_	Abdul Hamid II opposed blood feuds of the Albanian tribes and issued (1892-1893) a proclamation to the people of the Ișkodra (Shkodër) area urging them to make a besa and reject the practice, in the hope that the very institution (besa) that upheld the vendetta could be used against it.
_	Angel taunts Spike with insinuations that Spike is unable to satisfy Drusilla, in the hope that Spike will kill him before he can be used to cure Drusilla.
_	In the "Nothing Can Stop the Juggernaut!" story arc, she contacts Spider-Man for assistance when Black Tom Cassidy dispatches the Juggernaut to capture her in the hope that her psychic powers would help them defeat the X-Men, only for her to nearly die after Juggernaut separated her from her life-support system.
_	In 1885, seeking to curb the more boisterous behaviour of male spectators, Preston North End began offering free admission to women in the hope that their presence would restrain the men.
_	In May 2005 the sisters auditioned for the UK television programme "The X Factor" in the hope that they would crack the UK market.
_	Calumet & Hecla strived to create ideal communities around its mines and mills, in the hope that pleasant living conditions would help the company maintain a loyal and productive workforce.
_	Laura Chambers, rating the album a 4.2 out of five, reports, ""Let It Be Jesus" sweetly takes our attention away from her and fixes it squarely on the One she loves, with the hope that we come away wanting more and more of Him."
_	Thamesdown seemed to some observers an odd target for capping; "The Times"' correspondent reported local rumours that it had been selected for capping in the hope that it might appeal and be removed, thereby damaging the policy of confrontation.
_	The government has been pushing for the adoption of freight EMU technology on energy efficiency grounds in the hope that widespread adoption could assist in meeting emissions targets.
_	He comes soon after in the hope that Cherian has got evidence to prove that Raju was dead and it was an impostor who had come.
_	She decided to make a return visit to Scarborough in the hope that the change of location and fresh sea air might initiate a recovery.
_	Opening up the political system to the middle class had therefore been an objective of political reformers like the so-called "Doelisten" who in 1747 helped elevate the Frisian stadtholder William IV to stadtholder in all seven provinces, on a hereditary basis, with greatly expanded powers, in the hope that he would use those powers to promote the political influence of the would-be "democrats."
_	"Darlwyne"s possible fate was raised in the House of Commons on 2 August when members, while expressing the hope that survivors would be found, were concerned about the apparent lack of enforcement of regulations that should have prevented an overloaded, unlicensed craft from putting out to sea.
_	There is also a bag of rat poison which can be collected and then laid down on a platform in the hope that the rat will run across that platform.
_	Sometimes, fishermen's wives would keep black cats at home too, in the hope that they would be able to use their influence to protect their husbands at sea (see Ship's cat).
_	During the first pitstop, Ferrari did not change the intermediates on his car in the hope that the track would become dry.
_	Meir praised Sadat for his courage and vision, and expressed the hope that while many differences remained to be resolved, that vision would be achieved in a spirit of mutual understanding.
_	During the close season, Hughes signed striker Craig Bellamy, who had played for Hughes with Wales, from Newcastle, in the hope that the Tyneside club's out-of-favour striker could fire Rovers to a higher place next season.
_	Parliamentarians expressed the hope that the decision would help Pitsunda develop as a resort.
_	Meanwhile, Jarl-Kulle chats up one girl after another in the hope that she will cook for him and his siblings.
_	While the band were on "The Headlines Tour" in February 2011, Rochelle Humes confirmed that the band would be working with record producer Labrinth in the hope that he would write and produce a smash hit as he did with Tinie Tempah.
_	Instead, she runs to get the shawl and begins waving it in the hope that Magda will see it and calm down.
_	The Russian army's severe losses to the German army started to awaken among the Finns the hope that they could get regain self-government.
_	Seeing how Vincent’s mother was suffering, she contacts Vincent in the hope that he will take Sheung Ying Hung home.
_	In the past, sick people were brought into the caveren below the synagogue and left there alone at night in the hope that Elisha's spirit would exercise a healing influence over them.
_	Having raised £100,000, the Cotswold Canals Trust lodged the money with the Waterways Trust, in the hope that it could be used as match funding for any grants that might be received.
_	Traveling to the past is a desperate measure to introduce the virus to humans with more robust immune systems in the hope that the survivors will be better able to resist the virus when the alien species creates it.
_	A certain amount of pressure was put on me with the hope that I might change my mind and stay in active status.
_	The Government of the DRG refused to enter any military alliance, referring to its policy of neutrality and noninterference, but suggested negotiations towards a political settlement of the relations between two countries in the hope that this might lead to recognition of Georgia's independence by Moscow.
_	Arlian and his best friend Black hunt down the dragons in the hope that if Arlian kills a dragon the duke will assist him in destroying the dragon menace.
_	Though it was within Polk's power to recall the messenger, he chose to allow the emissary to continue, with the hope that Texas would accept the offer.
_	Leased by Donington Ventures Leisure Ltd in 2007 the hope that Formula
_	This is done in the hope that customers can relate to the brand on a positive level.
_	In the animated TV series "Noah's Island", the "Born to be Wild" episode focuses on Noah, the main character, bringing a breeding pair of Spix's macaws to his island from the Amazon rainforest, in the hope that they will breed.
_	Matheson believed that when Qishan wrote, "as we have granted you territory you do not now require another port", Elliot as a result gave up demands of British access to a port in northern China in the hope that he could hold Qishan to an interpretation of the Chinese characters in which the British had been ceded Hong Kong rather than just being given a trading factory there.
_	Eventually, a Scotland Yard conference decided to arrest the Krays on the evidence already collected, in the hope that other witnesses would be forthcoming once the Krays were in custody.
_	Jason has Asperger syndrome and Serena tries to understand his condition in the hope that they can build a relationship.
_	The Syriac and Arabic versions render it, "and know ye how" and make it to be a fresh exhortation to the saints to be concerned for such a share of spiritual knowledge, that they may be able to give a proper and pertinent answer, with meekness and fear, to such as shall ask a reason of the hope that is in them; and to make suitable returns to persons according to their age, sex, capacities, and circumstances; for everyone is not to be answered alike, nor the same man under different circumstances; a fool is sometimes to be answered according to his folly, and sometimes not; and this seems to be a better reading than ours, which makes this to be the end of gracious, savoury, and incorrupt speech; whereas knowledge is not acquired by speaking, but ought to go before it; though indeed a person that uses himself to speaking with prudence, purity, and grace, is at all times ready to give an agreeable answer, in a graceful and acceptable manner, to everyone.
_	Only a few thousand people have been evacuated from the surface when the Inhibitors come so close to Resurgam's star that Volyova begins deploying the cache weapons in the hope that they will be able to buy more time.
_	The men put her in a hollow tree in the woods in the hope that in the morning she would wake up and be frightened into seeing the error of her ways.
_	The 2005–06 season saw Ryan and Hamrun Spartans return to the Maltese Premier League, and the hope that they could retain their Premier League status, however it was to be another disappointing season for Ryan Fenech, as Hamrun Spartans finished in 10th position and were again relegated to the First Division, during the season Fenech made 20 appearances and scored two goals.
_	However, he also expressed the hope that the Nuremberg trials would eventually lead to the establishment of an international criminal court.
_	In the hope that Xiaochun might find success as a violinist, Liu Cheng and Xiaochun travel to Beijing to participate in a competition organized by the Children's Palace, an arts institution for school children.
_	But Kumud doesn’t know she’s a widow, and still hangs on to the hope that she might change her husband, and that her life will continue at her in-laws once she gets back there.
_	While the group explores numerous Christian doctrines and life struggles, every song ties in with the album's theme of the sinfulness and total depravity of humanity, and the endless mercy and grace of God toward sinners and the hope that Christians can find in God.
_	Jerome managed to take with him the two diplomas of Rodrigo and Jimena, perhaps in the hope that he would one day be restored to Valencia.
_	In 1912, Michael shocked Nicholas by marrying Natalia in the hope that he would be removed from the line of succession.
_	The Conservative Central Office gave Barry £340 to pass to H. M. Hyndman of the Social Democratic Federation (SDF) in order to fund two of its candidates in the 1885 general election, in the hope that they would defeat Liberal Party MPs.
_	Terry entered the "America's Got Talent" competition with the hope that the exposure if he made it to the Top 20 might help his career and cause people to want to attend his shows.
_	Classical techniques of optimization would need multiple restart points and multiple runs in the hope that a different solution may be discovered every run, with no guarantee however.
_	The central problem for a state that seeks to communicate a credible deterrent threat through diplomatic or military actions is that all defending states have an incentive to act as if they are determined to resist an attack, in the hope that the attacking state will back away from military conflict with a seemingly resolved adversary.
_	After realizing that his "powers" were only capable of turning him into a deformed monster, Bertrand vowed to cleanse the world of Conduits by unleashing hordes of them upon the world in the hope that humans would ultimately rebel and exterminate them.
_	In the crossover story featured here, Barnes' protagonists hatch and carry out the Machiavellian scheme of siccing their own foes and the Draka on each other, in the hope that the two would keep each other busy for a long time - to the relief of everybody else.
_	Asked at the end of his life about the 'holy', the strict atheist answered with words reminiscent of the young Hegel: 'My sense of the holy is bound up with the hope that some day my remote descendants will live in a global civilization in which love is pretty much the only law.
_	A lower court may not rule against a binding precedent, even if it feels that it is unjust; it may only express the hope that a higher court or the legislature will reform the rule in question.
_	In the hope that Great Britain would protect what remained of Kedah from Siam, the sultan handed over Penang and then Province Wellesley to the British at the end of the 18th century.
_	At Tomas' beachfront house, Jason and Erica decide to play the game in the hope that they can win and wish for it to be a week in the past, so that their friends will be alive.
_	In March 2008 she "came out" in the "Sunday Times Magazine" "in the hope that she might be the role model to younger transwomen that she never had, and also to try and dispel some myths about the transgendered."
_	He concluded his Golden Globe acceptance speech with the hope that humankind would devote as much effort to the war on AIDS as its wars against each other.
_	He pushed "Dieu" forward to 1912 although he lost interest in the ballet and spent huge amounts of money on the production in the hope that "Dieu" would make Vaslav Nijinsky a great international star.
_	At stake was the hope that actual possession of territories would influence the final decision.
_	It is a task appointed by God that you should be able to give a reason for the hope that is in you as you bear witness before the world."
_	The verse quoted here reads in full: "but in your hearts honor Christ the Lord as holy, always being prepared to make a defense to anyone who asks you for a reason for the hope that is in you; yet do it with gentleness and respect."
_	Different classes of compounds which activate PPARG weaker than thiazolidinediones (the so-called “partial agonists of PPARgamma”) are currently studied with the hope that such compounds would be still effective hypoglycemic agents but with fewer side effects.
_	Brazda was determined to continue speaking out about his past, in the hope that younger generations remain vigilant in the face of present-day behaviour and thought patterns similar to those which led to the persecutions endured by homosexuals during the Nazi era.
_	Eleven months later, Gabe suggests relocating the family in the north of England, near the east coast in the hope that a change of scenery will give Eve some comfort, as she clings to the hope that Cam may still be alive.
_	The prince, filled with remorse and unable to reverse the spell, had his sister placed in the castle tower, in the hope that she would one day be awakened.
_	When a young therapist comes into their lives, Shirley grasps the hope that her son may recover his emotional well-being.
_	In mid-1873, Barrow's health declined, and though he went to the intercolonial conference at Sydney as one of the South Australian delegates in the hope that change of scene might lead to its improvement, it continued to deteriorate; he died in Adelaide on 22 August 1874 of an effusion on the brain.
_	Jacinda suggests that he read the storybook to Lucy in the hope that he can give Lucy the belief that maybe he is her father and he can save her with True Love's kiss, but when he kissed her forehead, nothing happened.
_	In 1952, Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory was founded to act as Los Alamos' "competitor", with the hope that two laboratories for the design of nuclear weapons would spur innovation.
_	Theo's son participated in planning the project in the hope that the works would be exhibited under the best possible conditions.
_	In 1977 Samsung Electronics launched the Telecommunication Network, and in 1983 it initiated its mobile telecommunications business with the hope that this would become the company's future growth engine.
_	Shekhar then trains his eyes on the Indian Institutes of Management (IIMs), in the hope that an MBA from an IIM would help him get his dream job.
_	Soon it is clear that animals are permitted to view many private things on the assumption that they will remain silent, such as the host Sir Wilfred's commentary on one guest's intelligence and the hope that she will buy his car, or the implied sexual activities of some of the other guests.
_	They unsuccessfully introduce him to unmarried daughters of friends in the hope that Pavel will finally marry.
_	A moderate churchman, he was appointed patriarch in 485 by the political enemies of the powerful metropolitan Barsauma of Nisibis, a champion of Nestorianism, in the hope that he would prevent the takeover of the Church of the East by the Nestorians.
_	In a meeting with Franz von Papen, the German Ambassador to Austria, in November 1937, Bonnet and Chautemps expressed the hope that an understanding might be reached in which France might accept Central and Eastern Europe as Germany's sphere of influence in return for German acceptance of Western Europe as France's sphere of influence.
_	A senior official of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, who attended the discussion, expressed the hope that Turkey could share its experience and provide assistance to ongoing efforts to rehabilitate and extend its railway system.
_	The Department of Energy (DOE) is sponsoring several corporate companies in the R&D of new anti-idling technologies with the hope that this technology will be installed and incorporated in the assembly line or possibly at the dealer as an option.
_	Such faith was placed in the future of the industry that a Game Designer's Guild was even created, in the hope that it just might be possible to earn a comfortable living providing wargames to the public.
_	The advent of nuclear power nourished the hope that such warships could be produced.
_	Whale watching boats in the area will be keeping an eye out for Nettie and recording sightings in the hope that the whale sheds the remaining loose lines and recovers fully from its ordeal.
_	Here, he entered the village alone in the hope that his lone presence would not upset the village.
_	Markets immediately responded well to the suspension, in the hope that the decline in prices would finally end.
_	But since each of them got their suits from the same tailor, the police couldn't prove which one of them did it so they arrested them all in the hope that they would turn.
_	He expressed the hope that the spoken and written language would eventually become one and the same, arguing that the spoken language could not be properly cultivated if it was so widely separated from the written variety that mutual influence between the two became impossible."
_	Thompson and Venables laid Bulger across the railway tracks and weighted his head down with rubble, in the hope that a train would hit him and make his death appear to be an accident.
_	He refuses to give this location to Phil Coulson, the former director who had stepped down with the hope that a new powered director could help calm human-Inhuman relations.
_	Pope Clement XI sent the Franciscan Lorenzo Cozza (later Cardinal) to Samuel in 1703 with the hope that the Patriarch might conclude union with Rome.
_	At the April 1994 service held at the memorial for the victims, a new poem by Gerzon was read and included in the program, ending with the hope that "the children, who are the sign of hope, will walk in the path of peace Winter, Spring, Summer, and Fall, and God's nature will hold their memories."
_	Lou Macari was appointed as Stoke City manager in June 1991 with the hope that he would be the man to bring life back into the club.
_	"Therefore, I will close this letter with the hope that before many months we may return to you, and be with you on your hikes, in your camps and around your campfire.
_	When Emperor Renzong came to power, he issued decrees to strengthen the military and paid massive bribes to the Khitan-led Liao dynasty, an adversary of Western Xia, in the hope that this would ensure the safety of the Song Empire.
_	The Cunning Little Vixen, the priest moves to Strání, expressing the hope that life will be better there.
_	Speaking from the chair Laurie pointed out that ""the idea which brought the Association into being was of a trade union character, but expressed the hope that, when material conditions had been satisfactorily improved, educational matters generally would form the essential points on which discussion would take place"".
_	When presenting it to Hitchcock, to his surprise and delight, she expressed the hope that it would be lucky for him as well.
_	Things start to go badly when Maki finds a parasitical worm inside a fish – and eats it down, in the hope that it will keep her skinny.
_	Jeff Wald, Reddy's husband and manager, was persistent in contacting Capitol Records executive Artie Mogull with the hope that he would give his wife her first chance at recording in the US.
_	On 22 November General Scobie ordered the position to be consolidated and the corridor widened in the hope that Eighth Army would link up.
_	On her death in 1914 she bequeathed the collection to the "Musée social" (Social museum) in the hope that it would organize a feminist institute.
_	Two species, the Chinese mantis and the European mantis, were deliberately introduced to North America in the hope that they would serve as pest controls for agriculture; they have spread widely in both the United States and Canada.
_	Pathelin directs Aignelet to say only "Baaa" (like a sheep) when anyone questions him in court in the hope that the judge will find Joceaulme's case groundless, as it will appear that he has taken a mentally-challenged person to court.
_	Simpson states on his FAQ page that he is not developing a new technology or creating a new threat, but creating awareness of an existing threat with the hope that it will stimulate research into an effective defence.
_	Ted leaves a pen and notebook outside the tent, in the hope that God will write the answer to their problem overnight.
_	England participated in the hope that they would be acclimatizing for the following year's World Cup, but in the event they failed to qualify for that tournament.
_	Again the offer was not accepted at first, but upon persistent appeals, Dzang opted for the Commonwealth of Australia rather than the United Kingdom, with the hope that it would be difficult to secure an agreement since Ghana’s most eminent diplomat, Dr. Ebenezer Kodjo Debrah, had only just been appointed to that country.
_	The possibility of these trees possessing genetic resistance to the beetle is currently being investigated with the hope that green ash could be restored using the surviving trees.
_	Considering that Henry finally gave in and is embarking on his own journey to Skull Rock, who knows what will happen, but at least we have the hope that our favorite pairings will be reunited, right?"
_	Evangelism the prospect is an unbeliever and challenges the Evangelist wherein the Evangelist then follows into the role of the Apologist in defense of their faith with the hope that Evangelism may be restarted.
_	He had the hope that the Tsar's government would recognize the necessity of great reforms and work with the moderate liberals of the Zemstvos, while safeguarding the monarchical principle.
_	Plans were announced for the October 2009 launch of issue #159 as an online publication, with further issues to follow, with the hope that the print edition would be resumed sometime in 2010.
_	It held the section to be valid in case of non-consensual non-vaginal intercourse or to intercourse with minors, and it expressed the hope that Parliament would legislatively address the issue.
_	All ways into the valley appear to be sealed and impassable so, down to their last few days of supplies, Mark and Hugh wait by the main gate in the hope that another criminal will be expelled – giving them a chance to enter.
_	Cardinal Joseph Ratzinger, the Prefect of the Congregation, expressed the hope that "this regrettable, but necessary, outcome to the Congregation's study might move you to reconsider your dissenting positions and to accept in its fullness the teaching of the Catholic Church."
_	Brown went to France with the hope that there would be more receptivity to his idea.
_	Brandon removed the younger Eliza to the country, and reveals to Elinor all of these details in the hope that Marianne could get some consolation in discovering that Willoughby was revealed as a villain.
_	In 1963, Iraq adopted a flag that was similar but with three stars, representing the hope that Iraq would join the UAR.
_	In January 1915, Goltz gave William Reginald Hall, the head of British Naval Intelligence, insider information in the hope that he would be released early.
_	Convinced that he couldn't resist the voices, he instead went on his mission to kill Jameson early, in the hope that things would then go wrong and he would be caught.
_	Hrbacek writes that the definitions of "continuity", "derivative", and "integral" implicitly must be grounded in the ε-δ method in Robinson's theoretical framework, in order to extend definitions to include non-standard values of the inputs, claiming that the hope that non-standard calculus could be done without ε-δ methods could not be realized in full.
_	Her wealthy father arranges her marriage to Ratan, with the hope that she will become normal after marriage.
_	When Tan heard that the Empress Dowager Cixi was brewing a scheme of putting the emperor under house arrest for initiating the new policies, he immediately visited general Yuan Shikai on September 18, in the hope that Yuan's army might support the Reformation Movement and prevail over the opposition forces headed by Empress Cixi.
_	Ringwood of her: Elizabeth was a force; a creative energy unleashed at a time when creativity was suspect and in a place where creativity was often ignored in the hope that it would go away.
_	China’s representative, however, expressed the hope that future decisions on the issue would be made by consensus.
_	They also plan to steal a plane and fly it back to give scientists in Britain a functioning radar set in the hope that they can jam the radar signals.
_	Duleep Singh wrote to the teachers at the missionary school at the end of the month in the hope that they would recommend a wife for him as he was to live in Britain and he wanted a Christian wife of Eastern origin.
_	In 2001, the Wilkinsburg garage that had housed 8XK was carefully dismantled and placed into storage by the National Museum of Broadcasting, with the hope that it can some day be rebuilt to house a broadcasting museum.
_	To avoid violent actions, Xu Jiyu and Liu Yunke sent soldiers to guard the temple premises, but they also discouraged people from going to the missionaries to listen to their preaching or seek medical care from them, and forbade any carpenters or masons from repairing the rather dilapidated temple, in the hope that the foreigners would themselves give up on the premises.
_	Obi-Wan and Siri then follow Uta S'orn as she delivers dinner to patients at the royal grounds, in the hope that she will lead them to the hiding place of Zan Arbor and Ona Nobis.
_	Although all his plots had signally failed, Paget appears to have clung to the hope that the Protestant religion in England could be subverted by a foreign force.
_	All the while The court of the final word was searching the heart of existence in the hope that not only will they survive the void but the evolution of humans as well.
_	Back in the United States, he moved his family from Washington to New York in the hope that the climate would benefit his daughter, but she died shortly after the move.
_	He tells them that there are survivors held in a secret prison in the main city and that they were betrayed by another rebel member, in the hope that Silver would spare his wife.
_	If however a force knows only the approximate location of its target (e.g., somewhere within a fog bank), then it may spread its fire across a wide area, with the hope that at least some of its missiles will find the target.
_	The phrase "Christian reaches for the life-buoy" appears several times during the play, and every time, the characters seem to hold their breath in the hope that this time, Christian will survive.
_	At the same time, Li Yan sent Liu Shan a memorial which said that "the army feigned retreat in order to lure the enemy to do battle" in the hope that Zhuge Liang would resume the war so his failure to transport rations would go unnoticed.
_	She criticised the American club for a lack of leadership and expressed the hope that playing in Germany would provide better preparation for the 2011 FIFA Women's World Cup.
_	Terry is shocked to find that Alison is now a young single mother, but decides to rekindle their relationship in the hope that former mistakes are behind them.
_	Although working on a farm was not the only approved form of service, it was a common one; the aim was to bring young people back from the cities, in the hope that they would then stay "on the land" in service of Nazi blood and soil beliefs.
_	In an effort to counter this problem, Whitehead determined that the tanks would be re-allocated to the 2/23rd, in the hope that a new route would be opened up by the engineers.
_	Here, Liszt clearly wished to symbolize both the defeat of Lajos Kossuth's revolt in the Hungarian Revolution of 1848 and the hope that one day Hungary would be liberated by its own people.
_	Ancestral spirits are often consulted, offered food and drink, and reminded that people are depending on them, in the hope that an individual will be able to act with confidence, especially in dealing with others in the lineage.
_	By contrast, liberal authors present Gandhi’s attempts to negotiate with Hitler in the hope that the regime may abstain from its racial policy.
_	He also said, "The closing days of the year, however, have refreshed the parched lands with welcome rains and inspired the hope that the drought is at last broken up, and that a genial season is awaiting us in the new year."
_	In early November 1940, Nedić, who believed that Germany would win the war, proposed to the government that it abandon its neutral stance and join the Axis as soon as possible in the hope that Germany would protect Yugoslavia against its "greedy neighbors".
_	The contestants in play would be offered the choice to "give a letter" (a tactical move that would reveal the next letter to the opposing team in the hope that they wouldn't be able to guess the word correctly) or "guess a letter" (generally a safer bet, ensuring that the team remained in play, provided they didn't get the word wrong.)
_	The purpose was to educate policymakers about what was taking place, with the hope that increased awareness amongst political leaders would lead to the action necessary to end the crisis.
_	His courageous acts in defence and protection of fairness to all is recognized and respected on the global platform and lend to all Africans the hope that through the values of equity and democracy, we can live in peace and harmony with each other to engender communal development and life's fulfilment.
_	In an effort to derail her plan to vacation in Capri with his rival, Dino proposes marriage, and when she rejects his offer, he invites Cecilia to join him at the Rome estate of his domineering mother, a wealthy American, in the hope that he can seduce her with his glamorous lifestyle.
_	In an attempt to improve a poor hand a player may call a 'kezza' with what would appear to be little chance of success in the hope that his partner may assist in winning the majority of the available tricks.
_	Hill emigrated to South Australia on the recommendation of Archdeacon Farr (1819–1904), in the hope that a change of climate would be good for his health, arriving on the "Historia" in 1854.
_	In recent years, there has been increased interest in the application of these theories in the areas of health, education, criminology, energy and international development with the hope that understanding behavioural change will improve the services offered in these areas.
_	Pruthi suggests this is in the hope that they might in future be considered as Julaha by other communities in the future..
_	He proposed instead merely to announce that the Chinese flotilla was on its way to Formosa, in the hope that this false rumour would force the French to raise the blockade of Formosa and concentrate their warships for defence.
_	The Galleries had built the pavilion with the hope that, like the other buildings at the Venice Biennale, it would eventually be run by nation whose art it showed.
_	Therefore, he wishes for Seishirō to kill him instead, and trained hard as an "onmyōji" in the hope that the Sakurazukamori would one day consider him enough of a threat to carry this out.
_	In April 1898 Valette went to Arcachon, to the south of Bordeaux, in the hope that warm weather and mineral water would cure her tuberculosis.
_	On that night, the song’s expression of a romantic promise fulfilled clearly spoke to the hope that political promises would be fulfilled, not to mention the notion that, at last, an African-American had assumed this nation's highest honor.
_	The name "Daily Source Code" was chosen in the hope that it would attract an audience with an interest in technology.
_	Paul married Jadwiga on 5 September 1942, in the hope that by gaining French citizenship she'd be protected from deportation.
_	Angus anthropomorphizes insects in the hope that she can change people's entomophobia and create an interest in the role that insects play in ecosystems.
_	She instructed Griffin to pose as a runaway slave bound for Mexico in the hope that he would be able to help free Samuel Maverick.
_	Thus, Patterson created the tournament with the hope that his competition would redress the issues with other national championships.
_	She suggests that they "go now", in the hope that "Somewhere – there together we'll find the garden/The garden of love".
_	Lycidas warns other men who love boys to toughen up and have patience - in the hope that one day a god will grant them success.
_	In the same month General Renzo Dalmazzo, Italian Sixth Army Corps commander organised a meeting in the hope that the Chetniks would take part in a joint operation against the Partisans.
_	Ultimately, Wang Jingwei and his allies would establish their almost entirely powerless new party and government in Nanjing in 1940, in the hope that Tokyo might eventually be willing to negotiate a deal for peace, which, though painful, might allow China to survive.
_	The object of this strategy was to maintain a foothold on the Chinese mainland in the hope that the United States would eventually be compelled to enter the war in China on the Nationalist side.
_	Such threats can be countered by strategies such as planting multi-line cultivars and cultivar mixes, in the hope that some of the cultivars will be resistant to any individual outbreak of disease.
_	A less pessimistic interpretation (still pessimistic, to be sure) understands the myth to say: countless evils fled Pandora's jar and plague human existence; the hope that we might be able to master these evils remains imprisoned inside the jar.
_	In the hope that his influence might make the Marathas less hostile, Aurangzeb before his death intending to set Shahu free, had presented him with Shivaji's sword Bhavani and also the sword of the Bijapur general Afzal Khan and given him the district of Nevasa as a marriage gift.
_	When he was arrested for vandalising a flag in Prague, Mayerová's parents took her into the country, in the hope that this would end their relationship.
_	It depicts two hands, one black and one white, reaching out for one another with the hope that one day they will touch.
_	He expressed the hope that the perpetrators of the embezzlement would be convicted.
_	Treen withdrew his name from consideration in late April 1988, saying that he "could not afford to defer my professional and business activities" any longer, and that "some persons on the Democrat-controlled committee would just as soon see the vacancy go unfilled until after the election...in the hope that a Democrat will succeed to the White House."
_	They were ready to give up the piped water systems in the peri-urban areas, and the residents had given up the hope that the authorities would provide proper piped services.
_	Hubert Humphrey was ultimately selected as Johnson's running mate, with the hope that Humphrey would strengthen the ticket in the Midwest and industrial Northeast.
_	Regretting his action, Myrtil places his garland on the altar of Cupid in the hope that the god will rejuvenate it and save his chances with Zélide.
_	Kane had to work as a bodyguard and a chauffeur to Carroll and Stadnick; as a "mule" delivering drugs, prostitutes and guns; and paying for all their meals and drinks at restaurants and bars, out of the hope that he would be promoted up the ranks as a reward.
_	The Toy Show jumper attracts as much attention as the show itself, with viewers sending in their own versions to RTÉ ahead of the night in the hope that the presenter might wear them.
_	insisting on blunt tips, in the hope that it would reduce violence.
_	Workers also meet the teenagers regularly in the hope that teenagers can discuss sex and AIDS openly without embarrassment.
_	During this time, the hope that Schneerson could be revealed as the Messiah (Moshiach) became more widespread.
_	Given writing materials in the hope that he would put on paper his retraction, Penn wrote another inflammatory treatise, "No Cross, No Crown: A Discourse Shewing The Nature and Discipline of the Holy Cross of Christ and that the Denial of Self, and Daily Hearing of Christ's Cross, is the Alone Way to Rest and Kingdom of God."
_	Metternich showed her private correspondence with her relatives to her husband, the Emperor Francis I, in the hope that it would miscredit her.
_	Called the Unity Conference in the hope that unity might prevail, it managed to establish the Uganda National Liberation Front (UNLF) as political representative of the UNLA.
_	These programs train "head teachers" in creating a school garden, with the hope that surrounding communities will benefit from the skills students and teachers learn in these classes.
_	Newspapers have dealt with this problem in various ways, including using software to combine two existing, similar characters; using a picture of the personality; or simply substituting a homophone for the rare character in the hope that the reader would be able to make the correct inference.
_	Then, as the British fleet approached, Brueys sent "Alerte" ahead, passing close to the leading British ships and then steering sharply to the west over the shoal in the hope that the ships of the line might follow and become grounded.
_	He was forced to resign for expressing the hope that Germany and the Soviet Union, then engaged in the Battle of Stalingrad, would destroy each other.
_	Since the Soviet Union was fighting the war on the same side as Britain, the hope that it should be destroyed, though common in the Conservative Party, was unacceptable to the war effort.
_	The final method puts China first in this global issue by not focusing on the fear that China will destroy the environment, but the hope that they can become an influential leader in environment protection.
_	Meanwhile, the French government was pressuring Brière de l'Isle to send the 2nd Brigade across the border into Guangxi province, in the hope that a threat to Chinese territory would force China to sue for peace.
_	The College was opened on 1 October 1846 with the hope that it would develop along the lines of an Oxbridge college and provide the basis for university education in Tasmania.
_	It is in the contestant's interest to uncover smaller amounts of money, in the hope that their prize is a larger amount or that they can get a higher offer from the Banker.
_	When David found it unbearable to be alone in the wake of his father's survival story and in his struggle not to lose his sanity, he convinced his brothers and sister to join him in the hope that this would also contribute to releasing tensions and bring them as close as they used to be.
_	Norris wrote this book in the hope that future generations of Americans can continue to enjoy life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.
_	Secretary-General of the United Nations spokesperson Stéphane Dujarric condemned the killing and said "On the attack of the blogger, we spoke to our human rights colleagues who obviously condemned the attack and expressed the hope that the perpetrators will be quickly brought to justice through the due process of law."
_	He therefore subjected his church to the distant Armagh in the hope that Armagh's authority would be much less burdensome than Kildare's might have been.
_	Nevertheless, some cosmologists are drawn to M-theory because of its mathematical elegance and relative simplicity, triggering the hope that the simplicity is a reason why it may describe our world.
_	There was no through-flow of water and the canal was open at only one end, in the hope that the tides would be enough to flush the waterway.
_	When his bid is unsuccessful, he teams up with colleague Duke Ferrell (Buddy Ebsen) to buy their employer a successful racehorse, Lucero, in the hope that this will compensate for the failed bid.
_	They tried to dissuade him, but, in the hope that Victor Emmanuel could get better terms, he ended the discussion, "My decision is the fruit of mature reflexion.
_	He instructs Puck to retrieve the flower with the hope that he might make Titania fall in love with an animal of the forest and thereby shame her into giving up the little Indian boy.
_	It was this—allied to Cromwell's tolerance of the right to private worship of those who fell outside Puritanism—that led to his encouraging Jews to return to England in 1657, over 350 years after their banishment by Edward I, in the hope that they would help speed up the recovery of the country after the disruption of the Civil Wars.
_	There was a longer-term motive for Cromwell's decision to allow the Jews to return to England, and that was the hope that they would convert to Christianity and therefore hasten the Second Coming of Jesus Christ, ultimately based on Matthew 23:37–39 and Romans 11.
_	Then Nadir Divan-Beghi brought her before Imam Quli Khan in the hope that the Emir would coerce her into selling.
_	Cao Rui became seriously ill in the winter of 238–239 and he appointed Cao Yu as General-in-Chief (大將軍) in the hope that Cao Yu would assist his successor in governing the state.
_	He loses track of the elaborately interconnected wires, and trying to get a cardboard house to light up, he "experimented in a rather haphazard fashion, connecting this and that wire blindly and by guesswork, in the hope that he would strike the right combination."
_	In the early hours he would sew buttons and do the hems and once everyone leaves he would start doing sketches which he would leave at the table of Dennis with the hope that one day the designer would take notice of his designing skills.
_	He plans to write to her father and ask for some seeds from her astrakan tree, in the hope that a new tree planted at their new settlement will help her feel at home.
_	As someone from Northern Ireland living in the Irish republic, Moody was greatly concerned with and saddened by “the troubles” that broke out in Northern Ireland in 1968 as the state of low-level warfare was popularly known, and in his preface written in January 1974, Moody expressed the hope that the power-sharing deal reached in the Sunningdale Agreement would end "the troubles".
_	Believing that Germany had been taken over by an oligarchy of "the landlord ascendancy", he expressed the hope that war with the country would be averted if Germany's "democratic forces" could re-assert their control over its government.
_	Lu Qi had held a grudge against Yan Zhenqing for a long time, so he sent Yan Zhenqing to negotiate with Li Xilie in the hope that Yan Zhenqing will be killed.
_	Robert concludes his high school reflection with the hope that he be admitted to the college.
_	However, Badger and Mole continue to live in Toad Hall in the hope that Toad may return.
_	M.A. Crang, in his book "Denying the Truth: Revisiting The X-Files after 9/11", criticised the plot of the episode, saying that it "throws up many elements that we've seen the series do better elsewhere...in the hope that something will stick".
_	The Premier expressed the hope that "the electors of Argyllshire will send you to Parliament by such a majority as will provide convincing evidence of the national unity of purpose in the prosecution of the war."
_	Lord Samuel initially had difficulty obtaining financing for the construction of a menorah, but with a joint decision Elkan began work, in the hope that funding would be obtained.
_	and the hope that came from the horror in the moments and days following the attack”; the Field of Empty chairs, which lies on the footprint of the building, and is made up of 168 chairs to represent each of the victims; the Survivor tree, a tree which bore the full brunt of the attack and remained standing, transforming it into “a living symbol of resilience.”
_	When he was approaching the gallows with Father Dicconson, his children were led to him in the hope that he might even then relent.
_	Johannes purchased land at Whitwarta with the hope that the town and surrounding districts would boom not only because of the availability of freshwater but because it was along one of the paths ("Gulf Road") that "Bullockies" used to cart copper from Burra to Port Wakefield.
_	It was founded initially to educate English Catholics on the continent in the hope that, through them, Catholicism might be restored in England.
_	This was done in the hope that the refugees would eventually establish an agricultural settlement in Corozal and provide the lumber camps with an alternative source of foodstuffs now that the supplies through Bacalar in Mexico were no longer available.
_	The second article by McGowan expressed the hope that Ireland would vote against ratifying the Lisbon Treaty, thus frustrating Tony Blair's ambitions to become President of the European Council.
_	Worthington arranged a conference with their representatives, who agreed to delay closure in the hope that the workers could transfer to the nearby Northern United Colliery when it was ready to open.
_	After losing both her parents again, Cassie becomes an emotional wreck and so Vlad phones Georgia in the hope that Cassie will open up to someone.
_	However, Bethancourt struggled defensively and was eventually sent down to Gwinnett in the hope that he would improve, forcing Pierzynski into a starting role.
_	Arthur tears off his clothes and calls to Milak's spirit in the hope that the ship will be sunk and the Inuit protected from the dangers its crew bring.
_	Cao Cao agreed, but Qilan remained behind with Guan Yu. As Cao Cao was aware that Guan Yu was secretly in love with Qilan, he tricked Guan into consuming food spiked with aphrodisiac, in the hope that Guan would express his feelings to Qilan and rape her when she was immobilised.
_	Wilson leads his troops on what has become a heroic but ultimately futile quest to capture the King in the hope that his troops will surrender.
_	In the final story, Seleucus reportedly slept in the temple of Serapis in the hope that Alexander's health might improve.
_	Banks claimed his policy during the Brexit campaign was to "bore the electorate into submission", in the hope that a low turnout would favour Brexit.
_	Escalating loan defaults became a particularly important concern, undermining the hope that the cooperatives would become self-reliant and develop into strong institutions.
_	Decades later, in his memoir "Lyrics on Several Occasions", Ira Gershwin expressed the hope that someone might accuse him of plagiarizing his song "Tschaikowsky" from the collegiate poem, so he could reveal that he and Arthur Francis were the same person.
_	With the hope that fleet command will send some diesel submarines to tow the "K-19" back to port, Vostrikov ceases the mission and orders a heading that would return to port, but at a pace that could kill the entire crew with radiation sickness if rescue is not forthcoming.
_	When Lord Marchmain invites Sebastian and Julia to visit him and his mistress Cara in Venice, Lady Marchmain encourages Charles to go with them in the hope that he can act as a positive influence on her son.
_	He set these records in the hope that the news would be reported in Europe and his family would learn of his whereabouts.
_	Each of the two had different recollections of the situations – Ginsburg proposed that Miller had "quit CKY to pursue his own band", and that he and Margera would continue CKY without him; Miller retorted by claiming that he had, according to MTV, "overheard several of his bandmates talking smack about him in St. Louis", after which he took a brief break from the group in the hope that he would receive an apology from his bandmates.
_	The primary reason behind his conversion was the hope that his acceptance of Christianity would ensure his salvation.
_	We dedicate this film with the hope that these heinous crimes will never happen again."
_	As pressure builds for J.T. to face his fear of change and the outside world, Sara holds on to the hope that they can push forward together and live out their dream.
_	He eventually realizes that his sense of a reality, and therefore his sense of identity, has been severely screwed, although he still holds on the hope that Penny's love for him was real and not faked.
_	Ji-nyeo has the personality of a penny-pinching ajumma and basically supports her younger boyfriend in the hope that he will someday realize his dream, while Young-joon is an unemployed musician who carries around a guitar he doesn't know how to play.
_	The first reaction of Venice was to attempt a reconciliation and send a delegation to Candia, expressing the hope that the colonists would again become faithful to the Republic of Venice.
_	In 2009, they launched "I’m not a feminist, but If I were this is what I’d complain about…", an interactive graffiti wall that enables women who don't see themselves as feminists the means to target gender issues with the hope that active participation will broaden their perspectives.
_	Dutschke survived the assassination attempt, and he and his family went to the United Kingdom in the hope that he could recuperate there.
_	A working hypothesis is a hypothesis that is provisionally accepted as a basis for further research in the hope that a tenable theory will be produced, even if the hypothesis ultimately fails.
_	The final match was continually postponed, with the hope that it would soon become safe enough to play in Lebanon.
_	Overlooked for the 1981 Ashes tour of England, he decided to spend the season with Middlesex in the hope that he might be needed as a late replacement in the Australian team.
_	The regime also insisted through propaganda that all Germans take part in the May Day celebrations in the hope that this would help break down class hostility between workers and burghers.
_	A patriotic, militaristic spirit inflamed the city and most of the populace, philosophers and students included, entertained the hope that the French yoke could be violently thrown off.
_	Her father King Mercier believes it best to leave The Horde alone, in the hope that they will respect his decision and leave him and his people in peace.
_	King Hussein, who had come under intense pressure to enter the war, told Israel of his intentions through U.S. intermediaries, in the hope that Israel would accept that this was not a casus belli justifying an attack on Jordan.
_	Karl August, Duke of Saxe-Weimar and Saxe-Eisenach, waited near Erfurt in the hope that large numbers of troops would join the retreat; when few did so, he withdrew toward Langensalza.
_	On that occasion, Simeon Bouro assured Cuba that the Solomon Islands would provide "support for Cuba at the United Nations", and expressed the hope that bilateral cooperation would expand "to include sports, engineering, tourism, and agriculture and disaster management - areas [in which Cuba had] vast experience" which the Solomon Islands could benefit from.
_	His father later changed his courtesy name to Mocun (), literally "to keep silent", in the hope that he would talk less.
_	In response, Chloe turns a Metropolis clock tower, which is also the tallest building in the city, into the Watchtower base with the hope that the team will one day return home.
_	created the group with the hope that the box office reception of its films will be competitive with other animation studios' releases.
_	As a result, Apostol was placed under house arrest, being constantly interrogated, in the hope that he would reveal himself as a "Soviet spy".
_	They plan to arrest Mann in the hope that Drac, Joe's nephew, will be promoted and give them more information on the organization through his careless talk on the wire.
_	It is used by shamans in séances in the hope that it will be animated by spirits.
_	They plant a bomb under his car and kill the engine in the hope that he notices the bomb, which he does, and gets his wife to safety.
_	Gouzazhong learns "qi" cultivation techniques under Xie Yanke's tutelage for six years, but is unaware that Xie actually harbours ill intentions and has been teaching him the wrong methods, in the hope that he will sustain internal wounds and eventually die.
_	In a pastoral interlude a chorus sings of the joys of rural life, and expresses the hope that Theseus will not forget Ariadne.
_	According to the legend, she stayed with the Macedonian king for 13 days and nights in the hope that the great warrior would father a daughter by her.
_	Rodimus, being given half of the Matrix, decides to lead a search for the fabled Knights of Cybertron in the hope that they can help restore order to Cybertron.
_	The dedication read: "To the memory of Richard Cobden who loved his native land, these pages are dedicated by his daughter, in the hope that his desire—'Free Trade in Land'—may be fulfilled".
_	This was constructed in the hope that shoppers would use the ride to return to their vehicles, a near half-mile uphill walk from the main shopping complex.
_	As a last resort, the Lords have decided to call upon Covenant, in the hope that he will be able to use the wild magic power of his white gold ring to repel the siege and save the Land from total destruction.
_	From that moment on, the parents had the hope that their child could aim for something higher than the work of his parents.
_	This convention was held on 22–23 February, with 5,000 delegates, and discussed the success of Sinn Féin in the 1918 election, the declaration in January of the Irish Republic in Dublin, and the hope that America would support Irish participation at the forthcoming Paris peace conference.
_	"Placed as I am now within a few hours of my death, I express a strong desire that this statement be made public, with the hope that my fall will not only be a warning to others, but also act as a deterrent to those who are perhaps carrying on the same practice.
_	She scrimps and saves to provide a secondary school education for her oldest son, in the hope that he will help support the rest of the family.
_	A trick used to entice some of the animals near the camera was to play a recording of the same species in the hope that the target would not only answer back, but investigate its source as well.
_	This state of mind demands both innovation and respect for tradition, with the hope that by exercising creative freedom the human species will find peace, truth, and justice."
_	Crawford retaliated after the Eunsons sent their 17-year-old daughter Joan Evans to the actress in the hope that Crawford would talk her out of getting married to a man they disapproved of.
_	While Elika stays with the Ahura, leading the resistance against Ahriman, the Prince departs in search of the king of The City of New Dawn, in the hope that he can summon Ormazd, due to his affinity for the remnants of Ormazd's power.
_	The next day, heavy seas made it difficult to load the small boats with men and supplies and Fox was left with the hope that Anderson and his men could hold out until dark on April 13.
_	However, West Chester Borough Council opposed that plan in the hope that Market Street station would become a downtown transportation center.
_	He was instrumental in teaching boys the Latin chant, probably for a choir in the liturgy and with the hope that some of them might become priests.
_	Although trained only as a printer and having little or no command of the local languages either in India or in China, Hunt was able to produce an impressive stream of publications during 37 years by working closely with English-speaking residents in India and China, always expressing the hope that "God would allow some souls to be conquered before he [Hunt] should die."
_	Herlinda tries to bribe the census-taker with money with the hope that the shop's information will not end up in the department of tax collection.
_	It seems almost like groups of imperfect scenes were put together in the hope that they’d somehow come together to form a riveting, entertaining whole.
_	His nursemaid offered to take him to warmer climates abroad at his father's expense in the hope that this condition would not be so badly affected.
_	While expressing the hope that Meyer would in fact take the Republican point of view, the editorial acknowledged that he probably would not do so, since he seemed to be "no slavish supporter of any party or leader," assuring that under his leadership the Washington Post would be "hard hitting and independent, a paper that nobody can ignore."
_	Leopold authorised the takeover in the hope that the Free State would be able to resume rubber collection and exports and on 12 September 1906 an agreement was signed which stated that all profits from the concession would go to the Free State in return for payment to Abir of 4.5 fr per kilogram of rubber harvested until 1952.
_	Indeed, Wallace deliberately targeted many states he had little chance of carrying himself in the hope that by splitting the conservative vote with Nixon he would give those states to Humphrey and, by extension, boost his own chances of denying both opponents an Electoral College majority.
_	Even when chemotherapy does not provide a permanent cure, it may be useful to reduce symptoms such as pain or to reduce the size of an inoperable tumor in the hope that surgery will become possible in the future.
_	He is shown playing croquet with Elizabeth who speaks fondly of Jane, who has just received a letter from Caroline, expressing the hope that her brother will marry Miss Darcy.
_	With the hope that warring nomads would become peaceful agriculturalists, Haile Selassie, in person, asked McClure (and his church) to supervise the medical and educational work in this new city called Gode.
_	The Ecclesiastical Commissioners proposed to hand over the church site to Manchester Corporation in 1929, with the hope that the city would convert it into an open space similar to Parsonage Gardens.
_	In the event of capture, they were instructed to tell their interrogators that they had come from Egypt, in the hope that this would result in a breakdown of ongoing Israeli-Egyptian peace negotiations, and to direct Israeli retaliation away from Lebanon.
_	Smith's mother, Lucy, "said that Harris asked Joseph for a look at the plates, for 'a further witness of their actual existence and that he might be better able to give a reason for the hope that was within him.'
_	Not long after its invention laboratories within the Bell System continued to improve the photophone in the hope that it could supplement or replace expensive conventional telephone lines.
_	Arthur, who explains that his syphilis prevented him from consummating his marriage, and that he arranged for Dracula to come to England in the hope that he would cure him of the disease.
_	To solve cases, Dirk relies on random chance methods for example "Zen navigation" (following people or vehicles who look like they know where they are going, in the hope that while you might not get to where you were originally headed, you might still end up somewhere you needed to be, even if you didn't originally know you needed to be there.) or throwing a dart at a board of words to select the direction of his detection.
_	The end of the Cold War brought about the hope that the long stalemate and distortion of United Nations behaviors due to the bipolar superpower confrontation would cease.
_	Barrington records a story of Kelly, who had decided a point of law wrongly twice, expressing the hope that he could get the law right the third time.
_	In the 2015 documentary series for Channel Four, "It was Alright in the 1960s", Wyngarde expressed his unease at having to don blackface to play a Turk in "The Saint", but said that he had done it only in the hope that a theatre director might pick him to play "Othello".
_	He sent the "Alerte" ahead, which passed close to the leading British ships and then steered sharply to the west over the shoal, in the hope that the ships of the line might follow and become grounded.
_	This higher sense of dignity fits in with Nietzsche's general revaluation of those values distorted by religion's otherworldly delusions: love becomes love for Earthlings (both animals and "Übermenschen" included along of course with us); hope becomes hope for "this" Earth, and the hope that we Earthlings will not ruin it; charity becomes the overflowing virtue of generosity linked inextricably to amor fati and to creativity itself; and faith becomes remaining true to the Earth, and faithful to its unfathomed possibilities.
